Datenschutz
Alle relevanten Infos zum Datenschutz bei Dead Stock findest du hier
Wir freuen uns sehr über Ihr Interesse an unserem Unternehmen. Datenschutz hat einen besonders hohen Stellenwert für die Geschäftsleitung der Dead Stock. Eine Nutzung der Internetseiten der Dead Stock ist grundsätzlich ohne jede Angabe personenbezogener Daten möglich. Sofern eine betroffene Person besondere Services unseres Unternehmens über unsere Internetseite in Anspruch nehmen möchte, könnte jedoch eine Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten erforderlich werden. Ist die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten erforderlich und besteht für eine solche Verarbeitung keine gesetzliche Grundlage, holen wir generell eine Einwilligung der betroffenen Person ein.
Die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten, beispielsweise des Namens, der Anschrift, E-Mail-Adresse oder Telefonnummer einer betroffenen Person, erfolgt stets im Einklang mit der Datenschutz-Grundverordnung und in Übereinstimmung mit den für die Dead Stock geltenden landesspezifischen Datenschutzbestimmungen. Mittels dieser Datenschutzerklärung möchte unser Unternehmen die Öffentlichkeit über Art, Umfang und Zweck der von uns erhobenen, genutzten und verarbeiteten personenbezogenen Daten informieren. Ferner werden betroffene Personen mittels dieser Datenschutzerklärung über die ihnen zustehenden Rechte aufgeklärt.
Die Dead Stock hat als für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlicher zahlreiche technische und organisatorische Maßnahmen umgesetzt, um einen möglichst lückenlosen Schutz der über diese Internetseite verarbeiteten personenbezogenen Daten sicherzustellen. Dennoch können Internetbasierte Datenübertragungen grundsätzlich Sicherheitslücken aufweisen, sodass ein absoluter Schutz nicht gewährleistet werden kann. Aus diesem Grund steht es jeder betroffenen Person frei, personenbezogene Daten auch auf alternativen Wegen, beispielsweise telefonisch, an uns zu übermitteln.
1. Begriffsbestimmungen
Die Datenschutzerklärung der Dead Stock beruht auf den Begrifflichkeiten, die durch den Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber beim Erlass der Datenschutz-Grundverordnung (DS-GVO) verwendet wurden. Unsere Datenschutzerklärung soll sowohl für die Öffentlichkeit als auch für unsere Kunden und Geschäftspartner einfach lesbar und verständlich sein. Um dies zu gewährleisten, möchten wir vorab die verwendeten Begrifflichkeiten erläutern.
Wir verwenden in dieser Datenschutzerklärung unter anderem die folgenden Begriffe:
a)    personenbezogene DatenPersonenbezogene Daten sind alle Informationen, die sich auf eine identifizierte oder identifizierbare natürliche Person (im Folgenden „betroffene Person“) beziehen. Als identifizierbar wird eine natürliche Person angesehen, die direkt oder indirekt, insbesondere mittels Zuordnung zu einer Kennung wie einem Namen, zu einer Kennnummer, zu Standortdaten, zu einer Online-Kennung oder zu einem oder mehreren besonderen Merkmalen, die Ausdruck der physischen, physiologischen, genetischen, psychischen, wirtschaftlichen, kulturellen oder sozialen Identität dieser natürlichen Person sind, identifiziert werden kann.
b)    betroffene PersonBetroffene Person ist jede identifizierte oder identifizierbare natürliche Person, deren personenbezogene Daten von dem für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen verarbeitet werden.
c)    VerarbeitungVerarbeitung ist jeder mit oder ohne Hilfe automatisierter Verfahren ausgeführte Vorgang oder jede solche Vorgangsreihe im Zusammenhang mit personenbezogenen Daten wie das Erheben, das Erfassen, die Organisation, das Ordnen, die Speicherung, die Anpassung oder Veränderung, das Auslesen, das Abfragen, die Verwendung, die Offenlegung durch Übermittlung, Verbreitung oder eine andere Form der Bereitstellung, den Abgleich oder die Verknüpfung, die Einschränkung, das Löschen oder die Vernichtung.
d)    Einschränkung der VerarbeitungEinschränkung der Verarbeitung ist die Markierung gespeicherter personenbezogener Daten mit dem Ziel, ihre künftige Verarbeitung einzuschränken.
e)    ProfilingProfiling ist jede Art der automatisierten Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten, die darin besteht, dass diese personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden, um bestimmte persönliche Aspekte, die sich auf eine natürliche Person beziehen, zu bewerten, insbesondere, um Aspekte bezüglich Arbeitsleistung, wirtschaftlicher Lage, Gesundheit, persönlicher Vorlieben, Interessen, Zuverlässigkeit, Verhalten, Aufenthaltsort oder Ortswechsel dieser natürlichen Person zu analysieren oder vorherzusagen.
f)     PseudonymisierungPseudonymisierung ist die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten in einer Weise, auf welche die personenbezogenen Daten ohne Hinzuziehung zusätzlicher Informationen nicht mehr einer spezifischen betroffenen Person zugeordnet werden können, sofern diese zusätzlichen Informationen gesondert aufbewahrt werden und technischen und organisatorischen Maßnahmen unterliegen, die gewährleisten, dass die personenbezogenen Daten nicht einer identifizierten oder identifizierbaren natürlichen Person zugewiesen werden.
g)    Verantwortlicher oder für die Verarbeitung VerantwortlicherVerantwortlicher oder für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlicher ist die natürliche oder juristische Person, Behörde, Einrichtung oder andere Stelle, die allein oder gemeinsam mit anderen über die Zwecke und Mittel der Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten entscheidet. Sind die Zwecke und Mittel dieser Verarbeitung durch das Unionsrecht oder das Recht der Mitgliedstaaten vorgegeben, so kann der Verantwortliche beziehungsweise können die bestimmten Kriterien seiner Benennung nach dem Unionsrecht oder dem Recht der Mitgliedstaaten vorgesehen werden.
h)    AuftragsverarbeiterAuftragsverarbeiter ist eine natürliche oder juristische Person, Behörde, Einrichtung oder andere Stelle, die personenbezogene Daten im Auftrag des Verantwortlichen verarbeitet.
i)      EmpfängerEmpfänger ist eine natürliche oder juristische Person, Behörde, Einrichtung oder andere Stelle, der personenbezogene Daten offengelegt werden, unabhängig davon, ob es sich bei ihr um einen Dritten handelt oder nicht. Behörden, die im Rahmen eines bestimmten Untersuchungsauftrags nach dem Unionsrecht oder dem Recht der Mitgliedstaaten möglicherweise personenbezogene Daten erhalten, gelten jedoch nicht als Empfänger.
j)      DritterDritter ist eine natürliche oder juristische Person, Behörde, Einrichtung oder andere Stelle außer der betroffenen Person, dem Verantwortlichen, dem Auftragsverarbeiter und den Personen, die unter der unmittelbaren Verantwortung des Verantwortlichen oder des Auftragsverarbeiters befugt sind, die personenbezogenen Daten zu verarbeiten.
k)    EinwilligungEinwilligung ist jede von der betroffenen Person freiwillig für den bestimmten Fall in informierter Weise und unmissverständlich abgegebene Willensbekundung in Form einer Erklärung oder einer sonstigen eindeutigen bestätigenden Handlung, mit der die betroffene Person zu verstehen gibt, dass sie mit der Verarbeitung der sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten einverstanden ist.
2. Name und Anschrift des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen
Verantwortlicher im Sinne der Datenschutz-Grundverordnung, sonstiger in den Mitgliedstaaten der Europäischen Union geltenden Datenschutzgesetze und anderer Bestimmungen mit datenschutzrechtlichem Charakter ist die:
Dead Stock Sneakerblog
Christopher Blumenthal
Hochstadenstraße 27
50674 Köln
E-Mail: info@deadstock.de
Website: www.deadstock.de
3. Cookies
Die Internetseiten der Dead Stock verwenden Cookies. Cookies sind Textdateien, welche über einen Internetbrowser auf einem Computersystem abgelegt und gespeichert werden.
Zahlreiche Internetseiten und Server verwenden Cookies. Viele Cookies enthalten eine sogenannte Cookie-ID. Eine Cookie-ID ist eine eindeutige Kennung des Cookies. Sie besteht aus einer Zeichenfolge, durch welche Internetseiten und Server dem konkreten Internetbrowser zugeordnet werden können, in dem das Cookie gespeichert wurde. Dies ermöglicht es den besuchten Internetseiten und Servern, den individuellen Browser der betroffenen Person von anderen Internetbrowsern, die andere Cookies enthalten, zu unterscheiden. Ein bestimmter Internetbrowser kann über die eindeutige Cookie-ID wiedererkannt und identifiziert werden.
Durch den Einsatz von Cookies kann die Dead Stock den Nutzern dieser Internetseite nutzerfreundlichere Services bereitstellen, die ohne die Cookie-Setzung nicht möglich wären.
Mittels eines Cookies können die Informationen und Angebote auf unserer Internetseite im Sinne des Benutzers optimiert werden. Cookies ermöglichen uns, wie bereits erwähnt, die Benutzer unserer Internetseite wiederzuerkennen. Zweck dieser Wiedererkennung ist es, den Nutzern die Verwendung unserer Internetseite zu erleichtern. Der Benutzer einer Internetseite, die Cookies verwendet, muss beispielsweise nicht bei jedem Besuch der Internetseite erneut seine Zugangsdaten eingeben, weil dies von der Internetseite und dem auf dem Computersystem des Benutzers abgelegten Cookie übernommen wird. Ein weiteres Beispiel ist das Cookie eines Warenkorbes im Online-Shop. Der Online-Shop merkt sich die Artikel, die ein Kunde in den virtuellen Warenkorb gelegt hat, über ein Cookie.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Ferner können bereits gesetzte Cookies jederzeit über einen Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden. Dies ist in allen gängigen Internetbrowsern möglich. Deaktiviert die betroffene Person die Setzung von Cookies in dem genutzten Internetbrowser, sind unter Umständen nicht alle Funktionen unserer Internetseite vollumfänglich nutzbar.
4. Erfassung von allgemeinen Daten und Informationen
Die Internetseite der Dead Stock erfasst mit jedem Aufruf der Internetseite durch eine betroffene Person oder ein automatisiertes System eine Reihe von allgemeinen Daten und Informationen. Diese allgemeinen Daten und Informationen werden in den Logfiles des Servers gespeichert. Erfasst werden können die (1) verwendeten Browsertypen und Versionen, (2) das vom zugreifenden System verwendete Betriebssystem, (3) die Internetseite, von welcher ein zugreifendes System auf unsere Internetseite gelangt (sogenannte Referrer), (4) die Unterwebseiten, welche über ein zugreifendes System auf unserer Internetseite angesteuert werden, (5) das Datum und die Uhrzeit eines Zugriffs auf die Internetseite, (6) eine Internet-Protokoll-Adresse (IP-Adresse), (7) der Internet-Service-Provider des zugreifenden Systems und (8) sonstige ähnliche Daten und Informationen, die der Gefahrenabwehr im Falle von Angriffen auf unsere informationstechnologischen Systeme dienen.
Bei der Nutzung dieser allgemeinen Daten und Informationen zieht die Dead Stock keine Rückschlüsse auf die betroffene Person. Diese Informationen werden vielmehr benötigt, um (1) die Inhalte unserer Internetseite korrekt auszuliefern, (2) die Inhalte unserer Internetseite sowie die Werbung für diese zu optimieren, (3) die dauerhafte Funktionsfähigkeit unserer informationstechnologischen Systeme und der Technik unserer Internetseite zu gewährleisten sowie (4) um Strafverfolgungsbehörden im Falle eines Cyberangriffes die zur Strafverfolgung notwendigen Informationen bereitzustellen. Diese anonym erhobenen Daten und Informationen werden durch die Dead Stock daher einerseits statistisch und ferner mit dem Ziel ausgewertet, den Datenschutz und die Datensicherheit in unserem Unternehmen zu erhöhen, um letztlich ein optimales Schutzniveau für die von uns verarbeiteten personenbezogenen Daten sicherzustellen. Die anonymen Daten der Server-Logfiles werden getrennt von allen durch eine betroffene Person angegebenen personenbezogenen Daten gespeichert.
5. Kommentarfunktion im Blog auf der Internetseite
Die Dead Stock bietet den Nutzern auf einem Blog, der sich auf der Internetseite des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen befindet, die Möglichkeit, individuelle Kommentare zu einzelnen Blog-Beiträgen zu hinterlassen. Ein Blog ist ein auf einer Internetseite geführtes, in der Regel öffentlich einsehbares Portal, in welchem eine oder mehrere Personen, die Blogger oder Web-Blogger genannt werden, Artikel posten oder Gedanken in sogenannten Blogposts niederschreiben können. Die Blogposts können in der Regel von Dritten kommentiert werden.
Hinterlässt eine betroffene Person einen Kommentar in dem auf dieser Internetseite veröffentlichten Blog, werden neben den von der betroffenen Person hinterlassenen Kommentaren auch Angaben zum Zeitpunkt der Kommentareingabe sowie zu dem von der betroffenen Person gewählten Nutzernamen (Pseudonym) gespeichert und veröffentlicht. Ferner wird die vom Internet-Service-Provider (ISP) der betroffenen Person vergebene IP-Adresse mitprotokolliert. Diese Speicherung der IP-Adresse erfolgt aus Sicherheitsgründen und für den Fall, dass die betroffene Person durch einen abgegebenen Kommentar die Rechte Dritter verletzt oder rechtswidrige Inhalte postet. Die Speicherung dieser personenbezogenen Daten erfolgt daher im eigenen Interesse des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen, damit sich dieser im Falle einer Rechtsverletzung gegebenenfalls exkulpieren könnte. Es erfolgt keine Weitergabe dieser erhobenen personenbezogenen Daten an Dritte, sofern eine solche Weitergabe nicht gesetzlich vorgeschrieben ist oder der Rechtsverteidigung des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen dient.
6. Abonnement von Kommentaren im Blog auf der Internetseite
Die im Blog der Dead Stock abgegebenen Kommentare können grundsätzlich von Dritten abonniert werden. Insbesondere besteht die Möglichkeit, dass ein Kommentator die seinem Kommentar nachfolgenden Kommentare zu einem bestimmten Blog-Beitrag abonniert.
Sofern sich eine betroffene Person für die Option entscheidet, Kommentare zu abonnieren, versendet der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche eine automatische Bestätigungsmail, um im Double-Opt-In-Verfahren zu überprüfen, ob sich wirklich der Inhaber der angegebenen E-Mail-Adresse für diese Option entschieden hat. Die Option zum Abonnement von Kommentaren kann jederzeit beendet werden.
7. Routinemäßige Löschung und Sperrung von personenbezogenen Daten
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche verarbeitet und speichert personenbezogene Daten der betroffenen Person nur für den Zeitraum, der zur Erreichung des Speicherungszwecks erforderlich ist oder sofern dies durch den Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber oder einen anderen Gesetzgeber in Gesetzen oder Vorschriften, welchen der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche unterliegt, vorgesehen wurde.
Entfällt der Speicherungszweck oder läuft eine vom Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber oder einem anderen zuständigen Gesetzgeber vorgeschriebene Speicherfrist ab, werden die personenbezogenen Daten routinemäßig und entsprechend den gesetzlichen Vorschriften gesperrt oder gelöscht.
8. Rechte der betroffenen Person
a)    Recht auf BestätigungJede betroffene Person hat das vom Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber eingeräumte Recht, von dem für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen eine Bestätigung darüber zu verlangen, ob sie betreffende personenbezogene Daten verarbeitet werden. Möchte eine betroffene Person dieses Bestätigungsrecht in Anspruch nehmen, kann sie sich hierzu jederzeit an einen Mitarbeiter des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen wenden.
b)    Recht auf AuskunftJede von der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten betroffene Person hat das vom Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber gewährte Recht, jederzeit von dem für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen unentgeltliche Auskunft über die zu seiner Person gespeicherten personenbezogenen Daten und eine Kopie dieser Auskunft zu erhalten. Ferner hat der Europäische Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber der betroffenen Person Auskunft über folgende Informationen zugestanden:
die Verarbeitungszwecke
die Kategorien personenbezogener Daten, die verarbeitet werden
die Empfänger oder Kategorien von Empfängern, gegenüber denen die personenbezogenen Daten offengelegt worden sind oder noch offengelegt werden, insbesondere bei Empfängern in Drittländern oder bei internationalen Organisationen
falls möglich die geplante Dauer, für die die personenbezogenen Daten gespeichert werden, oder, falls dies nicht möglich ist, die Kriterien für die Festlegung dieser Dauer
das Bestehen eines Rechts auf Berichtigung oder Löschung der sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten oder auf Einschränkung der Verarbeitung durch den Verantwortlichen oder eines Widerspruchsrechts gegen diese Verarbeitung
das Bestehen eines Beschwerderechts bei einer Aufsichtsbehörde
wenn die personenbezogenen Daten nicht bei der betroffenen Person erhoben werden: Alle verfügbaren Informationen über die Herkunft der Daten
das Bestehen einer automatisierten Entscheidungsfindung einschließlich Profiling gemäß Artikel 22 Abs.1 und 4 DS-GVO und — zumindest in diesen Fällen — aussagekräftige Informationen über die involvierte Logik sowie die Tragweite und die angestrebten Auswirkungen einer derartigen Verarbeitung für die betroffene Person
Ferner steht der betroffenen Person ein Auskunftsrecht darüber zu, ob personenbezogene Daten an ein Drittland oder an eine internationale Organisation übermittelt wurden. Sofern dies der Fall ist, so steht der betroffenen Person im Übrigen das Recht zu, Auskunft über die geeigneten Garantien im Zusammenhang mit der Übermittlung zu erhalten.Möchte eine betroffene Person dieses Auskunftsrecht in Anspruch nehmen, kann sie sich hierzu jederzeit an einen Mitarbeiter des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen wenden.
c)    Recht auf BerichtigungJede von der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten betroffene Person hat das vom Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber gewährte Recht, die unverzügliche Berichtigung sie betreffender unrichtiger personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen. Ferner steht der betroffenen Person das Recht zu, unter Berücksichtigung der Zwecke der Verarbeitung, die Vervollständigung unvollständiger personenbezogener Daten — auch mittels einer ergänzenden Erklärung — zu verlangen.Möchte eine betroffene Person dieses Berichtigungsrecht in Anspruch nehmen, kann sie sich hierzu jederzeit an einen Mitarbeiter des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen wenden.
d)    Recht auf Löschung (Recht auf Vergessen werden)Jede von der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten betroffene Person hat das vom Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber gewährte Recht, von dem Verantwortlichen zu verlangen, dass die sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten unverzüglich gelöscht werden, sofern einer der folgenden Gründe zutrifft und soweit die Verarbeitung nicht erforderlich ist:
Die personenbezogenen Daten wurden für solche Zwecke erhoben oder auf sonstige Weise verarbeitet, für welche sie nicht mehr notwendig sind.
Die betroffene Person widerruft ihre Einwilligung, auf die sich die Verarbeitung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 Buchstabe a DS-GVO oder Art. 9 Abs. 2 Buchstabe a DS-GVO stützte, und es fehlt an einer anderweitigen Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung.
Die betroffene Person legt gemäß Art. 21 Abs. 1 DS-GVO Widerspruch gegen die Verarbeitung ein, und es liegen keine vorrangigen berechtigten Gründe für die Verarbeitung vor, oder die betroffene Person legt gemäß Art. 21 Abs. 2 DS-GVO Widerspruch gegen die Verarbeitung ein.
Die personenbezogenen Daten wurden unrechtmäßig verarbeitet.
Die Löschung der personenbezogenen Daten ist zur Erfüllung einer rechtlichen Verpflichtung nach dem Unionsrecht oder dem Recht der Mitgliedstaaten erforderlich, dem der Verantwortliche unterliegt.
Die personenbezogenen Daten wurden in Bezug auf angebotene Dienste der Informationsgesellschaft gemäß Art. 8 Abs. 1 DS-GVO erhoben.
Sofern einer der oben genannten Gründe zutrifft und eine betroffene Person die Löschung von personenbezogenen Daten, die bei der Dead Stock gespeichert sind, veranlassen möchte, kann sie sich hierzu jederzeit an einen Mitarbeiter des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen wenden. Der Mitarbeiter der Dead Stock wird veranlassen, dass dem Löschverlangen unverzüglich nachgekommen wird.Wurden die personenbezogenen Daten von der Dead Stock öffentlich gemacht und ist unser Unternehmen als Verantwortlicher gemäß Art. 17 Abs. 1 DS-GVO zur Löschung der personenbezogenen Daten verpflichtet, so trifft die Dead Stock unter Berücksichtigung der verfügbaren Technologie und der Implementierungskosten angemessene Maßnahmen, auch technischer Art, um andere für die Datenverarbeitung Verantwortliche, welche die veröffentlichten personenbezogenen Daten verarbeiten, darüber in Kenntnis zu setzen, dass die betroffene Person von diesen anderen für die Datenverarbeitung Verantwortlichen die Löschung sämtlicher Links zu diesen personenbezogenen Daten oder von Kopien oder Replikationen dieser personenbezogenen Daten verlangt hat, soweit die Verarbeitung nicht erforderlich ist. Der Mitarbeiter der Dead Stock wird im Einzelfall das Notwendige veranlassen.
e)    Recht auf Einschränkung der VerarbeitungJede von der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten betroffene Person hat das vom Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber gewährte Recht, von dem Verantwortlichen die Einschränkung der Verarbeitung zu verlangen, wenn eine der folgenden Voraussetzungen gegeben ist:
Die Richtigkeit der personenbezogenen Daten wird von der betroffenen Person bestritten, und zwar für eine Dauer, die es dem Verantwortlichen ermöglicht, die Richtigkeit der personenbezogenen Daten zu überprüfen.
Die Verarbeitung ist unrechtmäßig, die betroffene Person lehnt die Löschung der personenbezogenen Daten ab und verlangt stattdessen die Einschränkung der Nutzung der personenbezogenen Daten.
Der Verantwortliche benötigt die personenbezogenen Daten für die Zwecke der Verarbeitung nicht länger, die betroffene Person benötigt sie jedoch zur Geltendmachung, Ausübung oder Verteidigung von Rechtsansprüchen.
Die betroffene Person hat Widerspruch gegen die Verarbeitung gem. Art. 21 Abs. 1 DS-GVO eingelegt und es steht noch nicht fest, ob die berechtigten Gründe des Verantwortlichen gegenüber denen der betroffenen Person überwiegen.
Sofern eine der oben genannten Voraussetzungen gegeben ist und eine betroffene Person die Einschränkung von personenbezogenen Daten, die bei der Dead Stock gespeichert sind, verlangen möchte, kann sie sich hierzu jederzeit an einen Mitarbeiter des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen wenden. Der Mitarbeiter der Dead Stock wird die Einschränkung der Verarbeitung veranlassen.
f)     Recht auf DatenübertragbarkeitJede von der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten betroffene Person hat das vom Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber gewährte Recht, die sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten, welche durch die betroffene Person einem Verantwortlichen bereitgestellt wurden, in einem strukturierten, gängigen und maschinenlesbaren Format zu erhalten. Sie hat außerdem das Recht, diese Daten einem anderen Verantwortlichen ohne Behinderung durch den Verantwortlichen, dem die personenbezogenen Daten bereitgestellt wurden, zu übermitteln, sofern die Verarbeitung auf der Einwilligung gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 Buchstabe a DS-GVO oder Art. 9 Abs. 2 Buchstabe a DS-GVO oder auf einem Vertrag gemäß Art. 6 Abs. 1 Buchstabe b DS-GVO beruht und die Verarbeitung mithilfe automatisierter Verfahren erfolgt, sofern die Verarbeitung nicht für die Wahrnehmung einer Aufgabe erforderlich ist, die im öffentlichen Interesse liegt oder in Ausübung öffentlicher Gewalt erfolgt, welche dem Verantwortlichen übertragen wurde.Ferner hat die betroffene Person bei der Ausübung ihres Rechts auf Datenübertragbarkeit gemäß Art. 20 Abs. 1 DS-GVO das Recht, zu erwirken, dass die personenbezogenen Daten direkt von einem Verantwortlichen an einen anderen Verantwortlichen übermittelt werden, soweit dies technisch machbar ist und sofern hiervon nicht die Rechte und Freiheiten anderer Personen beeinträchtigt werden.Zur Geltendmachung des Rechts auf Datenübertragbarkeit kann sich die betroffene Person jederzeit an einen Mitarbeiter der Dead Stock wenden.
g)    Recht auf WiderspruchJede von der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten betroffene Person hat das vom Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber gewährte Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus ihrer besonderen Situation ergeben, jederzeit gegen die Verarbeitung sie betreffender personenbezogener Daten, die aufgrund von Art. 6 Abs. 1 Buchstaben e oder f DS-GVO erfolgt, Widerspruch einzulegen. Dies gilt auch für ein auf diese Bestimmungen gestütztes Profiling.Die Dead Stock verarbeitet die personenbezogenen Daten im Falle des Widerspruchs nicht mehr, es sei denn, wir können zwingende schutzwürdige Gründe für die Verarbeitung nachweisen, die den Interessen, Rechten und Freiheiten der betroffenen Person überwiegen, oder die Verarbeitung dient der Geltendmachung, Ausübung oder Verteidigung von Rechtsansprüchen.Verarbeitet die Dead Stock personenbezogene Daten, um Direktwerbung zu betreiben, so hat die betroffene Person das Recht, jederzeit Widerspruch gegen die Verarbeitung der personenbezogenen Daten zum Zwecke derartiger Werbung einzulegen. Dies gilt auch für das Profiling, soweit es mit solcher Direktwerbung in Verbindung steht. Widerspricht die betroffene Person gegenüber der Dead Stock der Verarbeitung für Zwecke der Direktwerbung, so wird die Dead Stock die personenbezogenen Daten nicht mehr für diese Zwecke verarbeiten.Zudem hat die betroffene Person das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus ihrer besonderen Situation ergeben, gegen die sie betreffende Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten, die bei der Dead Stock zu wissenschaftlichen oder historischen Forschungszwecken oder zu statistischen Zwecken gemäß Art. 89 Abs. 1 DS-GVO erfolgen, Widerspruch einzulegen, es sei denn, eine solche Verarbeitung ist zur Erfüllung einer im öffentlichen Interesse liegenden Aufgabe erforderlich.Zur Ausübung des Rechts auf Widerspruch kann sich die betroffene Person direkt an jeden Mitarbeiter der Dead Stock oder einen anderen Mitarbeiter wenden. Der betroffenen Person steht es ferner frei, im Zusammenhang mit der Nutzung von Diensten der Informationsgesellschaft, ungeachtet der Richtlinie 2002/58/EG, ihr Widerspruchsrecht mittels automatisierter Verfahren auszuüben, bei denen technische Spezifikationen verwendet werden.
h)    Automatisierte Entscheidungen im Einzelfall einschließlich ProfilingJede von der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten betroffene Person hat das vom Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber gewährte Recht, nicht einer ausschließlich auf einer automatisierten Verarbeitung — einschließlich Profiling — beruhenden Entscheidung unterworfen zu werden, die ihr gegenüber rechtliche Wirkung entfaltet oder sie in ähnlicher Weise erheblich beeinträchtigt, sofern die Entscheidung (1) nicht für den Abschluss oder die Erfüllung eines Vertrags zwischen der betroffenen Person und dem Verantwortlichen erforderlich ist, oder (2) aufgrund von Rechtsvorschriften der Union oder der Mitgliedstaaten, denen der Verantwortliche unterliegt, zulässig ist und diese Rechtsvorschriften angemessene Maßnahmen zur Wahrung der Rechte und Freiheiten sowie der berechtigten Interessen der betroffenen Person enthalten oder (3) mit ausdrücklicher Einwilligung der betroffenen Person erfolgt.Ist die Entscheidung (1) für den Abschluss oder die Erfüllung eines Vertrags zwischen der betroffenen Person und dem Verantwortlichen erforderlich oder (2) erfolgt sie mit ausdrücklicher Einwilligung der betroffenen Person, trifft die Dead Stock angemessene Maßnahmen, um die Rechte und Freiheiten sowie die berechtigten Interessen der betroffenen Person zu wahren, wozu mindestens das Recht auf Erwirkung des Eingreifens einer Person seitens des Verantwortlichen, auf Darlegung des eigenen Standpunkts und auf Anfechtung der Entscheidung gehört.Möchte die betroffene Person Rechte mit Bezug auf automatisierte Entscheidungen geltend machen, kann sie sich hierzu jederzeit an einen Mitarbeiter des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen wenden.
i)      Recht auf Widerruf einer datenschutzrechtlichen EinwilligungJede von der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten betroffene Person hat das vom Europäischen Richtlinien- und Verordnungsgeber gewährte Recht, eine Einwilligung zur Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten jederzeit zu widerrufen.Möchte die betroffene Person ihr Recht auf Widerruf einer Einwilligung geltend machen, kann sie sich hierzu jederzeit an einen Mitarbeiter des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen wenden.
9. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von affilinet
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Komponenten des Unternehmens affilinet integriert. Affilinet ist ein deutsches Affiliate-Netzwerk, welches Affiliate-Marketing anbietet.
Affiliate-Marketing ist eine Internetgestützte Vertriebsform, die es kommerziellen Betreibern von Internetseiten, den sogenannten Merchants oder Advertisern, ermöglicht, Werbung, die meist über Klick- oder Sale-Provisionen vergütet wird, auf Internetseiten Dritter, also bei Vertriebspartnern, die auch Affiliates oder Publisher genannt werden, einzublenden. Der Merchant stellt über das Affiliate-Netzwerk ein Werbemittel, also einen Werbebanner oder andere geeignete Mittel der Internetwerbung, zur Verfügung, welche in der Folge von einem Affiliate auf eigenen Internetseiten eingebunden oder über sonstige Kanäle, wie etwa das Keyword-Advertising oder E-Mail-Marketing, beworben werden.
Betreibergesellschaft von Affilinet ist die affilinet GmbH, Sapporobogen 6-8, 80637 München, Germany.
Affilinet setzt ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. Das Tracking-Cookie von Affilinet speichert keinerlei personenbezogene Daten. Gespeichert werden lediglich die Identifikationsnummer des Affiliate, also des den potentiellen Kunden vermittelnden Partners, sowie die Ordnungsnummer des Besuchers einer Internetseite und des angeklickten Werbemittels. Zweck der Speicherung dieser Daten ist die Abwicklung von Provisionszahlungen zwischen einem Merchant und dem Affiliate, welche über das Affiliate-Netzwerk, also Affilinet, abgewickelt werden.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass Affilinet ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem können von Affilinet bereits gesetzte Cookies jederzeit über einen Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von Affilinet können unter
https://www.affili.net/de/footeritem/datenschutz
abgerufen werden.
10. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Facebook
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Komponenten des Unternehmens Facebook integriert. Facebook ist ein soziales Netzwerk.
Ein soziales Netzwerk ist ein im Internet betriebener sozialer Treffpunkt, eine Online-Gemeinschaft, die es den Nutzern in der Regel ermöglicht, untereinander zu kommunizieren und im virtuellen Raum zu interagieren. Ein soziales Netzwerk kann als Plattform zum Austausch von Meinungen und Erfahrungen dienen oder ermöglicht es der Internetgemeinschaft, persönliche oder unternehmensbezogene Informationen bereitzustellen. Facebook ermöglicht den Nutzern des sozialen Netzwerkes unter anderem die Erstellung von privaten Profilen, den Upload von Fotos und eine Vernetzung über Freundschaftsanfragen.
Betreibergesellschaft von Facebook ist die Facebook, Inc., 1 Hacker Way, Menlo Park, CA 94025, USA. Für die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten Verantwortlicher ist, wenn eine betroffene Person außerhalb der USA oder Kanada lebt, die Facebook Ireland Ltd., 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland.
Durch jeden Aufruf einer der Einzelseiten dieser Internetseite, die durch den für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen betrieben wird und auf welcher eine Facebook-Komponente (Facebook-Plug-In) integriert wurde, wird der Internetbrowser auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person automatisch durch die jeweilige Facebook-Komponente veranlasst, eine Darstellung der entsprechenden Facebook-Komponente von Facebook herunterzuladen. Eine Gesamtübersicht über alle Facebook-Plug-Ins kann unter
https://developers.facebook.com/docs/plugins/?locale=de_DE
abgerufen werden. Im Rahmen dieses technischen Verfahrens erhält Facebook Kenntnis darüber, welche konkrete Unterseite unserer Internetseite durch die betroffene Person besucht wird.
Sofern die betroffene Person gleichzeitig bei Facebook eingeloggt ist, erkennt Facebook mit jedem Aufruf unserer Internetseite durch die betroffene Person und während der gesamten Dauer des jeweiligen Aufenthaltes auf unserer Internetseite, welche konkrete Unterseite unserer Internetseite die betroffene Person besucht. Diese Informationen werden durch die Facebook-Komponente gesammelt und durch Facebook dem jeweiligen Facebook-Account der betroffenen Person zugeordnet. Betätigt die betroffene Person einen der auf unserer Internetseite integrierten Facebook-Buttons, beispielsweise den „Gefällt mir“-Button, oder gibt die betroffene Person einen Kommentar ab, ordnet Facebook diese Information dem persönlichen Facebook-Benutzerkonto der betroffenen Person zu und speichert diese personenbezogenen Daten.
Facebook erhält über die Facebook-Komponente immer dann eine Information darüber, dass die betroffene Person unsere Internetseite besucht hat, wenn die betroffene Person zum Zeitpunkt des Aufrufs unserer Internetseite gleichzeitig bei Facebook eingeloggt ist; dies findet unabhängig davon statt, ob die betroffene Person die Facebook-Komponente anklickt oder nicht. Ist eine derartige Übermittlung dieser Informationen an Facebook von der betroffenen Person nicht gewollt, kann diese die Übermittlung dadurch verhindern, dass sie sich vor einem Aufruf unserer Internetseite aus ihrem Facebook-Account ausloggt.
Die von Facebook veröffentlichte Datenrichtlinie, die unter
https://de-de.facebook.com/about/privacy/
abrufbar ist, gibt Aufschluss über die Erhebung, Verarbeitung und Nutzung personenbezogener Daten durch Facebook. Ferner wird dort erläutert, welche Einstellungsmöglichkeiten Facebook zum Schutz der Privatsphäre der betroffenen Person bietet. Zudem sind unterschiedliche Applikationen erhältlich, die es ermöglichen, eine Datenübermittlung an Facebook zu unterdrücken. Solche Applikationen können durch die betroffene Person genutzt werden, um eine Datenübermittlung an Facebook zu unterdrücken.
11. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Google AdSense
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Google AdSense integriert. Google AdSense ist ein Online-Dienst, über welchen eine Vermittlung von Werbung auf Drittseiten ermöglicht wird. Google AdSense beruht auf einem Algorithmus, welcher die auf Drittseiten angezeigten Werbeanzeigen passend zu den Inhalten der jeweiligen Drittseite auswählt. Google AdSense gestattet ein interessenbezogenes Targeting des Internetnutzers, welches mittels Generierung von individuellen Benutzerprofilen umgesetzt wird.
Betreibergesellschaft der Google-AdSense-Komponente ist die Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland.
Der Zweck der Google-AdSense-Komponente ist die Einbindung von Werbeanzeigen auf unserer Internetseite. Google-AdSense setzt ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. Mit der Setzung des Cookies wird der Alphabet Inc. eine Analyse der Benutzung unserer Internetseite ermöglicht. Durch jeden Aufruf einer der Einzelseiten dieser Internetseite, die durch den für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen betrieben wird und auf welcher eine Google-AdSense-Komponente integriert wurde, wird der Internetbrowser auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person automatisch durch die jeweilige Google-AdSense-Komponente veranlasst, Daten zum Zwecke der Online-Werbung und der Abrechnung von Provisionen an die Alphabet Inc. zu übermitteln. Im Rahmen dieses technischen Verfahrens erhält die Alphabet Inc. Kenntnis über personenbezogene Daten, wie der IP-Adresse der betroffenen Person, die der Alphabet Inc. unter anderem dazu dienen, die Herkunft der Besucher und Klicks nachzuvollziehen und in der Folge Provisionsabrechnungen zu ermöglichen.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass die Alphabet Inc. ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem kann ein von der Alphabet Inc. bereits gesetzter Cookie jederzeit über den Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Google AdSense verwendet zudem sogenannte Zählpixel. Ein Zählpixel ist eine Miniaturgrafik, die in Internetseiten eingebettet wird, um eine Logdatei-Aufzeichnung und eine Logdatei-Analyse zu ermöglichen, wodurch eine statistische Auswertung durchgeführt werden kann. Anhand des eingebetteten Zählpixels kann die Alphabet Inc. erkennen, ob und wann eine Internetseite von einer betroffenen Person geöffnet wurde und welche Links von der betroffenen Person angeklickt wurden. Zählpixel dienen unter anderem dazu, den Besucherfluss einer Internetseite auszuwerten.
Über Google AdSense werden personenbezogene Daten und Informationen, was auch die IP-Adresse umfasst und zur Erfassung und Abrechnung der angezeigten Werbeanzeigen notwendig ist, an die Alphabet Inc. in die Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika übertragen. Diese personenbezogenen Daten werden in den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika gespeichert und verarbeitet. Die Alphabet Inc. gibt diese über das technische Verfahren erhobenen personenbezogenen Daten unter Umständen an Dritte weiter.
Google-AdSense wird unter diesem Link
https://www.google.de/intl/de/adsense/start/
genauer erläutert.
12. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Google Analytics (mit Anonymisierungsfunktion)
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite die Komponente Google Analytics (mit Anonymisierungsfunktion) integriert. Google Analytics ist ein Web-Analyse-Dienst. Web-Analyse ist die Erhebung, Sammlung und Auswertung von Daten über das Verhalten von Besuchern von Internetseiten. Ein Web-Analyse-Dienst erfasst unter anderem Daten darüber, von welcher Internetseite eine betroffene Person auf eine Internetseite gekommen ist (sogenannte Referrer), auf welche Unterseiten der Internetseite zugegriffen oder wie oft und für welche Verweildauer eine Unterseite betrachtet wurde. Eine Web-Analyse wird überwiegend zur Optimierung einer Internetseite und zur Kosten-Nutzen-Analyse von Internetwerbung eingesetzt.
Betreibergesellschaft der Google-Analytics-Komponente ist die Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland.
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche verwendet für die Web-Analyse über Google Analytics den Zusatz "
gat.
anonymizeIp". Mittels dieses Zusatzes wird die IP-Adresse des Internetanschlusses der betroffenen Person von Google gekürzt und anonymisiert, wenn der Zugriff auf unsere Internetseiten aus einem Mitgliedstaat der Europäischen Union oder aus einem anderen Vertragsstaat des Abkommens über den Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum erfolgt.
Der Zweck der Google-Analytics-Komponente ist die Analyse der Besucherströme auf unserer Internetseite. Google nutzt die gewonnenen Daten und Informationen unter anderem dazu, die Nutzung unserer Internetseite auszuwerten, um für uns Online-Reports, welche die Aktivitäten auf unseren Internetseiten aufzeigen, zusammenzustellen, und um weitere mit der Nutzung unserer Internetseite in Verbindung stehende Dienstleistungen zu erbringen.
Google Analytics setzt ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. Mit Setzung des Cookies wird Google eine Analyse der Benutzung unserer Internetseite ermöglicht. Durch jeden Aufruf einer der Einzelseiten dieser Internetseite, die durch den für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen betrieben wird und auf welcher eine Google-Analytics-Komponente integriert wurde, wird der Internetbrowser auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person automatisch durch die jeweilige Google-Analytics-Komponente veranlasst, Daten zum Zwecke der Online-Analyse an Google zu übermitteln. Im Rahmen dieses technischen Verfahrens erhält Google Kenntnis über personenbezogene Daten, wie der IP-Adresse der betroffenen Person, die Google unter anderem dazu dienen, die Herkunft der Besucher und Klicks nachzuvollziehen und in der Folge Provisionsabrechnungen zu ermöglichen.
Mittels des Cookies werden personenbezogene Informationen, beispielsweise die Zugriffszeit, der Ort, von welchem ein Zugriff ausging und die Häufigkeit der Besuche unserer Internetseite durch die betroffene Person, gespeichert. Bei jedem Besuch unserer Internetseiten werden diese personenbezogenen Daten, einschließlich der IP-Adresse des von der betroffenen Person genutzten Internetanschlusses, an Google in den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika übertragen. Diese personenbezogenen Daten werden durch Google in den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika gespeichert. Google gibt diese über das technische Verfahren erhobenen personenbezogenen Daten unter Umständen an Dritte weiter.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass Google ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem kann ein von Google Analytics bereits gesetzter Cookie jederzeit über den Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Ferner besteht für die betroffene Person die Möglichkeit, einer Erfassung der durch Google Analytics erzeugten, auf eine Nutzung dieser Internetseite bezogenen Daten sowie der Verarbeitung dieser Daten durch Google zu widersprechen und eine solche zu verhindern. Hierzu muss die betroffene Person ein Browser-Add-On unter dem Link
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
herunterladen und installieren. Dieses Browser-Add-On teilt Google Analytics über JavaScript mit, dass keine Daten und Informationen zu den Besuchen von Internetseiten an Google Analytics übermittelt werden dürfen. Die Installation des Browser-Add-Ons wird von Google als Widerspruch gewertet. Wird das informationstechnologische System der betroffenen Person zu einem späteren Zeitpunkt gelöscht, formatiert oder neu installiert, muss durch die betroffene Person eine erneute Installation des Browser-Add-Ons erfolgen, um Google Analytics zu deaktivieren. Sofern das Browser-Add-On durch die betroffene Person oder einer anderen Person, die ihrem Machtbereich zuzurechnen ist, deinstalliert oder deaktiviert wird, besteht die Möglichkeit der Neuinstallation oder der erneuten Aktivierung des Browser-Add-Ons.
Weitere Informationen und die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von Google können unter
https://www.google.de/intl/de/policies/privacy/
und unter
http://www.google.com/analytics/terms/de.html
abgerufen werden. Google Analytics wird unter diesem Link
https://www.google.com/intl/de_de/analytics/
genauer erläutert.
13. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Google Remarketing
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Dienste von Google Remarketing integriert. Google Remarketing ist eine Funktion von Google-AdWords, die es einem Unternehmen ermöglicht, bei solchen Internetnutzern Werbung einblenden zu lassen, die sich zuvor auf der Internetseite des Unternehmens aufgehalten haben. Die Integration von Google Remarketing gestattet es einem Unternehmen demnach, nutzerbezogene Werbung zu erstellen und dem Internetnutzer folglich interessenrelevante Werbeanzeigen anzeigen zu lassen.
Betreibergesellschaft der Dienste von Google Remarketing ist die Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland.
Zweck von Google Remarketing ist die Einblendung von interessenrelevanter Werbung. Google Remarketing ermöglicht es uns, Werbeanzeigen über das Google-Werbenetzwerk anzuzeigen oder auf anderen Internetseiten anzeigen zu lassen, welche auf die individuellen Bedürfnisse und Interessen von Internetnutzern abgestimmt sind.
Google Remarketing setzt ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. Mit der Setzung des Cookies wird Google eine Wiedererkennung des Besuchers unserer Internetseite ermöglicht, wenn dieser in der Folge Internetseiten aufruft, die ebenfalls Mitglied des Google-Werbenetzwerks sind. Mit jedem Aufruf einer Internetseite, auf welcher der Dienst von Google Remarketing integriert wurde, identifiziert sich der Internetbrowser der betroffenen Person automatisch bei Google. Im Rahmen dieses technischen Verfahrens erhält Google Kenntnis über personenbezogene Daten, wie der IP-Adresse oder des Surfverhaltens des Nutzers, welche Google unter anderem zur Einblendung interessenrelevanter Werbung verwendet.
Mittels des Cookies werden personenbezogene Informationen, beispielsweise die durch die betroffene Person besuchten Internetseiten, gespeichert. Bei jedem Besuch unserer Internetseiten werden demnach personenbezogene Daten, einschließlich der IP-Adresse des von der betroffenen Person genutzten Internetanschlusses, an Google in den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika übertragen. Diese personenbezogenen Daten werden durch Google in den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika gespeichert. Google gibt diese über das technische Verfahren erhobenen personenbezogenen Daten unter Umständen an Dritte weiter.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass Google ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem kann ein von Google Analytics bereits gesetzter Cookie jederzeit über den Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Ferner besteht für die betroffene Person die Möglichkeit, der interessenbezogenen Werbung durch Google zu widersprechen. Hierzu muss die betroffene Person von jedem der von ihr genutzten Internetbrowser aus den Link www.google.de/settings/ads aufrufen und dort die gewünschten Einstellungen vornehmen.
Weitere Informationen und die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von Google können unter
https://www.google.de/intl/de/policies/privacy/
abgerufen werden.
14. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Google-AdWords
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Google AdWords integriert. Google AdWords ist ein Dienst zur Internetwerbung, der es Werbetreibenden gestattet, sowohl Anzeigen in den Suchmaschinenergebnissen von Google als auch im Google-Werbenetzwerk zu schalten. Google AdWords ermöglicht es einem Werbetreibenden, vorab bestimmte Schlüsselwörter festzulegen, mittels derer eine Anzeige in den Suchmaschinenergebnissen von Google ausschließlich dann angezeigt wird, wenn der Nutzer mit der Suchmaschine ein schlüsselwortrelevantes Suchergebnis abruft. Im Google-Werbenetzwerk werden die Anzeigen mittels eines automatischen Algorithmus und unter Beachtung der zuvor festgelegten Schlüsselwörter auf themenrelevanten Internetseiten verteilt.
Betreibergesellschaft der Dienste von Google AdWords ist die Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland.
Der Zweck von Google AdWords ist die Bewerbung unserer Internetseite durch die Einblendung von interessenrelevanter Werbung auf den Internetseiten von Drittunternehmen und in den Suchmaschinenergebnissen der Suchmaschine Google und eine Einblendung von Fremdwerbung auf unserer Internetseite.
Gelangt eine betroffene Person über eine Google-Anzeige auf unsere Internetseite, wird auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person durch Google ein sogenannter Conversion-Cookie abgelegt. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. Ein Conversion-Cookie verliert nach dreißig Tagen seine Gültigkeit und dient nicht zur Identifikation der betroffenen Person. Über den Conversion-Cookie wird, sofern das Cookie noch nicht abgelaufen ist, nachvollzogen, ob bestimmte Unterseiten, beispielsweise der Warenkorb von einem Online-Shop-System, auf unserer Internetseite aufgerufen wurden. Durch den Conversion-Cookie können sowohl wir als auch Google nachvollziehen, ob eine betroffene Person, die über eine AdWords-Anzeige auf unsere Internetseite gelangt ist, einen Umsatz generierte, also einen Warenkauf vollzogen oder abgebrochen hat.
Die durch die Nutzung des Conversion-Cookies erhobenen Daten und Informationen werden von Google verwendet, um Besuchsstatistiken für unsere Internetseite zu erstellen. Diese Besuchsstatistiken werden durch uns wiederum genutzt, um die Gesamtanzahl der Nutzer zu ermitteln, welche über AdWords-Anzeigen an uns vermittelt wurden, also um den Erfolg oder Misserfolg der jeweiligen AdWords-Anzeige zu ermitteln und um unsere AdWords-Anzeigen für die Zukunft zu optimieren. Weder unser Unternehmen noch andere Werbekunden von Google-AdWords erhalten Informationen von Google, mittels derer die betroffene Person identifiziert werden könnte.
Mittels des Conversion-Cookies werden personenbezogene Informationen, beispielsweise die durch die betroffene Person besuchten Internetseiten, gespeichert. Bei jedem Besuch unserer Internetseiten werden demnach personenbezogene Daten, einschließlich der IP-Adresse des von der betroffenen Person genutzten Internetanschlusses, an Google in den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika übertragen. Diese personenbezogenen Daten werden durch Google in den Vereinigten Staaten von Amerika gespeichert. Google gibt diese über das technische Verfahren erhobenen personenbezogenen Daten unter Umständen an Dritte weiter.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass Google einen Conversion-Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem kann ein von Google AdWords bereits gesetzter Cookie jederzeit über den Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Ferner besteht für die betroffene Person die Möglichkeit, der interessenbezogenen Werbung durch Google zu widersprechen. Hierzu muss die betroffene Person von jedem der von ihr genutzten Internetbrowser aus den Link www.google.de/settings/ads aufrufen und dort die gewünschten Einstellungen vornehmen.
Weitere Informationen und die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von Google können unter
https://www.google.de/intl/de/policies/privacy/
abgerufen werden.
15. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Instagram
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Komponenten des Dienstes Instagram integriert. Instagram ist ein Dienst, der als audiovisuelle Plattform zu qualifizieren ist und den Nutzern das Teilen von Fotos und Videos und zudem eine Weiterverbreitung solcher Daten in anderen sozialen Netzwerken ermöglicht.
Betreibergesellschaft der Dienste von Instagram ist die Facebook Ireland Ltd., 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2 Ireland.
Durch jeden Aufruf einer der Einzelseiten dieser Internetseite, die durch den für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen betrieben wird und auf welcher eine Instagram-Komponente (Insta-Button) integriert wurde, wird der Internetbrowser auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person automatisch durch die jeweilige Instagram-Komponente veranlasst, eine Darstellung der entsprechenden Komponente von Instagram herunterzuladen. Im Rahmen dieses technischen Verfahrens erhält Instagram Kenntnis darüber, welche konkrete Unterseite unserer Internetseite durch die betroffene Person besucht wird.
Sofern die betroffene Person gleichzeitig bei Instagram eingeloggt ist, erkennt Instagram mit jedem Aufruf unserer Internetseite durch die betroffene Person und während der gesamten Dauer des jeweiligen Aufenthaltes auf unserer Internetseite, welche konkrete Unterseite die betroffene Person besucht. Diese Informationen werden durch die Instagram-Komponente gesammelt und durch Instagram dem jeweiligen Instagram-Account der betroffenen Person zugeordnet. Betätigt die betroffene Person einen der auf unserer Internetseite integrierten Instagram-Buttons, werden die damit übertragenen Daten und Informationen dem persönlichen Instagram-Benutzerkonto der betroffenen Person zugeordnet und von Instagram gespeichert und verarbeitet.
Instagram erhält über die Instagram-Komponente immer dann eine Information darüber, dass die betroffene Person unsere Internetseite besucht hat, wenn die betroffene Person zum Zeitpunkt des Aufrufs unserer Internetseite gleichzeitig bei Instagram eingeloggt ist; dies findet unabhängig davon statt, ob die betroffene Person die Instagram-Komponente anklickt oder nicht. Ist eine derartige Übermittlung dieser Informationen an Instagram von der betroffenen Person nicht gewollt, kann diese die Übermittlung dadurch verhindern, dass sie sich vor einem Aufruf unserer Internetseite aus ihrem Instagram-Account ausloggt.
Weitere Informationen und die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von Instagram können unter
https://help.instagram.com/155833707900388
und
https://www.instagram.com/about/legal/privacy/
abgerufen werden.
16. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Pinterest
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Komponenten der Pinterest Inc. integriert. Pinterest ist ein sogenanntes soziales Netzwerk. Ein soziales Netzwerk ist ein im Internet betriebener sozialer Treffpunkt, eine Online-Gemeinschaft, die es den Nutzern in der Regel ermöglicht, untereinander zu kommunizieren und im virtuellen Raum zu interagieren. Ein soziales Netzwerk kann als Plattform zum Austausch von Meinungen und Erfahrungen dienen oder ermöglicht es der Internetgemeinschaft, persönliche oder unternehmensbezogene Informationen bereitzustellen. Pinterest ermöglicht den Nutzern des sozialen Netzwerkes unter anderem, Bilderkollektionen und Einzelbilder sowie Beschreibungen an virtuellen Pinnwänden zu veröffentlichen (sogenanntes pinnen), welche dann wiederum von anderen Nutzern geteilt (sogenanntes repinnen) oder kommentiert werden können.
Betreibergesellschaft von Pinterest ist die Pinterest Europe Ltd., Palmerston House, 2nd Floor, Fenian Street, Dublin 2,Ireland.
Durch jeden Aufruf einer der Einzelseiten dieser Internetseite, die durch den für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen betrieben wird und auf welcher eine Pinterest-Komponente (Pinterest-Plug-In) integriert wurde, wird der Internetbrowser auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person automatisch durch die jeweilige Pinterest-Komponente veranlasst, eine Darstellung der entsprechenden Pinterest-Komponente von Pinterest herunterzuladen. Mehr Informationen zu Pinterest sind unter
https://pinterest.com/
abrufbar. Im Rahmen dieses technischen Verfahrens erhält Pinterest Kenntnis darüber, welche konkrete Unterseite unserer Internetseite durch die betroffene Person besucht wird.
Sofern die betroffene Person gleichzeitig bei Pinterest eingeloggt ist, erkennt Pinterest mit jedem Aufruf unserer Internetseite durch die betroffene Person und während der gesamten Dauer des jeweiligen Aufenthaltes auf unserer Internetseite, welche konkrete Unterseite unserer Internetseite die betroffene Person besucht. Diese Informationen werden durch die Pinterest-Komponente gesammelt und durch Pinterest dem jeweiligen Pinterest-Account der betroffenen Person zugeordnet. Betätigt die betroffene Person einen auf unserer Internetseite integrierten Pinterest-Button, ordnet Pinterest diese Information dem persönlichen Pinterest-Benutzerkonto der betroffenen Person zu und speichert diese personenbezogenen Daten.
Pinterest erhält über die Pinterest-Komponente immer dann eine Information darüber, dass die betroffene Person unsere Internetseite besucht hat, wenn die betroffene Person zum Zeitpunkt des Aufrufs unserer Internetseite gleichzeitig bei Pinterest eingeloggt ist; dies findet unabhängig davon statt, ob die betroffene Person die Pinterest-Komponente anklickt oder nicht. Ist eine derartige Übermittlung dieser Informationen an Pinterest von der betroffenen Person nicht gewollt, kann diese die Übermittlung dadurch verhindern, dass sie sich vor einem Aufruf unserer Internetseite aus ihrem Pinterest-Account ausloggt.
Die von Pinterest veröffentlichte Datenschutzrichtlinie, die unter
https://about.pinterest.com/privacy-policy
abrufbar ist, gibt Aufschluss über die Erhebung, Verarbeitung und Nutzung personenbezogener Daten durch Pinterest.
17. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Twitter
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Komponenten von Twitter integriert. Twitter ist ein multilingualer öffentlich zugänglicher Mikroblogging-Dienst, auf welchem die Nutzer sogenannte Tweets, also Kurznachrichten, die auf 280 Zeichen begrenzt sind, veröffentlichen und verbreiten können. Diese Kurznachrichten sind für jedermann, also auch für nicht bei Twitter angemeldete Personen abrufbar. Die Tweets werden aber auch den sogenannten Followern des jeweiligen Nutzers angezeigt. Follower sind andere Twitter-Nutzer, die den Tweets eines Nutzers folgen. Ferner ermöglicht Twitter über Hashtags, Verlinkungen oder Retweets die Ansprache eines breiten Publikums.
Betreibergesellschaft von Twitter International Company, One Cumberland Place, Fenian Street Dublin 2, D02 AX07, Ireland.
Durch jeden Aufruf einer der Einzelseiten dieser Internetseite, die durch den für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen betrieben wird und auf welcher eine Twitter-Komponente (Twitter-Button) integriert wurde, wird der Internetbrowser auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person automatisch durch die jeweilige Twitter-Komponente veranlasst, eine Darstellung der entsprechenden Twitter-Komponente von Twitter herunterzuladen. Weitere Informationen zu den Twitter-Buttons sind unter
https://about.twitter.com/de/resources/buttons
abrufbar. Im Rahmen dieses technischen Verfahrens erhält Twitter Kenntnis darüber, welche konkrete Unterseite unserer Internetseite durch die betroffene Person besucht wird. Zweck der Integration der Twitter-Komponente ist es, unseren Nutzern eine Weiterverbreitung der Inhalte diese Internetseite zu ermöglichen, diese Internetseite in der digitalen Welt bekannt zu machen und unsere Besucherzahlen zu erhöhen.
Sofern die betroffene Person gleichzeitig bei Twitter eingeloggt ist, erkennt Twitter mit jedem Aufruf unserer Internetseite durch die betroffene Person und während der gesamten Dauer des jeweiligen Aufenthaltes auf unserer Internetseite, welche konkrete Unterseite unserer Internetseite die betroffene Person besucht. Diese Informationen werden durch die Twitter-Komponente gesammelt und durch Twitter dem jeweiligen Twitter-Account der betroffenen Person zugeordnet. Betätigt die betroffene Person einen der auf unserer Internetseite integrierten Twitter-Buttons, werden die damit übertragenen Daten und Informationen dem persönlichen Twitter-Benutzerkonto der betroffenen Person zugeordnet und von Twitter gespeichert und verarbeitet.
Twitter erhält über die Twitter-Komponente immer dann eine Information darüber, dass die betroffene Person unsere Internetseite besucht hat, wenn die betroffene Person zum Zeitpunkt des Aufrufs unserer Internetseite gleichzeitig bei Twitter eingeloggt ist; dies findet unabhängig davon statt, ob die betroffene Person die Twitter-Komponente anklickt oder nicht. Ist eine derartige Übermittlung dieser Informationen an Twitter von der betroffenen Person nicht gewollt, kann diese die Übermittlung dadurch verhindern, dass sie sich vor einem Aufruf unserer Internetseite aus ihrem Twitter-Account ausloggt.
Die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von Twitter sind unter
https://twitter.com/privacy?lang=de
abrufbar.
18. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von YouTube
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Komponenten von YouTube integriert. YouTube ist ein Internet-Videoportal, dass Video-Publishern das kostenlose Einstellen von Videoclips und anderen Nutzern die ebenfalls kostenfreie Betrachtung, Bewertung und Kommentierung dieser ermöglicht. YouTube gestattet die Publikation aller Arten von Videos, weshalb sowohl komplette Film- und Fernsehsendungen, aber auch Musikvideos, Trailer oder von Nutzern selbst angefertigte Videos über das Internetportal abrufbar sind.
Betreibergesellschaft von YouTube ist die Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland.
Durch jeden Aufruf einer der Einzelseiten dieser Internetseite, die durch den für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen betrieben wird und auf welcher eine YouTube-Komponente (YouTube-Video) integriert wurde, wird der Internetbrowser auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person automatisch durch die jeweilige YouTube-Komponente veranlasst, eine Darstellung der entsprechenden YouTube-Komponente von YouTube herunterzuladen. Weitere Informationen zu YouTube können unter
https://www.youtube.com/yt/about/de/
abgerufen werden. Im Rahmen dieses technischen Verfahrens erhalten YouTube und Google Kenntnis darüber, welche konkrete Unterseite unserer Internetseite durch die betroffene Person besucht wird.
Sofern die betroffene Person gleichzeitig bei YouTube eingeloggt ist, erkennt YouTube mit dem Aufruf einer Unterseite, die ein YouTube-Video enthält, welche konkrete Unterseite unserer Internetseite die betroffene Person besucht. Diese Informationen werden durch YouTube und Google gesammelt und dem jeweiligen YouTube-Account der betroffenen Person zugeordnet.
YouTube und Google erhalten über die YouTube-Komponente immer dann eine Information darüber, dass die betroffene Person unsere Internetseite besucht hat, wenn die betroffene Person zum Zeitpunkt des Aufrufs unserer Internetseite gleichzeitig bei YouTube eingeloggt ist; dies findet unabhängig davon statt, ob die betroffene Person ein YouTube-Video anklickt oder nicht. Ist eine derartige Übermittlung dieser Informationen an YouTube und Google von der betroffenen Person nicht gewollt, kann diese die Übermittlung dadurch verhindern, dass sie sich vor einem Aufruf unserer Internetseite aus ihrem YouTube-Account ausloggt.
Die von YouTube veröffentlichten Datenschutzbestimmungen, die unter
https://www.google.de/intl/de/policies/privacy/
abrufbar sind, geben Aufschluss über die Erhebung, Verarbeitung und Nutzung personenbezogener Daten durch YouTube und Google.
19. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von DoubleClick
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Komponenten von DoubleClick by Google integriert. DoubleClick ist eine Marke von Google, unter welcher vorwiegend spezielle Online-Marketing-Lösungen an Werbeagenturen und Verlage vermarktet werden.
Betreibergesellschaft von Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland.
DoubleClick by Google überträgt sowohl mit jeder Impression als auch mit Klicks oder anderen Aktivitäten Daten auf den DoubleClick-Server. Jede dieser Datenübertragungen löst eine Cookie-Anfrage an den Browser der betroffenen Person aus. Akzeptiert der Browser diese Anfrage, setzt DoubleClick ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. Zweck des Cookies ist die Optimierung und Einblendung von Werbung. Das Cookie wird unter anderem dazu verwendet, nutzerrelevante Werbung zu schalten und anzuzeigen sowie um Berichte zu Werbekampagnen zu erstellen oder diese zu verbessern. Ferner dient das Cookie dazu, Mehrfacheinblendungen derselben Werbung zu vermeiden.
DoubleClick verwendet eine Cookie-ID, die zur Abwicklung des technischen Verfahrens erforderlich ist. Die Cookie-ID wird beispielsweise benötigt, um eine Werbeanzeige in einem Browser anzuzeigen. DoubleClick kann über die Cookie-ID zudem erfassen, welche Werbeanzeigen bereits in einem Browser eingeblendet wurden, um Doppelschaltungen zu vermeiden. Ferner ist es DoubleClick durch die Cookie-ID möglich, Conversions zu erfassen. Conversions werden beispielsweise dann erfasst, wenn einem Nutzer zuvor eine DoubleClick-Werbeanzeige eingeblendet wurde und dieser in der Folge mit dem gleichen Internetbrowser einen Kauf auf der Internetseite des Werbetreibenden vollzieht.
Ein Cookie von DoubleClick enthält keine personenbezogenen Daten. Ein DoubleClick-Cookie kann aber zusätzliche Kampagnen-Kennungen enthalten. Eine Kampagnen-Kennung dient einer Identifizierung der Kampagnen, mit denen der Nutzer bereits in Kontakt war.
Durch jeden Aufruf einer der Einzelseiten dieser Internetseite, die durch den für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen betrieben wird und auf welcher eine DoubleClick-Komponente integriert wurde, wird der Internetbrowser auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person automatisch durch die jeweilige DoubleClick-Komponente veranlasst, Daten zum Zwecke der Online-Werbung und der Abrechnung von Provisionen an Google zu übermitteln. Im Rahmen dieses technischen Verfahrens erhält Google Kenntnis über Daten, die Google auch dazu dienen, Provisionsabrechnungen zu erstellen. Google kann unter anderem nachvollziehen, dass die betroffene Person bestimmte Links auf unserer Internetseite angeklickt hat.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass Google ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem können von Google bereits gesetzte Cookies jederzeit über einen Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Weitere Informationen und die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von DoubleClick by Google können unter
https://www.google.com/intl/de/policies/
abgerufen werden.
20. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Awin
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Komponenten von Awin integriert. Awin ist ein deutsches Affiliate-Netzwerk, welches Affiliate-Marketing anbietet. Affiliate-Marketing ist eine Internetgestützte Vertriebsform, die es kommerziellen Betreibern von Internetseiten, den sogenannten Merchants oder Advertisern, ermöglicht, Werbung, die meist über Klick- oder Sale-Provisionen vergütet wird, auf Internetseiten Dritter, also bei Vertriebspartnern, die auch Affiliates oder Publisher genannt werden, einzublenden. Der Merchant stellt über das Affiliate-Netzwerk ein Werbemittel, also einen Werbebanner oder andere geeignete Mittel der Internetwerbung zur Verfügung, welche in der Folge von einem Affiliate auf eigenen Internetseiten eingebunden oder über sonstige Kanäle, wie etwa das Keyword-Advertising oder E-Mail-Marketing, beworben werden.
Betreibergesellschaft von Awin ist die Awin AG, Eichhornstraße 3, 10785 Berlin, Germany.
Awin setzt ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. Der Tracking-Cookie von Awin speichert keinerlei personenbezogene Daten. Gespeichert werden lediglich die Identifikationsnummer des Affiliate, also des den potentiellen Kunden vermittelnden Partners, sowie die Ordnungsnummer des Besuchers einer Internetseite und des angeklickten Werbemittels. Zweck der Speicherung dieser Daten ist die Abwicklung von Provisionszahlungen zwischen einem Merchant und dem Affiliate, welche über das Affiliate-Netzwerk, also Awin, abgewickelt werden.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass Awin ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem können von Awin bereits gesetzte Cookies jederzeit über einen Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von Awin können unter
http://www.Awin.com/de/ueber-Awin/datenschutz/
abgerufen werden.
21. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Adcell
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Komponenten von Adcell integriert. Adcell ist ein deutsches Affiliate-Netzwerk, welches Affiliate-Marketing anbietet. Affiliate-Marketing ist eine Internetgestützte Vertriebsform, die es kommerziellen Betreibern von Internetseiten, den sogenannten Merchants oder Advertisern, ermöglicht, Werbung, die meist über Klick- oder Sale-Provisionen vergütet wird, auf Internetseiten Dritter, also bei Vertriebspartnern, die auch Affiliates oder Publisher genannt werden, einzublenden. Der Merchant stellt über das Affiliate-Netzwerk ein Werbemittel, also einen Werbebanner oder andere geeignete Mittel der Internetwerbung, zur Verfügung, welche in der Folge von einem Affiliate auf eigenen Internetseiten eingebunden oder über sonstige Kanäle, wie etwa das Keyword-Advertising oder E-Mail-Marketing, beworben werden.
Betreibergesellschaft von Adcell ist die Firstlead GmbH, Rosenfelder St. 15-16, 10315 Berlin, Germany.
Adcell setzt ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. Der Tracking-Cookie von Adcell speichert keinerlei personenbezogene Daten. Gespeichert werden lediglich die Identifikationsnummer des Affiliate, also des den potentiellen Kunden vermittelnden Partners, sowie die Ordnungsnummer des Besuchers einer Internetseite und des angeklickten Werbemittels. Zweck der Speicherung dieser Daten ist die Abwicklung von Provisionszahlungen zwischen einem Merchant und dem Affiliate, welche über das Affiliate-Netzwerk, also Adcell, abgewickelt werden.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass Adcell ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem können von Adcell bereits gesetzte Cookies jederzeit über einen Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von Adcell können unter
https://www.adcell.de/agb
abgerufen werden.
22. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Belboon
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Komponenten von Belboon integriert. Belboon ist ein deutsches Affiliate-Netzwerk, welches Affiliate-Marketing anbietet. Affiliate-Marketing ist eine Internetgestützte Vertriebsform, die es kommerziellen Betreibern von Internetseiten, den sogenannten Merchants oder Advertisern, ermöglicht, Werbung, die meist über Klick- oder Sale-Provisionen vergütet wird, auf Internetseiten Dritter, also bei Vertriebspartnern, die auch Affiliates oder Publisher genannt werden, einzublenden. Der Merchant stellt über das Affiliate-Netzwerk ein Werbemittel, also einen Werbebanner oder andere geeignete Mittel der Internetwerbung zur Verfügung, welche in der Folge von einem Affiliate auf eigenen Internetseiten eingebunden oder über sonstige Kanäle, wie etwa das Keyword-Advertising oder E-Mail-Marketing, beworben werden.
Betreibergesellschaft von Adcell ist die belboon GmbH, Weinmeisterstr. 12-14, 10178 Berlin, Germany.
Belboon setzt ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. Der Tracking-Cookie von Belboon speichert keinerlei personenbezogene Daten. Gespeichert werden lediglich die Identifikationsnummer des Affiliate, also des den potentiellen Kunden vermittelnden Partners, sowie die Ordnungsnummer des Besuchers einer Internetseite und des angeklickten Werbemittels. Zweck der Speicherung dieser Daten ist die Abwicklung von Provisionszahlungen zwischen einem Merchant und dem Affiliate, welche über das Affiliate-Netzwerk, also Belboon, abgewickelt werden.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass Belboon ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem können von Belboon bereits gesetzte Cookies jederzeit über einen Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von Belboon können unter
https://www.belboon.com/de/ueber-uns/datenschutz/
abgerufen werden.
23. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von TradeTracker
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Komponenten von TradeTracker integriert. TradeTracker ist ein Affiliate-Netzwerk, welches Affiliate-Marketing anbietet. Affiliate-Marketing ist eine Internetgestützte Vertriebsform, die es kommerziellen Betreibern von Internetseiten, den sogenannten. Merchants oder Advertisern, ermöglicht, Werbung, die meist über Klick- oder Sale-Provisionen vergütet wird, auf Internetseiten Dritter, also bei Vertriebspartnern, die auch Affiliates oder Publisher genannt werden, einzublenden. Der Merchant stellt über das Affiliate-Netzwerk ein Werbemittel, also einen Werbebanner oder andere geeignete Mittel der Internetwerbung, zur Verfügung, welche in der Folge von einem Affiliate auf eigenen Internetseiten eingebunden oder über sonstige Kanäle, wie etwa das Keyword-Advertising oder E-Mail-Marketing, beworben werden.
Betreibergesellschaft von TradeTracker ist die TradeTracker Deutschland GmbH, Eiffestraße 426, 20537 Hamburg, Germany.
TradeTracker setzt ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. Der Tracking-Cookie von TradeTracker speichert keinerlei personenbezogene Daten. Gespeichert werden lediglich die Identifikationsnummer des Affiliate, also des den potentiellen Kunden vermittelnden Partners, sowie die Ordnungsnummer des Besuchers einer Internetseite und des angeklickten Werbemittels. Zweck der Speicherung dieser Daten ist die Abwicklung von Provisionszahlungen zwischen einem Merchant und dem Affiliate, welche über das Affiliate-Netzwerk, also TradeTracker, abgewickelt werden.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass TradeTracker ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem können von TradeTracker bereits gesetzte Cookies jederzeit über einen Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von TradeTracker können unter
https://tradetracker.com/de/privacy-policy/
abgerufen werden.
24. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von adgoal
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Komponenten von adgoal integriert. Adgoal ist ein deutsches Affiliate-Netzwerk, welches Affiliate-Marketing anbietet. Affiliate-Marketing ist eine Internetgestützte Vertriebsform, die es kommerziellen Betreibern von Internetseiten, den sogenannten Merchants oder Advertisern, ermöglicht, Werbung, die meist über Klick- oder Sale-Provisionen vergütet wird, auf Internetseiten Dritter, also bei Vertriebspartnern, die auch Affiliates oder Publisher genannt werden, einzublenden. Der Merchant stellt über das Affiliate-Netzwerk ein Werbemittel, also einen Werbebanner oder andere geeignete Mittel der Internetwerbung, zur Verfügung, welche in der Folge von einem Affiliate auf eigenen Internetseiten eingebunden oder über sonstige Kanäle, wie etwa das Keyword-Advertising oder E-Mail-Marketing, beworben werden.
Betreibergesellschaft von adgoal ist die adgoal GmbH, Schellengasse 2, 74072 Heilbronn, Germany.
Adgoal setzt ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. Das Tracking-Cookie von adgoal speichert keinerlei personenbezogene Daten. Gespeichert werden lediglich die Identifikationsnummer des Affiliate, also des den potentiellen Kunden vermittelnden Partners sowie die Ordnungsnummer des Besuchers einer Internetseite und des angeklickten Werbemittels. Zweck der Speicherung dieser Daten ist die Abwicklung von Provisionszahlungen zwischen einem Merchant und dem Affiliate, welche über das Affiliate-Netzwerk, also adgoal, abgewickelt werden.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass adgoal ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem können von adgoal bereits gesetzte Cookies jederzeit über einen Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von adgoal können unter
https://www.adgoal.de/de/privacy.html
abgerufen werden.
25. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von YieldKit
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Komponenten von YieldKit integriert. YieldKit ist ein deutsches Affiliate-Netzwerk, welches Affiliate-Marketing anbietet. Affiliate-Marketing ist eine Internetgestützte Vertriebsform, die es kommerziellen Betreibern von Internetseiten, den sogenannten Merchants oder Advertisern, ermöglicht, Werbung, die meist über Klick- oder Sale-Provisionen vergütet wird, auf Internetseiten Dritter, also bei Vertriebspartnern, die auch Affiliates oder Publisher genannt werden, einzublenden. Der Merchant stellt über das Affiliate-Netzwerk ein Werbemittel, also einen Werbebanner oder andere geeignete Mittel der Internetwerbung, zur Verfügung, welche in der Folge von einem Affiliate auf eigenen Internetseiten eingebunden oder über sonstige Kanäle, wie etwa das Keyword-Advertising oder E-Mail-Marketing, beworben werden.
Betreibergesellschaft von YieldKit ist die YieldKit GmbH, Jarrestraße 44b, 22303 Hamburg, Germany.
YieldKit setzt ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. Das Tracking-Cookie von YieldKit speichert keinerlei personenbezogene Daten. Gespeichert werden lediglich die Identifikationsnummer des Affiliate, also des den potentiellen Kunden vermittelnden Partners, sowie die Ordnungsnummer des Besuchers einer Internetseite und des angeklickten Werbemittels. Zweck der Speicherung dieser Daten ist die Abwicklung von Provisionszahlungen zwischen einem Merchant und dem Affiliate, welche über das Affiliate-Netzwerk, also YieldKit, abgewickelt werden.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass YieldKit ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem können von YieldKit bereits gesetzte Cookies jederzeit über einen Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von YieldKit können unter
http://yieldkit.com/legal-notes/privacy-policy/
abgerufen werden.
26. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Tradedoubler
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Komponenten von Tradedoubler integriert. Tradedoubler ist ein deutsches Affiliate-Netzwerk, welches Affiliate-Marketing anbietet. Affiliate-Marketing ist eine Internetgestützte Vertriebsform, die es kommerziellen Betreibern von Internetseiten, den sogenannten Merchants oder Advertisern, ermöglicht, Werbung, die meist über Klick- oder Sale-Provisionen vergütet wird, auf Internetseiten Dritter, also bei Vertriebspartnern, die auch Affiliates oder Publisher genannt werden, einzublenden. Der Merchant stellt über das Affiliate-Netzwerk ein Werbemittel, also einen Werbebanner oder andere geeignete Mittel der Internetwerbung, zur Verfügung, welche in der Folge von einem Affiliate auf eigenen Internetseiten eingebunden oder über sonstige Kanäle, wie etwa das Keyword-Advertising oder E-Mail-Marketing, beworben werden.
Betreibergesellschaft von Tradedoubler ist die Tradedoubler GmbH, Herzog-Wilhelm-Straße 26, 80331 München, Germany.
Tradedoubler setzt ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. Der Tracking-Cookie von Tradedoubler speichert keinerlei personenbezogene Daten. Gespeichert werden lediglich die Identifikationsnummer des Affiliate, also des den potentiellen Kunden vermittelnden Partners, sowie die Ordnungsnummer des Besuchers einer Internetseite und des angeklickten Werbemittels. Zweck der Speicherung dieser Daten ist die Abwicklung von Provisionszahlungen zwischen einem Merchant und dem Affiliate, welche über das Affiliate-Netzwerk, also Tradedoubler, abgewickelt werden.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass Tradedoubler ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem können von Tradedoubler bereits gesetzte Cookies jederzeit über einen Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von Tradedoubler können unter
http://www.tradedoubler.com/de/datenschutzrichtlinie/
abgerufen werden.
27. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Oracle Eloqua / Oracle Marketing Cloud
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Komponenten von Oracle Eloqua / Oracle Marketing Cloud integriert (nachfolgend „Eloqua“ genannt). Eloqua gleicht relevante Internetseiteninhalte an Daten von Interessenten, Kunden und deren Profile an, um den Internetseitenbetreibern zu ermöglichen, Interessenten und Kunden effektiver und gezielter anzusprechen. Zweck von Eloqua ist es, die Konversionrate von Interessenten in Kunden zu erhöhen und damit den Umsatz eines Internetseitenbetreibers zu erhöhen.
Betreibergesellschaft von Eloqua ist die Oracle Corporation, 10 Van de Graaff Drive, Burlington, MA 01803, USA.
Eloqua setzt ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. Eloqua wird im Auftrag des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen die über unsere Internetseite gewonnenen Daten und Informationen dazu nutzen, das Nutzerverhalten der betroffenen Person, die unsere Internetseite genutzt hat, auszuwerten. Ferner wird Eloqua die Daten nutzen, um in unserem Auftrag Reports über Nutzeraktivitäten zu erstellen, sowie weitere Dienstleistungen für unser Unternehmen zu erbringen, die im Zusammenhang mit der Nutzung unserer Internetseite stehen.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass Oracle ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem können von Oracle bereits gesetzte Cookies jederzeit über den Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Ferner besteht für die betroffene Person die Möglichkeit, der Erfassung der durch das Eloqua-Cookie erzeugten, auf eine Nutzung dieser Internetseite bezogenen Daten sowie der Verarbeitung dieser Daten durch Oracle zu widersprechen und eine solche zu verhindern. Hierzu muss die betroffene Person den Click-Here-Button unter
https://www.oracle.com/marketingcloud/opt-status.html
drücken, der einen Opt-Out-Cookie setzt. Der mit dem Widerspruch gesetzte Opt-Out-Cookie wird auf dem von der betroffenen Person genutzten informationstechnologischen System abgelegt. Werden die Cookies auf dem System der betroffenen Person nach einem Widerspruch gelöscht, muss die betroffene Person den Link erneut aufrufen und einen neuen Opt-Out-Cookie setzen.
Mit der Setzung des Opt-Out-Cookies besteht jedoch die Möglichkeit, dass die Internetseiten des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen für die betroffene Person nicht mehr vollumfänglich nutzbar sind.
Die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von Oracle können unter
https://www.oracle.com/legal/privacy/index.html
abgerufen werden.
28. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von Amobee
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Komponenten von Amobee integriert. Amobee ist eine technologische Werbeagentur, die sich auf die Auslieferung von Werbung auf mobile Endgeräte spezialisiert hat.
Betreibergesellschaft von Amobee ist die Amobee Inc., 950 Tower Lane, Suite 2000, Foster City, CA 94404, USA.
Zweck von Amobee ist eine Auslieferung von Werbung. Amobee setzt ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. Durch jeden Aufruf einer der Einzelseiten dieser Internetseite, die durch den für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen betrieben wird und auf welcher eine Amobee-Komponente integriert wurde, wird der Internetbrowser auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person automatisch durch die jeweilige Amobee-Komponente veranlasst, Daten an Amobee zu übermitteln. Im Rahmen dieses technischen Verfahrens erhält Amobee Kenntnis über Daten, die in der Folge zur Erstellung von Nutzungsprofilen verwendet werden. Die so gewonnenen Nutzungsprofile dienen Werbeaktivitäten.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass Amobee ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem können von Amobee bereits gesetzte Cookies jederzeit über einen Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Weiter besteht die Möglichkeit, einer Erfassung der durch das Amobee-Cookie erzeugten, auf eine Nutzung dieser Internetseite bezogenen Daten sowie der Verarbeitung dieser Daten durch Amobee zu widersprechen und eine solche zu verhindern. Hierzu muss die betroffene Person den Click-Here-To-Opt-Out-Button unter
http://amobee.com/privacy/technology/
drücken, durch welchen ein Opt-Out-Cookie gesetzt wird. Der mit dem Widerspruch gesetzte Opt-Out-Cookie wird auf dem von der betroffenen Person genutzten informationstechnologischen System abgelegt. Werden die Cookies auf dem System der betroffenen Person nach einem Widerspruch gelöscht, muss die betroffene Person den Link erneut aufrufen und einen neuen Opt-Out-Cookie setzen.
Mit der Setzung des Opt-Out-Cookies besteht jedoch die Möglichkeit, dass die Internetseiten des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen für die betroffene Person nicht mehr vollumfänglich nutzbar sind.
Die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von Amobee können unter
http://amobee.com/privacy/
abgerufen werden.
29. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von ADITION
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Komponenten von ADITION integriert. ADITION ist ein Anbieter für datenbasiertes digitales Marketing, der eine Advertising-Plattform bereitstellt, die sich an Werbetreibende und Online-Marketingagenturen richtet.
Betreibergesellschaft von ADITION ist die ADITION technologies AG, Oststraße 55, 40211 Düsseldorf, Germany.
Zweck von ADITION ist die Einblendung von digitalen Werbemitteln. ADITION setzt ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person. Was Cookies sind, wurde oben bereits erläutert. ADITION speichert in dem Cookie keine personenbezogenen Daten. Sämtliche in dem Cookie gespeicherten Informationen sind technischer Art und ermöglichen es unter anderem nachzuvollziehen, wie häufig bestimmte Werbemittel angezeigt werden.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass ADITION ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem können von ADITION bereits gesetzte Cookies jederzeit über einen Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Weiter besteht die Möglichkeit, einer Erfassung der durch den ADITION-Cookie erzeugten, auf eine Nutzung dieser Internetseite bezogenen Daten sowie der Verarbeitung dieser Daten durch ADITION zu widersprechen und eine solche zu verhindern. Hierzu muss die betroffene Person einen Link unter
https://www.adition.com/kontakt/datenschutz/
klicken, durch welchen ein Opt-Out-Cookie gesetzt wird. Der mit dem Widerspruch gesetzte Opt-Out-Cookie, wird auf dem von der betroffenen Person genutzten informationstechnologischen System abgelegt. Werden die Cookies auf dem System der betroffenen Person nach einem Widerspruch gelöscht, muss die betroffene Person den Link erneut aufrufen und einen neuen Opt-Out-Cookie setzen.
Mit der Setzung des Opt-Out-Cookies besteht jedoch die Möglichkeit, dass die Internetseiten des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen für die betroffene Person nicht mehr vollumfänglich nutzbar sind.
Die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von ADITION können unter
https://www.adition.com/kontakt/datenschutz/
abgerufen werden.
30. Datenschutzbestimmungen zu Einsatz und Verwendung von AdJug
Der für die Verarbeitung Verantwortliche hat auf dieser Internetseite Komponenten von AdJug integriert. AdJug ist eine Advertising-Exchange-Plattform, welche Online-Werbeplätze (Banner-Werbung) vermittelt.
Betreibergesellschaft von AdJug ist die AdJug Ltd. 5th Floor Glen House, 200-208 Tottenham Court Road, London, W1T7PL, United Kingdom.
AdJug setzt ein Cookie. Ferner wird durch jeden Aufruf einer der Einzelseiten dieser Internetseite, die durch den für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen betrieben wird und auf welcher eine AdJug-Komponente integriert wurde, der Internetbrowser auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person automatisch durch die jeweilige AdJug-Komponente veranlasst, Daten zum Zwecke der Anzeige von Werbeanzeigen an AdJug zu übermitteln. Im Rahmen dieses technischen Verfahrens erhält AdJug Kenntnis darüber, dass unsere Internetseite durch das von der betroffenen Person genutzte informationstechnologische System aufgerufen wurde. Die im Rahmen des technischen Verfahrens an AdJug übertragenen Daten dienen zu Abrechnungszwecken in Bezug auf die eingeblendete Werbung.
Die betroffene Person kann die Setzung von Cookies durch unsere Internetseite, wie oben bereits dargestellt, jederzeit mittels einer entsprechenden Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers verhindern und damit der Setzung von Cookies dauerhaft widersprechen. Eine solche Einstellung des genutzten Internetbrowsers würde auch verhindern, dass AdJug ein Cookie auf dem informationstechnologischen System der betroffenen Person setzt. Zudem können von AdJug bereits gesetzte Cookies jederzeit über einen Internetbrowser oder andere Softwareprogramme gelöscht werden.
Ferner besteht für die betroffene Person die Möglichkeit, einer Erfassung der durch das AdJug-Cookie erzeugten, auf eine Nutzung dieser Internetseite bezogenen Daten sowie der Verarbeitung dieser Daten durch AdJug zu widersprechen und eine solche zu verhindern. Hierzu muss die betroffene Person den Consumer-Cookie-Opt-Out-Link unter
http://www.de.adjug.com/datenschutz.html
drücken, der einen Opt-Out-Cookie setzt. Der mit dem Widerspruch gesetzte Opt-Out-Cookie wird auf dem von der betroffenen Person genutzten informationstechnologischen System abgelegt. Werden die Cookies auf dem System der betroffenen Person nach einem Widerspruch gelöscht, muss die betroffene Person den Link erneut aufrufen und einen neuen Opt-Out-Cookie setzen.
Mit der Setzung des Opt-Out-Cookies besteht jedoch die Möglichkeit, dass die Internetseiten des für die Verarbeitung Verantwortlichen für die betroffene Person nicht mehr vollumfänglich nutzbar sind.
Die geltenden Datenschutzbestimmungen von AdJug können unter
http://www.de.adjug.com/datenschutz.html
abgerufen werden.
31. Rechtsgrundlage der Verarbeitung
Art. 6 I lit. a DS-GVO dient unserem Unternehmen als Rechtsgrundlage für Verarbeitungsvorgänge, bei denen wir eine Einwilligung für einen bestimmten Verarbeitungszweck einholen. Ist die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten zur Erfüllung eines Vertrags, dessen Vertragspartei die betroffene Person ist, erforderlich, wie dies beispielsweise bei Verarbeitungsvorgängen der Fall ist, die für eine Lieferung von Waren oder die Erbringung einer sonstigen Leistung oder Gegenleistung notwendig sind, so beruht die Verarbeitung auf Art. 6 I lit. b DS-GVO. Gleiches gilt für solche Verarbeitungsvorgänge die zur Durchführung vorvertraglicher Maßnahmen erforderlich sind, etwa in Fällen von Anfragen zur unseren Produkten oder Leistungen. Unterliegt unser Unternehmen einer rechtlichen Verpflichtung durch welche eine Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten erforderlich wird, wie beispielsweise zur Erfüllung steuerlicher Pflichten, so basiert die Verarbeitung auf Art. 6 I lit. c DS-GVO. In seltenen Fällen könnte die Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten erforderlich werden, um lebenswichtige Interessen der betroffenen Person oder einer anderen natürlichen Person zu schützen. Dies wäre beispielsweise der Fall, wenn ein Besucher in unserem Betrieb verletzt werden würde und daraufhin sein Name, sein Alter, seine Krankenkassendaten oder sonstige lebenswichtige Informationen an einen Arzt, ein Krankenhaus oder sonstige Dritte weitergegeben werden müssten. Dann würde die Verarbeitung auf Art. 6 I lit. d DS-GVO beruhen. Letztlich könnten Verarbeitungsvorgänge auf Art. 6 I lit. f DS-GVO beruhen. Auf dieser Rechtsgrundlage basieren Verarbeitungsvorgänge, die von keiner der vorgenannten Rechtsgrundlagen erfasst werden, wenn die Verarbeitung zur Wahrung eines berechtigten Interesses unseres Unternehmens oder eines Dritten erforderlich ist, sofern die Interessen, Grundrechte und Grundfreiheiten des Betroffenen nicht überwiegen. Solche Verarbeitungsvorgänge sind uns insbesondere deshalb gestattet, weil sie durch den Europäischen Gesetzgeber besonders erwähnt wurden. Er vertrat insoweit die Auffassung, dass ein berechtigtes Interesse anzunehmen sein könnte, wenn die betroffene Person ein Kunde des Verantwortlichen ist (Erwägungsgrund 47 Satz 2 DS-GVO).
32. Berechtigte Interessen an der Verarbeitung, die von dem Verantwortlichen oder einem Dritten verfolgt werden
Basiert die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten auf Artikel 6 I lit. f DS-GVO ist unser berechtigtes Interesse die Durchführung unserer Geschäftstätigkeit zugunsten des Wohlergehens all unserer Mitarbeiter und unserer Anteilseigner.
33. Dauer, für die die personenbezogenen Daten gespeichert werden
Das Kriterium für die Dauer der Speicherung von personenbezogenen Daten ist die jeweilige gesetzliche Aufbewahrungsfrist. Nach Ablauf der Frist werden die entsprechenden Daten routinemäßig gelöscht, sofern sie nicht mehr zur Vertragserfüllung oder Vertragsanbahnung erforderlich sind.
34. Gesetzliche oder vertragliche Vorschriften zur Bereitstellung der personenbezogenen Daten; Erforderlichkeit für den Vertragsabschluss; Verpflichtung der betroffenen Person, die personenbezogenen Daten bereitzustellen; mögliche Folgen der Nichtbereitstellung
Wir klären Sie darüber auf, dass die Bereitstellung personenbezogener Daten zum Teil gesetzlich vorgeschrieben ist (z.B. Steuervorschriften) oder sich auch aus vertraglichen Regelungen (z.B. Angaben zum Vertragspartner) ergeben kann. Mitunter kann es zu einem Vertragsschluss erforderlich sein, dass eine betroffene Person uns personenbezogene Daten zur Verfügung stellt, die in der Folge durch uns verarbeitet werden müssen. Die betroffene Person ist beispielsweise verpflichtet uns personenbezogene Daten bereitzustellen, wenn unser Unternehmen mit ihr einen Vertrag abschließt. Eine Nichtbereitstellung der personenbezogenen Daten hätte zur Folge, dass der Vertrag mit dem Betroffenen nicht geschlossen werden könnte. Vor einer Bereitstellung personenbezogener Daten durch den Betroffenen muss sich der Betroffene an einen unserer Mitarbeiter wenden. Unser Mitarbeiter klärt den Betroffenen einzelfallbezogen darüber auf, ob die Bereitstellung der personenbezogenen Daten gesetzlich oder vertraglich vorgeschrieben oder für den Vertragsabschluss erforderlich ist, ob eine Verpflichtung besteht, die personenbezogenen Daten bereitzustellen, und welche Folgen die Nichtbereitstellung der personenbezogenen Daten hätte.
35. Bestehen einer automatisierten Entscheidungsfindung
Als verantwortungsbewusstes Unternehmen verzichten wir auf eine automatische Entscheidungsfindung oder ein Profiling.
Diese Datenschutzerklärung wurde durch den Datenschutzerklärungs-Generator der DGD Deutsche Gesellschaft für Datenschutz GmbH, die als
Externer Datenschutzbeauftragter Unterfranken
tätig ist, in Kooperation mit den
Datenschutz Anwälten der Kanzlei WILDE BEUGER SOLMECKE | Rechtsanwälte
erstellt.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://de-de.facebook.com/about/privacy/:
Startseite des Privacy Centers
Suchen
Informationen zu Datenschutz und Privatsphäre
Zusätzliche Privatsphäre-Ressourcen
Datenschutzrichtlinie
Was ist die Datenschutzrichtlinie und was behandelt sie?
Welche Informationen erheben wir?
Wie verwenden wir deine Informationen?
Wie werden deine Informationen auf Meta-Produkten bzw. mit integrierten Partnern geteilt?
Wie teilen wir Informationen mit Dritten?
Wie arbeiten die Meta-Unternehmen zusammen?
Was ist unsere Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung deiner Informationen? Was sind deine Rechte?
Wie lange behalten wir deine Informationen?
Wie übermitteln wir Informationen?
Wie reagieren wir auf rechtliche Anfragen, wie halten wir geltendes Recht ein bzw. wie verhindern wir Schäden?
Wie erfährst du, dass sich die Richtlinie geändert hat?
So kontaktierst du Meta bei Fragen
Informationen zur Rechtsgrundlage
Weitere Richtlinien und Artikel
Einstellungen
Datenschutzrichtlinie
So verwenden wir Informationen für KI bei Meta
Aufgrund des Feedbacks von Aufsichtsbehörden verschieben wir weiterhin unsere Pläne bezüglich der Verwendung deiner Informationen aus Meta-Produkten zur Weiterentwicklung und Verbesserung von
KI bei Meta
. Wir werden dich informieren, bevor wir mit der Verwendung dieser Informationen zu diesem Zweck beginnen, und dir mitteilen, wie du dein Recht auf Widerspruch ausüben kannst.
Sonstige Aktualisierungen
Wir aktualisieren unsere Datenschutzrichtlinie. Die Änderungen treten am 7. April 2025 in Kraft.
Die neue Richtlinie findest du hier.
Was ist die Datenschutzrichtlinie und was behandelt sie?
Gültig ab 14. November 2024
|
Druckversion ansehen
|
Frühere Versionen ansehen
Das Wichtigste in Kürze
Wir bei Meta möchten, dass du verstehst, welche Informationen wir erheben und wie wir sie verwenden und teilen. Deshalb empfehlen wir dir, unsere Datenschutzrichtlinie zu lesen. Auf diese Weise kannst du die
Meta-Produkte
ganz nach deinen Wünschen nutzen.
In der Datenschutzrichtlinie erläutern wir, wie wir Informationen erheben, verwenden, teilen, speichern und übermitteln. Wir informieren dich außerdem über deine Rechte. Jeder Abschnitt der Richtlinie enthält hilfreiche Beispiele und eine vereinfachte Sprache, um unsere Praktiken leichter verständlich zu machen. Außerdem haben wir Links zu den Ressourcen hinzugefügt, über die du mehr zu den Datenschutzthemen erfahren kannst, die dich interessieren.
Es ist uns wichtig, dass du weißt, wie du deine Privatsphäre kontrollierst. Deshalb zeigen wir dir auch, wo du deine Informationen in den Einstellungen der von dir genutzten Meta-Produkte verwalten kannst. Du kannst
diese Einstellungen aktualisieren
, um dein Nutzungserlebnis anzupassen.
Die vollständige Richtlinie findest du nachstehend.
Welche Produkte behandelt diese Richtlinie?
Mehr zur Verwaltung deiner Privatsphäre erfährst du im Privacy Center
Welche Informationen erheben wir?
Das Wichtigste in Kürze
Welche Informationen wir über dich erheben und verarbeiten, hängt davon ab, wie du unsere
Produkte
nutzt. Zum Beispiel erheben wir andere Informationen, wenn du Möbel im Marketplace verkaufst, als wenn du ein Reel auf Instagram postest. Wenn du unsere Produkte nutzt, erheben wir einige Informationen über dich,
auch wenn du kein Konto hast
.
Diese Informationen erheben wir:
Deine Aktivität und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und sonstigen Dritten:
Was ist, wenn du uns die Erhebung bestimmter Informationen nicht gestattest?
Einige Informationen sind erforderlich, damit unsere Produkte funktionieren. Andere Informationen sind optional, ohne sie könnte jedoch die Qualität deines Erlebnisses beeinträchtigt werden.
Mehr dazu
Was ist, wenn die von uns erhobenen Informationen keine Rückschlüsse auf Einzelpersonen zulassen?
In einigen Fällen werden die Daten – bevor sie uns zur Verfügung gestellt werden – von Dritten aggregiert oder anonymisiert, sodass sie nicht mehr zur Identifizierung von Einzelpersonen dienen können. Wir verwenden diese Informationen wie nachstehend beschrieben, ohne zu versuchen, Einzelpersonen wieder identifizierbar zu machen.
Übernimm die Kontrolle
Verwalte die Informationen, die wir über dich erheben
Privacy Center
Wie verwenden wir deine Informationen?
Das Wichtigste in Kürze
Wir verwenden
Informationen, die wir erheben
, um dir personalisierte Erlebnisse, einschließlich Werbeanzeigen, zur Verfügung zu stellen (wenn wir dir Werbung auf Meta-Produkten zeigen) sowie für die anderen Zwecke, die wir unten ausführlich darlegen.
Für einige dieser Zwecke verwenden wir Informationen
in unseren Produkten
von den Konten, die du zu deiner Kontenübersicht hinzufügst, und
allen deinen Geräten
. Die von uns für diese Zwecke verwendeten Informationen werden automatisch von unseren Systemen verarbeitet. In einigen Fällen nutzen wir jedoch auch eine
manuelle Überprüfung
, um auf deine Informationen zuzugreifen und sie zu überprüfen.
Um weniger Informationen zu verwenden, die mit einzelnen Nutzern verknüpft sind, de-identifizieren wir Informationen in einigen Fällen, fassen sie zusammen oder anonymisieren sie, sodass du damit nicht mehr identifizierbar bist. Wir verwenden diese Informationen auf dieselbe Art und Weise, wie wir deine Informationen wie in diesem Abschnitt beschrieben verwenden.
So verwenden wir deine Informationen:
Zur Bereitstellung, Personalisierung und Verbesserung unserer Produkte
Wir verwenden die uns zur Verfügung stehenden Informationen, um unsere
Produkte
bereitzustellen und zu verbessern. Dies umfasst das Personalisieren von Funktionen, Inhalten und
Empfehlungen
, z. B. deinen
Facebook Feed
, deinen
Instagram-Feed
, deine Stories und Werbeanzeigen (wenn wir dir Werbung auf Meta-Produkten zeigen). Wir verwenden die von dir für diese Zwecke freiwillig bereitgestellten
Informationen mit besonderem Schutz
, aber nicht, um dir Werbeanzeigen zu zeigen.
Weitere Infos dazu, wie wir Informationen verwenden, um unsere Produkte bereitzustellen, zu personalisieren und zu verbessern:
So zeigen wir dir Werbeanzeigen (wenn wir dir Werbung auf Meta-Produkten zeigen)
So verwenden wir Informationen, um unsere Produkte zu verbessern
So verwenden wir standortbezogene Informationen
Um Schutz, Sicherheit und Integrität zu fördern
Wir verwenden die von uns erhobenen Informationen, um unsere Nutzer vor Schaden zu schützen und um sichere und geschützte Produkte bereitzustellen.
Mehr dazu
Zur Bereitstellung von Messungs- und Analysediensten sowie Unternehmens-Services
Viele Menschen setzen auf unsere Produkte, um ihre Unternehmen zu betreiben bzw. um Inhalte zu teilen. Wir unterstützen sie dabei, zu messen, wie gut ihre Werbeanzeigen und sonstigen Inhalte, Produkte und Dienste funktionieren.
Mehr dazu
Für die Kommunikation mit dir
Wir kommunizieren mit dir unter Verwendung der Informationen, die du uns bereitgestellt hast, wie z. B. Kontaktinformationen, die du in deinem Profil angegeben hast.
Mehr dazu
Für Forschung und Innovation für soziale Zwecke
Wir verwenden uns zur Verfügung stehende Informationen, Informationen von Forschern sowie Datensätze aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen, von Berufsgruppen und von gemeinnützigen Gruppen, um Forschung durchzuführen und zu unterstützen.
Mehr dazu
Wie werden deine Informationen auf Meta-Produkten bzw. mit integrierten Partnern geteilt?
Das Wichtigste in Kürze
Auf Meta-Produkten
Erfahre mehr über die verschiedenen Fälle, in denen deine Informationen auf unseren
Produkten
geteilt werden können:
Personen und Konten, mit denen du Inhalte teilst bzw. kommunizierst
Inhalte, die andere über dich (erneut) teilen
Öffentliche Inhalte
Mit integrierten Partnern
Du kannst dich freiwillig mit
integrierten Partnern
verbinden, die unsere Produkte nutzen. Wenn du dies tust, erhalten diese integrierten Partner Informationen über dich und deine Aktivität.
Diese integrierten Partner können immer auf die Informationen zugreifen, die auf unseren Produkten öffentlich sind. Weitere Infos zu sonstigen Informationen, die sie erhalten, und dazu, wie sie mit deinen Informationen umgehen:
Wenn du das Produkt bzw. den Dienst eines integrierten Partners nutzt
Wenn du in einem Produkt oder Dienst eines integrierten Partners mit Inhalten anderer Personen interagierst
So gehen integrierte Partner mit deinen Informationen um
Übernimm die Kontrolle
Erfahre mehr über Zielgruppen.
Privacy Center
Apps und Websites verwalten
Wie teilen wir Informationen mit Dritten?
Das Wichtigste in Kürze
Wir verkaufen keine deiner Informationen an irgendjemanden und werden das auch in Zukunft niemals tun. Außerdem verpflichten wir
Partner
und sonstige
Dritte
, Regeln dazu einzuhalten, wie sie die Informationen, die wir bereitstellen, verwenden und offenlegen dürfen und wie nicht.
Weitere Einzelheiten dazu, an wen wir Informationen weitergeben:
Partner
Werbetreibende und Audience Network-Publisher (wenn wir dir Werbeanzeigen auf Meta-Produkten zeigen)
Partner, die unsere Analysedienste nutzen
Partner, die Waren und Dienstleistungen in unseren Produkten und auf unseren Plattformen für E-Commerce-Dienste anbieten
Integrierte Partner
Anbieter
Anbieter für Messlösungen
Anbieter für Marketinglösungen
Dienstleister
Dienstleister
Dritte
Externe Forscher
KI-Integrationen
Sonstige Dritte
Wir teilen außerdem Informationen mit sonstigen
Dritten
als Reaktion auf rechtliche Anfragen, um geltendes Recht einzuhalten oder um Schäden zu verhindern.
Lies die Richtlinie
.
Wenn wir unser gesamtes Unternehmen bzw. Teile davon an jemand anderen verkaufen oder übertragen, geben wir in einigen Fällen deine Informationen im Rahmen dieser Transaktion an den neuen Eigentümer weiter, jedoch nur im gesetzlich zulässigen Rahmen.
Wie arbeiten die Meta-Unternehmen zusammen?
Das Wichtigste in Kürze
Wir sind Teil der
Meta-Unternehmen
, die Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen bereitstellen. Zu den
Produkten der Meta-Unternehmen
zählen alle
Meta-Produkte
, für die diese Richtlinie gilt, sowie weitere Produkte wie u. a. WhatsApp.
Wir teilen die von uns erhobenen Informationen sowie die Infrastruktur, die Systeme und die Technologie mit den anderen Meta-Unternehmen.
Erfahre mehr dazu
, wie wir Informationen in andere Länder übermitteln.
Außerdem verarbeiten wir Informationen, die wir über dich von anderen Meta-Unternehmen erhalten, gemäß deren Nutzungsbedingungen und Richtlinien und soweit dies nach anwendbarem Recht zulässig ist. In einigen Fällen fungiert Meta als
Dienstleister
für andere Meta-Unternehmen. Wir handeln in deren Auftrag und im Einklang mit deren Anweisungen und Nutzungsbedingungen.
Warum wir Informationen innerhalb der Meta-Unternehmen weitergeben
Meta-Produkte geben Informationen an andere Meta-Unternehmen weiter:
um Schutz, Sicherheit und Integrität zu fördern sowie das anwendbare Recht einzuhalten
um optionale Features und Integrationen bereitzustellen
um herauszufinden, wie Personen Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen nutzen und mit ihnen interagieren
Einige Beispiele
dazu, warum wir Informationen teilen.
Weitere Ressourcen
Die Datenschutzrichtlinien der anderen Meta-Unternehmen lesen
Facebook-Hilfebereich
Was ist unsere Rechtsgrundlage für die Verarbeitung deiner Informationen? Was sind deine Rechte?
Das Wichtigste in Kürze
Nach geltendem Datenschutzrecht benötigen Unternehmen eine Rechtsgrundlage zur Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten. Mit „Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten“ meinen wir die Arten, auf die wir deine Informationen so erfassen, verwenden und teilen, wie wir es in den anderen Abschnitten dieser Richtlinie oben beschrieben haben.
Was ist unsere Rechtsgrundlage?
Gemäß der DSGVO und anderen relevanten Datenschutzgesetzen stehen dir folgende Rechte zu:
Auskunftsrecht und Recht auf Berichtigung
Recht auf Widerruf der Einwilligung
Deine Informationen übertragen
Recht auf Herunterladen deiner Informationen
Recht auf Löschung von Informationen
Widerspruchsrecht
Recht auf Einreichen einer Beschwerde
Wie lange behalten wir deine Informationen?
Das Wichtigste in Kürze
Wir behalten deine Informationen so lange, wie wir sie brauchen, um unsere Produkte bereitzustellen, rechtliche Verpflichtungen zu erfüllen oder unsere Interessen oder die Interessen anderer zu schützen. Wir entscheiden von Fall zu Fall, wie lange wir Informationen benötigen. Bei dieser Entscheidung berücksichtigen wir folgende Faktoren:
ob wir sie benötigen, um unsere Produkte zu betreiben oder bereitzustellen. Beispielsweise müssen wir einige deiner Informationen aufbewahren, um dein Konto beizubehalten.
Mehr dazu
.
Für welches Feature wir sie verwenden und wie dieses Feature funktioniert. Beispielsweise werden Nachrichten, die mit dem Selbstlöschmodus von Messenger gesendet werden, weniger lang als normale Nachrichten aufbewahrt.
Mehr dazu
.
Wie lange wir die Informationen zur Erfüllung bestimmter rechtlicher Verpflichtungen aufbewahren müssen.
Einige Beispiele
.
Ob wir sie für andere berechtigte Zwecke benötigen, z. B. um Schaden zu verhindern, mögliche Verstöße gegen unsere Nutzungsbedingungen oder Richtlinien zu untersuchen, den Schutz, die Sicherheit und Integrität zu fördern oder uns selbst zu schützen, darunter unsere Rechte, unser Eigentum und unsere Produkte.
In einigen Fällen und aus bestimmten Gründen bewahren wir Informationen für einen längeren Zeitraum auf. In
unserer Richtlinie
erfährst du, wann wir deine Informationen aufbewahren dürfen.
Wie übermitteln wir Informationen?
Das Wichtigste in Kürze
Warum werden Informationen in andere Länder übermittelt?
Wohin werden Informationen übermittelt?
Wie schützen wir deine Informationen?
Wie reagieren wir auf rechtliche Anfragen, wie halten wir geltendes Recht ein bzw. wie verhindern wir Schäden?
Das Wichtigste in Kürze
Aus folgenden Gründen greifen wir auf deine Informationen zu und speichern, verwenden und teilen sie:
als Reaktion auf rechtliche Anfragen wie Durchsuchungsbeschlüsse, gerichtliche Entscheidungen, gerichtliche Aufträge zur Herausgabe von Informationen („production order“) oder Vorladungen. Diese Anfragen stammen von
Dritten
wie zum Beispiel von Prozessführenden in Zivilprozessen oder von Strafverfolgungs- und anderen Behörden.
Mehr dazu
, wie wir auf rechtliche Anfragen reagieren.
Im Einklang mit geltendem Recht
Um den Schutz, die Sicherheit und die Integrität von
Meta-Produkten
, der Nutzer, der Mitarbeiter, des Eigentums und der Öffentlichkeit sicherzustellen.
Mehr dazu
.
Möglicherweise können wir für einen längeren Zeitraum auf deine Informationen zugreifen oder sie speichern.
Mehr dazu
.
Wie erfährst du, dass sich die Richtlinie geändert hat?
Wir benachrichtigen dich, bevor wir wesentliche Änderungen an dieser Richtlinie vornehmen. Du erhältst dann die Gelegenheit, die überarbeitete Richtlinie zu lesen, bevor du dich dazu entscheidest, unsere Produkte weiterhin zu nutzen.
So kontaktierst du Meta bei Fragen
Weitere Informationen zur Funktionsweise des Datenschutzes findest du auf
Facebook
, auf
Instagram
und im
Facebook-Hilfebereich
. Bei Fragen zu dieser Richtlinie oder bei Fragen, Beschwerden oder Anfragen bezüglich deiner Informationen kannst du uns wie unten beschrieben kontaktieren.
Der Datenverantwortliche bezüglich deiner Informationen ist Meta Platforms Ireland Limited. Dieses Unternehmen kannst du
online kontaktieren
oder per Post unter:
Meta Platforms Ireland Limited
ATTN: Privacy Operations
Merrion Road
Dublin 4
D04 X2K5, Irland
Kontaktaufnahme mit dem Datenschutzbeauftragten
für Meta Platforms Ireland Limited.
Du hast außerdem das Recht, eine Beschwerde bei der federführenden Aufsichtsbehörde für Meta Platforms Ireland, der irischen Datenschutzkommission, oder bei deiner lokalen Aufsichtsbehörde einzureichen.
Informationen zur Rechtsgrundlage
Einwilligung
Wir verarbeiten Informationen wie im Folgenden beschrieben, wenn du uns deine Einwilligung dazu erteilt hast. Diese Einwilligung können wir über produktinterne Erlebnisse, zur Aktivierung bestimmter Funktionen oder zur Aktivierung gerätebasierter Einstellungen einholen. Welche Informationskategorien wir nutzen sowie warum und wie sie verarbeitet werden, wird nachstehend erläutert:
Warum und wie wir deine Informationen verarbeiten
Informationskategorien, die wir verwenden (mehr über die einzelnen Informationskategorien erfährst du unter „
Welche Informationen erheben wir?
“). Welche Informationen wir tatsächlich verwenden, hängt von deinen tatsächlichen Umständen ab, könnte aber Folgendes umfassen:
Verarbeitung von Informationen mit besonderem Schutz, die du zur Verfügung stellst, damit wir sie mit den von dir Ausgewählten teilen können, um unsere Produkte bereitzustellen, zu personalisieren und zu verbessern sowie Analysen durchzuführen. Zu diesen Zwecken erheben, speichern, veröffentlichen und nutzen wir automatisierte oder manchmal auch manuelle Verarbeitungen.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Informationen mit besonderem Schutz, die du freiwillig bereitstellst (wie zum Beispiel deine religiösen Ansichten, sexuelle Orientierung, politische Einstellung, Gesundheitszustand, ethnische Zugehörigkeit, philosophische Weltanschauung oder Mitgliedschaft in einer Gewerkschaft) oder im Rahmen von Umfragen angibst, an denen du freiwillig teilnimmst, und dort, wo du deine ausdrückliche Einwilligung erteilt hast
Personalisierung von Werbeanzeigen auf den Meta-Produkten:
Wenn wir dir je nach deinen
Einstellungen
Werbung auf Meta-Produkten zeigen, einschließlich Meta Audience Network, verwenden wir deine Informationen über das Konto bzw. die Konten hinweg in deiner Kontoübersicht, einschließlich der Verwendung von Cookies, um deine Werbeanzeigen zu personalisieren und ihre Performance zu messen.
Wenn wir dir Werbung auf den Meta-Produkten zeigen, verarbeitet unser Anzeigensystem automatisch Informationen, die wir über dich erhoben und gespeichert haben. In Übereinstimmung mit deinen Einstellungen für Werbung verarbeitet unser Anzeigensystem diese Informationen, um deine Interessen und Präferenzen zu verstehen und personalisierte Werbung auf den Meta-Produkten für dich zu schalten.
Erfahre mehr
über deine Einstellungen für Werbung.
Unser Anzeigensystem priorisiert, welche Werbung dir angezeigt wird. Grundlage dafür ist die von den Werbetreibenden gewünschte Zielgruppe. Im Anschluss zeigen wir die Werbung den Personen, die daran interessiert sein könnten.
Erfahre mehr
darüber, wie unser Anzeigensystem funktioniert.
Erfahre mehr
darüber, wie wir die Werbeanzeigen auswählen, die du siehst.
Du kannst deine Auswahl jederzeit in den „Werbepräferenzen“ ändern.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge oder Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten
Die Arten von Inhalten, einschließlich Werbeanzeigen, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst, und wie du mit ihnen interagierst
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden)
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast (z. B. GPS-Standort)
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest
Standortbezogene Informationen
Berichte über die Performance unserer Produkte auf deinem Gerät
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Nutzung von Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und anderen Dritten, um die Werbeanzeigen, die du siehst, auf dich zuzuschneiden: Wenn wir dir Werbung auf Meta-Produkten zeigen, verwenden wir mit deiner Zustimmung Informationen, die Partner, Anbieter und andere Dritte uns bezüglich Aktivitäten außerhalb der Meta-Produkte bereitstellen und die wir mit dir verknüpft haben, um Werbeanzeigen zu personalisieren, die wir dir auf den Meta-Produkten sowie auf Websites, Apps und Geräten, die unsere Werbedienste nutzen, zeigen. Wir erhalten diese Informationen unabhängig davon, ob du bei unseren Produkten angemeldet bist bzw. ein Konto auf ihnen hast oder nicht. Mehr dazu erfährst du in der
Cookie-Richtlinie
.
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Weitergabe deiner Kontakt-, Profil- oder sonstiger Informationen an Dritte auf Antrag von dir, wenn du bestimmte Produkte von uns verwendest. Wenn du uns beispielsweise dazu anweist, teilen wir deine E-Mail-Adresse oder andere Informationen, die du gegebenenfalls freiwillig teilst, mit einem Werbetreibenden, damit dieser dich mit zusätzlichen Informationen über ein beworbenes Produkt kontaktieren kann. Um welche Art von Dritten es sich handelt und welche Informationskategorien wir weitergeben, hängt davon ab, unter welchen Umständen du uns bittest, deine Informationen weiterzugeben.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie deine Kontakt-, Profil- oder sonstige Informationen wie Beiträge oder Kommentare
Erheben von Informationen, deren Erhalt du uns durch die von dir aktivierten gerätebasierten Einstellungen gestattest (wie den Zugriff auf deinen GPS-Standort, deine Kamera oder Fotos), damit wir diese nutzen können, um die bei der Aktivierung der Einstellung beschriebenen Funktionen oder Dienste bereitzustellen.
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Informationen aus den Geräteeinstellungen
Überprüfung deiner Identität oder deines Kontos oder Hilfe beim Schutz vor verdächtigen Aktivitäten, einschließlich Nachahmung und Identitätsmissbrauch, mithilfe von Gesichtsanalyse, die auf Wunsch auch Gesichtserkennungstechnologie umfassen kann.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Deine Kontodaten, dein Profilbild oder
dein Foto- oder Video-Selfie, wenn du es bereitstellen möchtest
Wenn wir Informationen verarbeiten, die du uns auf Grundlage deiner Einwilligung bereitgestellt hast, hast du das Recht, die Einwilligung jederzeit zu widerrufen, ohne dass die Rechtmäßigkeit der aufgrund deiner Einwilligung bis zum Widerruf erfolgten Verarbeitung berührt wird. Du hast auch das Recht, die Informationen, die du uns auf der Grundlage deiner Einwilligung zur Verfügung stellst, zu übertragen. Um deine Rechte auszuüben, nutze deine gerätebasierten Einstellungen sowie die Facebook-Einstellungen, die Instagram-Einstellungen und unsere Hilfebereiche.
Erfüllung eines Vertrags
In Bezug auf alle Personen, die die Geschäftsfähigkeit zum Abschluss eines durchsetzbaren Vertrags haben (z. B. weil sie im Land ihres Wohnsitzes volljährig sind), verarbeiten wir die Informationen in dem für den Abschluss und die Erfüllung unserer Verträge mit dir erforderlichen Maß (die
Meta-Nutzungsbedingungen
und
Instagram-Nutzungsbedingungen
, die
ergänzenden Nutzungsbedingungen von Meta Platforms Technologies
, die
ergänzenden Portal-Nutzungsbedingungen
, die
Meta AI-Nutzungsbedingungen
und die
ergänzenden Meta View-Nutzungsbedingungen
, zusammen „die Nutzungsbedingungen“). Die Zwecke, für die wir Informationen zur Erfüllung unserer Verträge verarbeiten, die von uns verwendeten Informationskategorien und wie die Informationen verarbeitet werden, werden nachstehend erläutert:
Warum und wie wir deine Informationen verarbeiten
Informationskategorien, die wir verwenden (mehr über die einzelnen Informationskategorien erfährst du unter „
Welche Informationen erheben wir?
“). Welche Informationen wir tatsächlich verwenden, hängt von deinen tatsächlichen Umständen ab, könnte aber Folgendes umfassen:
Personalisierung der Meta-Produkte (mit Ausnahme von Werbeanzeigen): Unsere Systeme verarbeiten automatisch Informationen, die wir im Zusammenhang mit dir und anderen Personen erhoben und gespeichert haben, um deine Interessen und Präferenzen zu bewerten und zu verstehen und dir über die Meta-Produkte hinweg gemäß unseren Nutzungsbedingungen personalisierte Erlebnisse zu bieten. Auf diese Weise:
personalisieren wir Funktionen und Inhalte (wie deinen
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram-Feed
und Stories); und
können wir dir auf unseren Produkten bzw. außerhalb dieser Vorschläge unterbreiten (z. B. Personen, die du kennen könntest, Gruppen oder Veranstaltungen, für die du dich interessieren könntest, oder Themen, die du eventuell abonnieren möchtest).
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast (wie GPS-Standort)
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest
Berichte über die Performance unserer Produkte auf deinem Gerät
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Bereitstellung und Verbesserung unserer Meta-Produkte: Die Bereitstellung der Meta-Produkte umfasst die Erhebung, das Speichern und ggf. Teilen, Profiling, Überprüfen und Kuratieren und in einigen Fällen nicht nur die automatisierte Verarbeitung, sondern auch manuelle Reviews (durch einen Mitarbeiter), um:
dein Konto und Profil zu erstellen und zu verwalten,
dein Konto für Meta-Produkte (einschließlich deiner öffentlichen Profilinformationen) zur Anmeldung oder Weitergabe deiner Informationen mit einem integrierten Partner zu verknüpfen,
das Teilen von Inhalten und Statusmeldungen zu ermöglichen,
Funktionen bereitzustellen und zu kuratieren,
Messaging-Dienste bereitzustellen sowie die Möglichkeit, Sprach- und Videoanrufe zu tätigen und sich mit anderen zu verbinden,
Technologie der künstlichen Intelligenz
in unseren Produkten bereitzustellen und einzupflegen, um die Erstellung von Inhalten wie Text, Audio, Bildern und Videos zu ermöglichen, auch indem deine Nutzung von Inhalten in den Funktionen verstanden und erkannt wird,
Analysen durchzuführen und
deine Käufe und Zahlungen mithilfe von Meta Pay oder anderen Meta-Checkout-Funktionen zu ermöglichen.
Wir verwenden Informationen, die uns vorliegen, auch, um Verbesserungen an unseren Produkten zu entwickeln, zu erforschen und zu testen. Wir verwenden die von uns erhobenen Informationen zu folgenden Zwecken:
Sehen, ob ein Produkt ordnungsgemäß funktioniert
Nach Fehlern suchen und diese gegebenenfalls beheben
Neue Produkte und Funktionen testen, um deren Funktionalität zu prüfen
Feedback zu unseren Ideen für Produkte oder Funktionen einholen
Durchführung von Umfragen und anderer Forschung dazu, was dir an unseren Produkten und Marken gefällt und was wir noch besser machen können
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Deine öffentlichen Informationen (darunter Name, Benutzername und Profilbild)
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Nachrichten, die du sendest und empfängst, einschließlich ihrer Inhalte, vorbehaltlich des
anwendbaren Rechts
Metadaten zu Inhalten und Nachrichten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du tätigst, einschließlich gekürzter Kreditkartendaten
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Dein Foto- oder Video-Selfie, wenn du es uns zur Verfügung stellst, wenn du uns wegen Support für dein Konto kontaktierst
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Förderung von Schutz, Integrität und Sicherheit in und auf den Meta-Produkten: Die Meta-Produkte sollen dazu beitragen, den Schutz, die Integrität und die Sicherheit dieser Dienste und der Menschen, die sie nutzen, sicherzustellen. Wir verarbeiten Informationen, die wir mit dir verknüpft haben, und wenden dabei automatisierte Verarbeitungstechniken an und führen in einigen Fällen einen manuellen Review (durch einen Mitarbeiter) durch, um:
Konten, Identität und Aktivität zu verifizieren,
Verstöße gegen unsere Nutzungsbedingungen oder Richtlinien zu ermitteln und zu verfolgen. In einigen Fällen werden die von uns zu Verstößen getroffenen Entscheidungen vom
Oversight Board
überprüft, um
verdächtige Aktivitäten zu untersuchen,
schädliches oder rechtswidriges Verhalten zu erkennen, zu verhindern und zu bekämpfen, z. B. durch Überprüfen und in einigen Fällen Entfernen von Inhalten, die uns gemeldet wurden,
Spam und andere negative Erlebnisse aufzudecken und zu verhindern,
Bedrohungen unseres Personals bzw. Eigentums aufzudecken und zu unterbinden, und
die Integrität unserer Produkte zu wahren.
Um weitere Informationen zu Schutz, Integrität und Sicherheit im Allgemeinen im Zusammenhang mit Meta-Produkten zu erhalten, besuche den Facebook-Sicherheitsbereich und die Instagram-Sicherheitstipps.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten und Nachrichten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du tätigst, einschließlich gekürzter Kreditkartendaten
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Dein Foto- oder Video-Selfie, wenn du es uns zur Verfügung stellst, wenn du uns wegen Support für dein Konto kontaktierst
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Für die Kommunikation mit dir: Wir verwenden die Informationen, die du uns zur Verfügung gestellt hast (wie Kontaktinformationen in deinem Profil), um dir eine Mitteilung zu senden, wie eine E-Mail oder einen Hinweis in einem Produkt, zum Beispiel in folgenden Fällen:
Wir kontaktieren dich per E-Mail oder per Benachrichtigung innerhalb der Produkte im Zusammenhang mit den Meta-Produkten, produktbezogenen Angelegenheiten, Forschung oder um dich über unsere Nutzungsbedingungen und Richtlinien zu informieren.
Wir verwenden auch Kontaktinformationen wie deine E-Mail-Adresse, um zu antworten, wenn du uns kontaktierst.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Kontaktinformationen in deinem Profil und deine Kommunikation mit uns
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Übermittlung, Speicherung oder Verarbeitung deiner Informationen weltweit. Wir teilen von uns erhobene Informationen weltweit, sowohl intern zwischen unseren Niederlassungen und Rechenzentren als auch extern mit unseren Partnern, Dritten und Dienstleistern. Da Meta global tätig ist und Nutzer, Partner sowie Mitarbeiter auf der ganzen Welt hat, sind Übermittlungen für folgende Zwecke notwendig:
um die Dienste zu betreiben und bereitzustellen, die in den Nutzungsbedingungen beschrieben werden, die für das/die von dir genutzte(n) Meta-Produkt(e) gelten. Hierzu gehört auch, es dir zu ermöglichen, weltweit Informationen zu teilen und dich mit deiner Familie und deinen Freunden zu vernetzen; und
damit wir unsere Produkte reparieren, analysieren und verbessern können.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten und Nachrichten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du tätigst, einschließlich gekürzter Kreditkartendaten
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Dein Foto- oder Video-Selfie, wenn du es uns zur Verfügung stellst, wenn du uns wegen Support für dein Konto kontaktierst
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Wir werden die uns zur Verfügung stehenden Informationen verwenden, um diese Dienste bereitzustellen; wenn du bestimmte Informationen nicht angeben möchtest (abgesehen von den begrenzten Kontoinformationen, die erforderlich sind, um ein
Facebook-Konto
oder ein
Instagram-Konto
zu erstellen), kann dein Erlebnis bei der Nutzung der Meta-Produkte beeinträchtigt werden. Zum Beispiel siehst du möglicherweise weniger relevante Empfehlungen in den Produkten oder deine Nutzung der Produkte kann eingeschränkt sein.
Wenn wir Informationen verarbeiten, die du uns als für den Abschluss und die Erfüllung unserer Verträge mit dir erforderlich bereitstellst, hast du gemäß der DSGVO das Recht auf Datenübertragbarkeit. Um deine Rechte auszuüben, gehe bitte zu den Facebook-Einstellungen, den Instagram-Einstellungen oder informiere dich in unseren Hilfebereichen.
Erfüllung einer rechtlichen Verpflichtung
Welche Informationskategorien wir verwenden, warum wir deine Informationen Daten aufgrund der Erfüllung einer rechtlichen Verpflichtung verarbeiten und wie die Verarbeitung erfolgt, ist nachstehend dargelegt:
Warum und wie wir deine Informationen verarbeiten
Informationskategorien, die wir verwenden (mehr über die einzelnen Informationskategorien erfährst du unter „
Welche Informationen erheben wir?
“). Welche Informationen wir tatsächlich verwenden, hängt von deinen tatsächlichen Umständen ab, könnte aber Folgendes umfassen:
Für die Verarbeitung von Informationen, wenn dies nach dem Gesetz erforderlich ist: Wenn wir zur Offenlegung von Informationen verpflichtet sind, beispielsweise wenn wir eine gültige rechtliche Anfrage für bestimmte Informationen erhalten (etwa einen irischen Durchsuchungsbeschluss) werden wir auf deine Informationen zugreifen, sie aufbewahren und/oder sie an Aufsichtsbehörden, Strafverfolgungsbehörden oder andere weitergeben.
Die Art und Weise, wie die Informationen verarbeitet werden, hängt von den jeweiligen Umständen hab. Mehr dazu erfährst du unter
Wie antworten wir auf rechtliche Anfragen, verhindern Schäden und fördern die Sicherheit und Integrität?
. Unter
Informationen für Strafverfolgungsbehörden
geben wir Informationen zu den operativen Richtlinien, die die Strafverfolgungsbehörden befolgen müssen.
Beispiele für irische Gesetze und in Irland durchsetzbare EU-Gesetze, durch die eine Verpflichtung entstehen könnte, sodass wir zur Verarbeitung der Informationen, die wir über dich gespeichert haben, verpflichtet sind:
Zivil- und Handelssachen: wenn wir eine gerichtliche Entscheidung erhalten oder anderweitig verpflichtet sind, Informationen für die Zwecke von Gerichtsverfahren offenzulegen, z. B. im Rahmen der Verordnung (EU) Nr. 1215/2012 über die gerichtliche Zuständigkeit und die Anerkennung und Vollstreckung von Entscheidungen in Zivil- und Handelssachen.
Strafsachen: zur Erfüllung von Anfragen von irischen Strafverfolgungsbehörden zur Bereitstellung von Informationen im Zusammenhang mit einer Ermittlung, z. B. im Rahmen von Section 10 des Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 wie durch 6(1)(a) des Criminal Justice Act 2006 geändert, oder zur Ergreifung von Maßnahmen, um Strafverfolgungsbehörden Informationen zu melden, sofern erforderlich.
Verbraucherangelegenheiten: zur Erfüllung unserer Verpflichtungen im Rahmen von Verbrauchergesetzen wie dem Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014.
Unternehmens- und Steuerangelegenheiten: zur Erfüllung unserer Verpflichtungen wie dem Companies Act 2014.
Aufsichtsrechtliche Angelegenheiten: zur Erfüllung unserer Verpflichtungen zur Interaktion mit Aufsichtsbehörden, z. B. dem Data Protection Commission, im Rahmen der Datenschutz-Grundverordnung und des Data Protection Act 2018.
Finanzangelegenheiten: zur Erfüllung unserer Verpflichtungen im Rahmen geltender Gesetze für Finanzdienstleistungen wie der European Union (Payment Services) Regulations 2018
Sieh die
aktuelle Liste der Gesetze
an, die in Irland durchsetzbar sind und durch die eine rechtliche Verpflichtung für Meta entsteht, welche zur Verarbeitung von Informationen führt. Durch neue Gesetze, die erlassen werden, oder andere Verpflichtungen, die für unsere Verarbeitung deiner Informationen verbindlich werden, sind wir unter Umständen zur Verarbeitung deiner Informationen verpflichtet, und wir werden diese Liste von Zeit zu Zeit aktualisieren.
Die Informationskategorien hängen von den jeweiligen Umständen jeder verpflichtenden Anfrage oder Verpflichtung ab. Es werden nur die Informationen verarbeitet, die zur Erfüllung der entsprechenden rechtlichen Verpflichtungen erforderlich sind. Zum Beispiel: Bei Zivilsachen sind dies in der Regel eingeschränkte Informationen (wie Kontaktdaten und Login-Informationen). Je nach den Umständen können jedoch auch folgende Kategorien dazugehören:
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Nachrichten, die du sendest und empfängst, einschließlich ihrer Inhalte, vorbehaltlich des
anwendbaren Rechts
Metadaten zu Inhalten und Nachrichten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du tätigst, einschließlich gekürzter Kreditkartendaten
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Dein Foto- oder Video-Selfie, wenn du es uns zur Verfügung stellst, wenn du uns wegen Support für dein Konto kontaktierst
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Berechtigte Interessen
Wir stützen uns auf unsere berechtigten Interessen bzw. die berechtigten Interessen eines Dritten, sofern nicht deine Interessen oder Grundrechte und Grundfreiheiten überwiegen („berechtigte Interessen“). Im Folgenden werden die verwendeten Informationskategorien dargelegt, auf welche berechtigten Interessen wir uns stützen sowie warum und wie die Informationen verarbeitet werden:
Warum und wie wir deine Informationen verarbeiten
Berechtigte Interessen, auf die wir uns stützen
Informationskategorien, die wir verwenden (mehr über die einzelnen Informationskategorien erfährst du unter „
Welche Informationen erheben wir?
“). Welche Informationen wir tatsächlich verwenden, hängt von deinen tatsächlichen Umständen ab, könnte aber Folgendes umfassen:
Wenn du ein registrierter Nutzer der Meta-Produkte bist
In Bezug auf Personen, die nicht volljährig (in den meisten betreffenden Ländern unter 18 Jahre) sind und nur beschränkt geschäftsfähig in Bezug auf den Abschluss eines durchsetzbaren Vertrags sind, können wir deine Informationen möglicherweise nicht aus Gründen der Erforderlichkeit für die Vertragserfüllung verarbeiten.
Personalisierung der Meta-Produkte: Unsere Systeme verarbeiten automatisch Informationen, die wir im Zusammenhang mit dir und anderen Personen erhoben und gespeichert haben, um deine Interessen und Präferenzen zu bewerten und zu verstehen und dir über die Meta-Produkte hinweg gemäß unseren Nutzungsbedingungen personalisierte Erlebnisse zu bieten. Auf diese Weise:
personalisieren wir Funktionen und Inhalte (wie deinen
News Feed
,
Instagram-Feed
und Stories),
können wir dir auf unseren Produkten bzw. außerhalb dieser Vorschläge unterbreiten (z. B. Personen, die du kennen könntest, Gruppen oder Veranstaltungen, für die du dich interessieren könntest, oder Themen, die du eventuell abonnieren möchtest).
Erfahre mehr dazu
, wie wir Informationen über dich verwenden, um dein Erlebnis in und auf den Meta-Produkten zu personalisieren, und wie wir die Werbeanzeigen auswählen, die dir angezeigt werden.
Um innovative Produkte und Funktionen zu erstellen, bereitzustellen, zu unterstützen und zu erhalten, die es Minderjährigen ermöglichen, sich auszudrücken, zu kommunizieren und für sie interessante Informationen und Gemeinschaften zu entdecken und damit zu interagieren, Gemeinschaften zu bilden und Tools und Funktionen zu nutzen, die ihr Wohlbefinden fördern.
Um wichtige Updates im Zusammenhang mit unseren Produkten mit unseren minderjährigen Nutzern zu teilen und unsere Produkte zu bewerben.
Um die Meta-Produkte auf einheitliche Weise bereitzustellen, zu personalisieren und zu verbessern und gleichzeitig zusätzliche Schutzmaßnahmen für Personen bereitzustellen, die noch nicht das Mündigkeitsalter des jeweiligen Mitgliedsstaats erreicht haben.
Das berechtigte Interesse unserer Nutzer, in der Lage zu sein, auf die Meta-Produkte zuzugreifen und dass diese Produkte für jeden Nutzer personalisiert werden.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast (wie GPS-Standort)
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest
Berichte über die Performance unserer Produkte auf deinem Gerät
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
(außer Verwendung von Partnerdaten, um Werbeanzeigen auf dich zuzuschneiden)
Bereitstellung und Verbesserung unserer Meta-Produkte: Die Bereitstellung der Meta-Produkte umfasst die Erhebung, das Speichern und ggf. Teilen, Profiling, Überprüfen und Kuratieren, die automatisierte Verarbeitung und in einigen Fällen das manuelle (menschliche) Überprüfen, um:
dein Konto und Profil zu erstellen und zu verwalten,
dein Konto für Meta-Produkte (einschließlich deiner öffentlichen Profilinformationen) zur Anmeldung oder Weitergabe deiner Informationen mit einem integrierten Partner zu verknüpfen,
das Teilen von Inhalten und Statusmeldungen zu ermöglichen,
Funktionen bereitzustellen und zu kuratieren,
Messaging-Dienste bereitzustellen sowie die Möglichkeit, Sprach- und Videoanrufe zu tätigen und sich mit anderen zu verbinden,
Werbeprodukte bereitzustellen,
Technologie der künstlichen Intelligenz
in unseren Produkten bereitzustellen und einzupflegen, um die Erstellung von Inhalten wie Text, Audio, Bildern und Videos zu ermöglichen, auch indem deine Nutzung von Inhalten in den Funktionen verstanden und erkannt wird, und
Analysen durchzuführen.
Wir verwenden Informationen, die uns vorliegen, auch, um Verbesserungen an unseren Produkten zu entwickeln, zu erforschen und zu testen. Wir verwenden die von uns erhobenen Informationen zu folgenden Zwecken:
Sehen, ob ein Produkt ordnungsgemäß funktioniert
Nach Fehlern suchen und diese gegebenenfalls beheben
Neue Produkte und Funktionen testen, um deren Funktionalität zu prüfen
Feedback zu unseren Ideen für Produkte oder Funktionen einholen
Durchführung von Umfragen und anderer Forschung dazu, was dir an unseren Produkten und Marken gefällt und was wir noch besser machen können
Um innovative Produkte und Funktionen zu erstellen, bereitzustellen, zu unterstützen und zu erhalten, die es Minderjährigen ermöglichen, sich auszudrücken, zu kommunizieren und für sie interessante Informationen und Gemeinschaften zu entdecken und damit zu interagieren, Gemeinschaften zu bilden und Tools und Funktionen zu nutzen, die ihr Wohlbefinden fördern.
Um es nicht volljährigen Personen zu ermöglichen, die Meta-Produkte auf eine einfache und intuitive Weise zu nutzen und sich mit ihnen zu verbinden.
Um die Meta-Produkte auf einheitliche Weise bereitzustellen, zu personalisieren und zu verbessern und gleichzeitig zusätzliche Schutzmaßnahmen für Personen bereitzustellen, die noch nicht das Mündigkeitsalter des jeweiligen Mitgliedsstaats erreicht haben.
Das berechtigte Interesse unserer Nutzer, in der Lage zu sein, auf die Meta-Produkte zuzugreifen und dass diese Produkte für jeden Nutzer personalisiert werden.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Deine öffentlichen Profilinformationen (darunter Name, Benutzername und Profilbild)
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Nachrichten, die du sendest und empfängst, einschließlich ihrer Inhalte, vorbehaltlich des
anwendbaren Rechts
Metadaten zu Inhalten und Nachrichten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du tätigst, einschließlich gekürzter Kreditkartendaten
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Dein Foto- oder Video-Selfie, wenn du es uns zur Verfügung stellst, wenn du uns wegen Support für dein Konto kontaktierst
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Förderung von Schutz, Integrität und Sicherheit in und auf den Meta-Produkten: Die Meta-Produkte sollen dazu beitragen, den Schutz, die Integrität und die Sicherheit dieser Dienste und der Menschen, die sie nutzen, sicherzustellen. Wir verarbeiten Informationen, die wir mit dir verknüpft haben, und wenden dabei automatisierte Verarbeitungstechniken an und führen in einigen Fällen einen manuellen Review (durch einen Mitarbeiter) durch, um:
Konten und Aktivitäten zu verifizieren,
Verstöße gegen unsere Nutzungsbedingungen oder Richtlinien ermitteln und verfolgen. In einigen Fällen werden die von uns zu Verstößen getroffenen Entscheidungen vom Oversight Board überprüft,
verdächtige Aktivitäten zu untersuchen,
schädliches oder rechtswidriges Verhalten zu erkennen, zu verhindern und zu bekämpfen, z. B. durch Überprüfen und in einigen Fällen Entfernen von Inhalten, die uns gemeldet wurden,
Spam und andere negative Erlebnisse aufzudecken und zu verhindern,
Bedrohungen unseres Personals bzw. Eigentums aufzudecken und zu unterbinden, und
die Integrität unserer Produkte zu wahren.
Um weitere Informationen zu Schutz, Integrität und Sicherheit im Allgemeinen im Zusammenhang mit den Meta-Produkten zu erhalten, besuche den Facebook-Sicherheitsbereich und die Instagram-Sicherheitstipps.
Um unsere Plattform und unser Netzwerk zu sichern, Konten und Aktivitäten zu verifizieren, schädliches Verhalten zu bekämpfen, Spam und andere negative Erlebnisse aufzudecken, zu verhindern und zu beheben, die Meta-Produkte von schädlichen oder unangemessenen Inhalten freizuhalten, verdächtige Aktivitäten oder Verstöße gegen unsere Nutzungsbedingungen oder Richtlinien zu untersuchen und um den Schutz von Minderjährigen sicherzustellen, u. a., um sie vor Ausbeutung oder sonstigen Schäden zu schützen, für die solche Personen eventuell besonders anfällig sind.
Im Interesse unserer Nutzer und der breiten Öffentlichkeit, um negative Erlebnisse zu verhindern und den Schutz, die Integrität und die Sicherheit zu fördern.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Nachrichten, die du sendest und empfängst, einschließlich ihrer Inhalte, vorbehaltlich des
anwendbaren Rechts
Metadaten zu Inhalten und Nachrichten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du tätigst, einschließlich gekürzter Kreditkartendaten
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Kommunikation mit dir:
Wir verwenden die Informationen, die du uns zur Verfügung gestellt hast (wie Kontaktinformationen, die du in deinem Profil eingegeben hast), um dir eine Mitteilung zu senden, wie eine E-Mail oder einen Hinweis in einem Produkt, zum Beispiel in folgenden Fällen:
Wir kontaktieren dich per E-Mail oder per Benachrichtigung innerhalb der Produkte im Zusammenhang mit den Meta-Produkten, produktbezogenen Angelegenheiten, Forschung oder um dich über unsere Nutzungsbedingungen und Richtlinien zu informieren.
Wir verwenden auch Kontaktinformationen wie deine E-Mail-Adresse, um dir zu antworten, wenn du uns kontaktierst.
Um wichtige Updates im Zusammenhang mit unseren Produkten mit unseren minderjährigen Nutzern zu teilen und unsere Produkte zu bewerben.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Kontaktinformationen in deinem Profil und deine Kommunikation mit uns
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
In Bezug auf alle Personen, einschließlich Minderjähriger
Bereitstellung von Messungen, Analysen und anderen Unternehmens-Services für Unternehmen und andere Partner:
Unsere Systeme verarbeiten automatisch, sowie teilweise durch manuelle (menschliche) Verarbeitung, Informationen, die wir über dich und andere erhoben und gespeichert haben. Wir verwenden diese Informationen, um:
Unternehmen und anderen Partnern Einblicke und Messberichte zur Verfügung zu stellen, um ihnen zu helfen, die Effektivität und Verbreitung ihrer Inhalte und Dienste oder der ihrer Kunden zu messen, um zu verstehen, welche Art von Personen ihre Inhalte sehen, und die Performance ihrer Inhalte auf und außerhalb der Meta-Produkte nachzuvollziehen, und
aggregierte Nutzeranalysen und Insights-Berichte bereitzustellen, die Nutzern, Unternehmen und anderen Partnern helfen, beispielsweise die Zielgruppen, mit denen sie in Verbindung treten möchten, besser zu verstehen, sowie die Personengruppen, die ihre Produkte und Dienste nutzen und wie Personen mit ihren Inhalten, Websites, Apps, Produkten und Diensten interagieren, einschließlich der Verbindung zu Meta-Produkten, der Leistung dieser Verbindung und Netzwerke sowie der Nutzererfahrung damit.
In unserem Interesse, um genaue und zuverlässige Berichte für unsere Unternehmen und sonstigen Partner bereitzustellen, um eine genaue Preisgestaltung und genaue Performancestatistiken sicherzustellen, um den Wert aufzuzeigen, den unsere Partner durch die Nutzung der Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen realisieren, und um unseren sonstigen Partnern angemessene Zahlungs- und Abrechnungsoptionen zur Verfügung zu stellen, und
im Interesse von Entwicklern und sonstigen Partnern, um ihnen zu helfen, Erkenntnisse über ihre Kunden zu erlangen und ihre Geschäfte zu verbessern, unsere Preismodelle zu validieren und die Effektivität ihrer Produkte, Dienste, Online-Inhalte auf und außerhalb von den Produkten der Meta-Unternehmen zu bewerten.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, und zu deiner Verbindung, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Berichte über die Performance unserer Produkte auf deinem Gerät
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Wenn wir dir Werbung auf Meta-Produkten zeigen:
Bereitstellung von Messungen, Analysen und anderen Unternehmens-Services für Unternehmen, Werbetreibende und andere Partner:
Unsere Systeme verarbeiten automatisch, sowie teilweise durch manuelle (menschliche) Verarbeitung, Informationen, die wir über dich und andere erhoben und gespeichert haben. Wir verwenden diese Informationen, um:
Unternehmen, Werbetreibenden und anderen Partnern Einblicke und Messberichte zur Verfügung zu stellen, um ihnen zu helfen, die Effektivität und Verbreitung ihrer Werbeanzeigen, Inhalte und Dienste oder der ihrer Kunden zu messen, um zu verstehen, welche Art von Personen ihre Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen sehen, und die Performance ihrer Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen auf und außerhalb der Meta-Produkte nachzuvollziehen, und
aggregierte Nutzeranalysen und Insights-Berichte bereitzustellen, die Unternehmen, Werbetreibenden und anderen Partnern helfen, beispielsweise die Zielgruppen, mit denen sie in Verbindung treten möchten, besser zu verstehen, sowie die Personengruppen, die ihre Produkte und Dienste nutzen und wie Personen mit ihren Websites, Apps, Produkten und Diensten interagieren, einschließlich der Verbindung zu Meta-Produkten, der Leistung dieser Verbindung und Netzwerke sowie der Nutzererfahrung damit.
In unserem Interesse, um genaue und zuverlässige Berichte für unsere Unternehmen, Werbetreibenden, und sonstigen Partner bereitzustellen, um eine genaue Preisgestaltung und genaue Performancestatistiken sicherzustellen, um den Wert aufzuzeigen, den unsere Partner durch die Nutzung der Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen realisieren, und um unseren Werbetreibenden und sonstigen Partnern angemessene Zahlungs- und Abrechnungsoptionen zur Verfügung zu stellen, und
Im Interesse von Werbetreibenden, Entwicklern und sonstigen Partnern, um ihnen zu helfen, Erkenntnisse über ihre Kunden zu erlangen und ihre Geschäfte zu verbessern, unsere Preismodelle zu validieren und die Effektivität ihrer Produkte, Dienste, Online-Inhalte und Werbung auf und außerhalb von den Produkten der Meta-Unternehmen zu bewerten.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, und zu deiner Verbindung, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Berichte über die Performance unserer Produkte auf deinem Gerät
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Kommunikation, Interaktion und Teilen von Inhalten über die Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen hinweg:
Um ein nahtloses, einheitliches und reichhaltigeres, innovatives Erlebnis über die Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen hinweg bereitzustellen und Interaktionen über verschiedene Apps hinweg sowie das Teilen, Anzeigen und Interagieren mit Inhalten, einschließlich Posts und Videos, zu ermöglichen.
In unserem Interesse, um nahtlose, einheitliche und reichhaltigere, innovative Kommunikation, Interaktion und Teilen von Erlebnissen über die Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen hinweg zu ermöglichen.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, und zu deiner Verbindung, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Berichte über die Performance unserer Produkte auf deinem Gerät
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Business Intelligence und Statistik:
Um in aggregierter Form deine Nutzung unserer Produkte und über diese hinweg zu verstehen, um Personen und Unternehmen richtig zählen zu können und
Kennzahlen im direkten Zusammenhang damit zu bestätigen, um zu informieren und die Produktrichtung und ‑entwicklung zu verbessern, und um Berichtspflichten (gegenüber Aktionären/hinsichtlich Gewinnen) nachzukommen.
In unserem Interesse, um die Nutzung unserer Produkte zu messen und die Personen zu zählen, die mit unseren Produkten interagieren, um zu informieren und die Produktrichtung und ‑entwicklung zu verbessern und um die Bereitstellung richtiger und zuverlässiger Berichte sicherzustellen.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten und Nachrichten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Bereitstellen von Marketingmitteilungen für dich:
Je nach deinen Einstellungen senden wir dir von Zeit zu Zeit Marketingmitteilungen.
Wir erheben und speichern deine Informationen und verwenden sie, um dir Marketingmitteilungen zu senden, wie z. B. eine E-Mail.
In unserem Interesse, die Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen zu bewerben und unser Direktmarketing zu versenden.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Informationen und Inhalte, die du zur Verfügung stellst, einschließlich deiner Kontaktinformationen wie z. B. deine E-Mail-Adresse
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Gerätekennungen
Forschung und Innovation für soziale Zwecke:
Wir führen Umfragen durch und verwenden Informationen (u. a. von Forschern, mit denen wir zusammenarbeiten), um Forschung und Innovation zu Themen des sozialen Allgemeinwohls, des technologischen Fortschritts, des öffentlichen Interesses, der Gesundheit und des Wohlergehens durchzuführen und zu unterstützen.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir die uns über Migrationsmuster in Krisensituationen zur Verfügung stehenden Informationen. Dies unterstützt Hilfsorganisationen dabei, Hilfsmittel und Unterstützung an die richtigen Orte zu bringen.
Wir erheben, speichern, verknüpfen, analysieren und wenden automatische Verarbeitungstechniken wie Aggregation von Informationen sowie manuelle (menschliche) Überprüfungen an und teilen Informationen, soweit dies erforderlich ist, um auf diese Weise Forschung zu betreiben und Innovationen für soziale Zwecke zu fördern.
Wir unterstützen die Forschung in Bereichen wie künstliche Intelligenz und maschinelles Lernen.
Erfahre mehr
zu unseren Forschungsprogrammen.
In unserem Interesse und im Interesse der allgemeinen Öffentlichkeit, um den Stand der Technik bzw. das wissenschaftliche Verständnis bezüglich wichtiger sozialer Themen zu fördern, die unsere Gesellschaft und Welt positiv beeinflussen.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten und Nachrichten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Anonymisieren deiner Informationen
In einigen Fällen anonymisieren wir Informationen, die uns über dich vorliegen, z. B. deine Aktivität auf und außerhalb von unseren Produkten, und nutzen die daraus resultierenden Informationen beispielsweise, um unsere Meta-Produkte, einschließlich Werbeanzeigen, bereitzustellen und zu verbessern.
In unserem Interesse zur Finanzierung unserer Bereitstellung der Meta-Produkte, Bereitstellung relevanter Werbeanzeigen für Nutzer und Verbesserung der Anzeigenauslieferung und Meta-Produkte;
Im Interesse von Werbetreibenden, um ihnen zu helfen, relevante Zielgruppen, die an ihren Informationen, Produkten oder Diensten interessiert sein könnten, zu erreichen;
Im Interesse von Nutzern, damit Meta Datenminimierung und eingebauten Datenschutz in Bezug auf ihre Informationen praktizieren kann
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, und zu deiner Verbindung, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Berichte über die Performance unserer Produkte auf deinem Gerät
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Weitergabe von Informationen an andere, einschließlich Strafverfolgungsbehörden, und um auf rechtliche Anfragen zu reagieren.
Informationen darüber, wann wir Informationen an Strafverfolgungsbehörden und andere weitergeben, findest du unter
Wie reagieren wir auf rechtliche Anfragen, verhindern Schäden und fördern den Schutz und die Sicherheit?
Die Informationskategorien, auf die wir zugreifen, die wir aufbewahren, nutzen und teilen, hängen von den jeweiligen Umständen ab. Beispiel: Bei Reaktionen auf rechtliche Anfragen, zu denen wir gesetzlich nicht verpflichtet sind, sind dies in der Regel eingeschränkte Informationen (wie Kontaktdaten und Login-Informationen).
Die Informationen, die wir verarbeiten, hängen jedoch von den Verarbeitungszwecken ab, zu denen folgende gehören können:
als Reaktion auf
rechtliche Anfragen
von Dritten wie zum Beispiel von Prozessführenden in Zivilprozessen oder von Strafverfolgungs- und anderen Behörden.
um anwendbares Recht einzuhalten oder legitime rechtliche Zwecke zu erfüllen.
um den Schutz, die Sicherheit und die Integrität von Meta, Meta-Produkten, Produkten, der Nutzer, der Mitarbeiter, des Eigentums und der Öffentlichkeit zu fördern.
Erfahre mehr dazu
, wie wir Schutz, Sicherheit und Integrität fördern.
In unserem Interesse und im Interesse der allgemeinen Öffentlichkeit, um Betrug, eine unberechtigte Nutzung der Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen, Verstöße gegen unsere Nutzungsbedingungen oder Richtlinien sowie sonstige schädliche oder illegale Aktivitäten zu verhindern und zu verfolgen; um uns (einschließlich unserer Rechte, des Personals und des Eigentums von Meta bzw. der Meta-Produkte), unsere Nutzer oder andere zu schützen, u. a. im Rahmen von Untersuchungen oder Anfragen von Behörden; oder um den Tod oder eine drohende Körperverletzung zu verhindern.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Dein Foto- oder Video-Selfie, wenn du es uns zur Verfügung stellst, wenn du uns wegen Support für dein Konto kontaktierst
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Förderung des Schutzes, der Integrität und der Sicherheit unter bestimmten Umständen außerhalb der Erfüllung unserer Verträge mit dir:
Unsere Meta-Produkte werden bereitgestellt, um den Schutz, die Integrität und die Sicherheit dieser Dienste und der Menschen, die sie nutzen, sicherzustellen.
Wir führen automatisierte Verarbeitungen sowie manuelle (menschliche) Überprüfungen durch, um Konten und Aktivitäten zu verifizieren, schädliches Verhalten zu bekämpfen, Spam und sonstige Sicherheitsangelegenheiten sowie negative Erlebnisse anderer Art aufzudecken und zu verhindern, die Integrität unserer Produkte aufrechtzuerhalten und den Schutz, die Integrität und die Sicherheit auf und außerhalb der Meta-Produkte zu fördern.
Zum Beispiel verwenden wir uns zur Verfügung stehende Informationen, um verdächtige Aktivitäten oder Verletzungen unserer Nutzungsbedingungen oder Richtlinien zu untersuchen oder um zu erkennen, wenn jemand Hilfe benötigt.
Mehr dazu erfährst du im
Facebook-Sicherheitsbereich
und in den
Instagram-Sicherheitstipps
.
In unserem Interesse, unsere Plattform und unser Netzwerk zu sichern, Konten und Aktivitäten zu verifizieren, schädliches Verhalten zu bekämpfen, Spam und andere negative Erlebnisse aufzudecken, zu verhindern und zu verfolgen, die Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen von schädlichen oder unangemessenen Inhalten freizuhalten und um verdächtige Aktivitäten oder Verstöße gegen unsere Nutzungsbedingungen oder Richtlinien zu untersuchen und diesbezüglich Maßnahmen zu ergreifen; und
Im Interesse unserer Nutzer und der breiten Öffentlichkeit, um negative Erlebnisse zu verhindern und den Schutz, die Integrität und die Sicherheit zu fördern.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du tätigst, einschließlich gekürzter Kreditkartendaten
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Dein Foto- oder Video-Selfie, wenn du es uns zur Verfügung stellst, wenn du uns wegen Support für dein Konto kontaktierst
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Weitergabe deiner Kontakt-, Profil- oder sonstiger Informationen an Dritte auf Antrag von dir:
Du kannst freiwillig deine Kontakt- und Profilinformationen und andere Daten mit unseren Partnern teilen: Die Arten von Partnern, mit denen die Informationen geteilt werden, hängt davon ab, welche Features unseres Dienstes du nutzt und wie du sie nutzt. Wenn du beispielsweise dein Facebook-Konto mit der App eines Partners verbindest, kannst du freiwillig deine E-Mail-Adresse, deinen Geburtstag, deine Freundesliste, deine Heimatstadt oder andere Informationen mit diesem Partner teilen.
Um Nutzern der Apps unserer Partner hochwertige Erfahrungen zu bieten, entsprechend unserem Interesse und dem Interesse unserer Nutzer.
Um Nutzererlebnisse in den Partner-Apps zu ermöglichen und zu verbessern, entsprechend dem Interesse unserer Partner, die Nutzererfahrungen in ihren Apps ermöglichen und verbessern möchten.
Informationen, die du bereitstellst (beispielsweise E-Mail-Adresse, Geburtstag, Freundesliste und Heimatstadt).
Wenn du ein Gerät benutzt, das wir nicht mit einem registrierten Nutzer der Meta-Produkte verknüpfen können
Förderung von Schutz, Integrität und Sicherheit:
Unsere Meta-Produkte werden in einer Weise bereitgestellt, die den Schutz, die Integrität und die Sicherheit dieser Dienste und der Menschen, die sie nutzen, sicherstellen soll.
Wir erheben und speichern Informationen, die uns für diesen Zweck zur Verfügung stehen und führen automatisierte Verarbeitungen und manuelle (d. h. menschliche) Überprüfungen durch, um Konten und Aktivitäten zu verifizieren, schädliches Verhalten zu bekämpfen, Spam und sonstige Sicherheitsangelegenheiten sowie negative Erlebnisse anderer Art aufzudecken und zu verhindern, die Integrität unserer Produkte aufrechtzuerhalten und den Schutz, die Integrität und die Sicherheit auf und außerhalb der Meta-Produkte zu untersuchen und zu fördern.
Zum Beispiel verwenden wir uns zur Verfügung stehende Informationen, um verdächtige Aktivitäten oder Verletzungen unserer Nutzungsbedingungen oder Richtlinien zu untersuchen oder um zu erkennen, wenn jemand Hilfe benötigt.
Mehr dazu erfährst du im
Facebook-Sicherheitsbereich
und in den
Instagram-Sicherheitstipps
.
In unserem Interesse, unsere Plattform und unser Netzwerk zu sichern, Konten und Aktivitäten zu verifizieren, schädliches Verhalten zu bekämpfen, Spam und andere negative Erlebnisse aufzudecken, zu verhindern und zu verfolgen, die Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen von schädlichen oder unangemessenen Inhalten freizuhalten und um verdächtige Aktivitäten oder Verstöße gegen unsere Nutzungsbedingungen oder Richtlinien zu untersuchen und diesbezüglich Maßnahmen zu ergreifen; und
Im Interesse unserer Nutzer im Allgemeinen und der breiten Öffentlichkeit, um negative Erlebnisse zu verhindern und den Schutz, die Integrität und die Sicherheit zu fördern.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Bereitstellen von Marketingmitteilungen für dich: Wir erheben und speichern deine Informationen und verwenden sie, um dir Marketingmitteilungen zu senden, wie z. B. eine E-Mail.
In unserem Interesse, die Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen zu bewerben und unser Direktmarketing zu versenden.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Informationen und Inhalte, die du zur Verfügung stellst, einschließlich deiner Kontaktinformationen wie z. B. deiner E-Mail-Adresse
Forschung und Innovation für soziale Zwecke:
Wir führen Umfragen durch und verwenden Informationen (u. a. von Forschungspartnern, mit denen wir zusammenarbeiten), um Forschung und Innovation zu Themen des sozialen Allgemeinwohls, des technologischen Fortschritts, des öffentlichen Interesses, der Gesundheit und des Wohlergehens durchzuführen und zu unterstützen.
Wir erheben, speichern, verknüpfen, analysieren und wenden automatische Verarbeitungstechniken wie Aggregation auf Informationen sowie manuelle (menschliche) Überprüfungen im erforderlichen Maß an, um auf diese Weise Forschung zu betreiben und Innovationen für soziale Zwecke zu fördern.
Wir unterstützen die Forschung in Bereichen wie künstliche Intelligenz und maschinelles Lernen.
Erfahre mehr
zu unseren Forschungsprogrammen.
In unserem Interesse und im Interesse der allgemeinen Öffentlichkeit, um den Stand der Technik bzw. das wissenschaftliche Verständnis bezüglich wichtiger sozialer Themen zu fördern, die unsere Gesellschaft und Welt positiv beeinflussen.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Weitergabe von Informationen an andere, einschließlich Strafverfolgungsbehörden, und um auf
rechtliche Anfragen
zu reagieren.
Informationen darüber, wann wir Informationen an Strafverfolgungsbehörden und andere weitergeben, findest du unter
Wie reagieren wir auf rechtliche Anfragen, verhindern Schäden und fördern den Schutz und die Sicherheit?
.
Die Informationskategorien, auf die wir zugreifen, die wir aufbewahren, nutzen und teilen, hängen von den jeweiligen Umständen ab. Beispiel: Bei Reaktionen auf rechtliche Anfragen, zu denen wir gesetzlich nicht verpflichtet sind, sind dies in der Regel eingeschränkte Informationen (wie Kontaktdaten und Login-Informationen).
Die Informationen, die wir verarbeiten, hängen jedoch von den Verarbeitungszwecken ab, zu denen folgende gehören können:
als Reaktion auf
rechtliche Anfragen
von Dritten wie zum Beispiel von Prozessführenden in Zivilprozessen oder von Strafverfolgungs- und anderen Behörden.
um anwendbares Recht einzuhalten oder legitime rechtliche Zwecke zu erfüllen.
um den Schutz, die Sicherheit und die Integrität von Meta, Meta-Produkten, Produkten, der Nutzer, der Mitarbeiter, des Eigentums und der Öffentlichkeit zu fördern.
Erfahre mehr dazu
, wie wir Schutz, Sicherheit und Integrität fördern.
In unserem Interesse und im Interesse der allgemeinen Öffentlichkeit, um Betrug, eine unberechtigte Nutzung der Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen, Verstöße gegen unsere Nutzungsbedingungen oder Richtlinien sowie sonstige schädliche oder illegale Aktivitäten zu verhindern und zu verfolgen; um uns (einschließlich unserer Rechte, des Personals und des Eigentums von Meta bzw. der Meta-Produkte), unsere Nutzer oder andere zu schützen, u. a. im Rahmen von Untersuchungen oder Anfragen von Behörden; oder um den Tod oder eine drohende Körperverletzung zu verhindern.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Um unsere Produkte bereitzustellen und zu verbessern:
Wir verwenden die von uns erhobenen Informationen zu folgenden Zwecken:
Produkte bereitstellen und Features kuratieren
Sehen, ob ein Produkt ordnungsgemäß funktioniert
Nach Fehlern suchen und diese gegebenenfalls beheben
Neue Produkte und Funktionen testen, um deren Funktionalität zu prüfen
Feedback zu unseren Ideen für Produkte oder Funktionen einholen
Durchführung von Umfragen und anderer Forschung dazu, was dir an unseren Produkten und Marken gefällt und was wir noch besser machen können
Um die Produkte der Meta-Unternehmen auf einheitliche Weise zu verbessern, um technische Funktionsstörungen zu beheben und um die Funktionalität zu optimieren
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Wenn wir deine Informationen verarbeiten, weil dies notwendig ist, um unsere berechtigten Interessen oder die eines Dritten zu verfolgen, hast du das Recht, Widerspruch einzulegen und die Einschränkung der Verarbeitung zu beantragen. Um dein Recht auszuüben, gehe zu den
Facebook-Einstellungen
, zum
Hilfebereich
und zu den Instagram-Einstellungen.
Wir werden verschiedene Faktoren berücksichtigen, wenn wir einen Widerspruch bewerten, wie unter anderem: die angemessenen Erwartungen unserer Nutzer; die Nutzen und Risiken für dich, uns, andere Nutzer oder Dritte; sowie sonstige verfügbare Mittel zur Erreichung desselben Zwecks, die möglicherweise weniger invasiv sind und keinen unverhältnismäßigen Aufwand erfordern. Sofern wir nicht feststellen, dass wir zwingende berechtigte Gründe für diese Verarbeitung haben, die deine Interessen oder Grundrechte und Grundfreiheiten überwiegen, oder sofern die Verarbeitung nicht aus rechtlichen Gründen erforderlich ist, wird deinem Widerspruch stattgegeben und wir werden die Verarbeitung deiner Informationen einstellen. Weitere Informationen zu den Umständen, unter denen ein Widerspruch erfolgreich sein kann, findest du im
Hilfebereich
.
Wenn du in deinem Land minderjährig bist und kein durchsetzbarer Vertrag besteht, werden wir die Tatsache, dass du minderjährig bist, besonders berücksichtigen, wenn wir unsere Bewertung unserer berechtigten Interessen sowie die Abwägung deiner Interessen und Rechte durchführen. Wir stellen Minderjährigen einen besonderen Schutz bereit, um sicherzustellen, dass sie sich der Risiken, Folgen, Schutzmaßnahmen und Rechte bewusst sind, die mit der Verarbeitung ihrer Informationen verbunden sind.
Im öffentlichen Interesse durchgeführte Aufgaben
Die Zwecke, für die wir die Verarbeitung deiner Informationen als Aufgabe im öffentlichen Interesse erwarten, die Verarbeitung, die wir vornehmen, und die Informationen, die wir verwenden, werden nachstehend dargelegt:
Warum und wie wir deine Informationen verarbeiten
Informationskategorien, die wir verwenden (mehr über die einzelnen Informationskategorien erfährst du unter „
Welche Informationen erheben wir?
“). Welche Informationen wir tatsächlich verwenden, hängt von deinen tatsächlichen Umständen ab, könnte aber Folgendes umfassen:
Forschung für soziale Zwecke: Wir erheben, speichern, verknüpfen, analysieren und wenden automatische Verarbeitungstechniken wie Aggregation auf Informationen sowie manuelle (menschliche) Überprüfungen an, um auf diese Weise Forschung zu betreiben und andere Aufgaben zu erledigen, die im öffentlichen Interesse sind, beispielsweise Teilen relevanter Forschungsdaten mit Dritten wie internationalen Organisationen und Wissenschaftlern innerhalb und außerhalb des EWR. Das öffentliche Interesse muss im Unionsrecht oder im Recht der Mitgliedstaaten oder anderen anwendbaren Gesetzen, denen wir unterliegen, festgelegt sein. In diesem Fall stützen wir uns auf die Artikel 168 und 179 des Vertrags über die Arbeitsweise der Europäischen Union.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du ausführst
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Zur Förderung von Schutz, Integrität und Sicherheit: Unter spezifischen tatsächlichen Umständen greifen wir auf deine Daten zu, bewahren sie auf und geben sie an Aufsichtsbehörden, Strafverfolgungsbehörden oder andere weiter, wenn dies zur Erfüllung einer Aufgabe im öffentlichen Interesse erforderlich ist. So können wir beispielsweise Informationen mit anderen zum Zwecke der Bekämpfung rechtswidrigen oder schädlichen Verhaltens teilen, wenn dies im öffentlichen Interesse liegt und wenn das öffentliche Interesse im Unionsrecht oder im Recht der Mitgliedstaaten oder in anderen anwendbaren Gesetzen, denen wir unterliegen, festgelegt ist. In diesem Fall stützen wir uns auf Section 53 des Data Protection Act 2018 und auf die Verordnung (EU) 2021/1232.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Metadaten zu Inhalten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du tätigst, einschließlich gekürzter Kreditkartendaten
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Wenn wir deine Informationen so verarbeiten, wie es für die Wahrnehmung einer im öffentlichen Interesse liegenden Aufgabe erforderlich ist, hast du das Recht, unserer Verarbeitung zu widersprechen und ihre Einschränkung zu verlangen. Um deine Rechte auszuüben, gehe zu den
Facebook-Einstellungen
, zum
Hilfebereich
und den Instagram-Einstellungen. Bei der Bewertung eines Widerspruchs werden wir verschiedene Faktoren berücksichtigen, wie unter anderem: die vernünftigen Erwartungen unserer Nutzer; Nutzen und Risiken für dich, uns, andere Nutzer oder Dritte; sowie sonstige verfügbare Mittel zur Erreichung desselben Zwecks, die möglicherweise weniger invasiv sind und keinen unverhältnismäßigen Aufwand erfordern.
Dein Widerspruch wird aufrechterhalten, und wir werden die Verarbeitung deiner Daten einstellen, es sei denn, wir stellen fest, dass wir zwingende berechtigte Gründe für diese Verarbeitung haben, die deine Interessen oder Grundrechte und -freiheiten überwiegen, oder dass die Verarbeitung aus rechtlichen Gründen erforderlich ist. Weitere Informationen zu den Umständen, unter denen ein Widerspruch erfolgreich sein kann, findest du im
Hilfebereich
.
Schutz deiner wesentlichen Interessen oder der einer anderen Person
Die verwendeten Informationskategorien, warum wir deine Informationen zum Schutz deiner wesentlichen Interessen oder der lebenswichtigen Interessen einer anderen Person verarbeiten, und wie die Verarbeitung erfolgt, werden im Folgenden aufgeführt.
Warum und wie wir deine Informationen verarbeiten
Informationskategorien, die wir verwenden (mehr über die einzelnen Informationskategorien erfährst du unter „
Welche Informationen erheben wir?
“). Welche Informationen wir tatsächlich verwenden, hängt von deinen tatsächlichen Umständen ab, könnte aber Folgendes umfassen:
Schutz deiner wesentlichen Interessen und/oder der wesentlichen Interessen einer anderen Person: Wir verwenden automatische Verarbeitungstechniken, führen manuelle (menschliche) Überprüfungen durch und geben Informationen in Situationen, in denen die wesentlichen Interessen von jemandem Schutz bedürfen, z. B. in Notfällen, weiter, unter anderem an Strafverfolgungsbehörden und andere. Zu diesen wesentlichen Interessen zählen der Schutz des Lebens, der körperlichen und psychischen Gesundheit, des Wohlbefindens oder der Integrität von dir oder anderen sowie das Erkennen, Entfernen und Melden illegaler Inhalte. Durch den Schutz dieser wesentlichen Interessen möchten wir schädliches Verhalten bekämpfen und den Schutz, die Integrität und die Sicherheit fördern, beispielsweise wenn wir Meldungen über schädliches Verhalten nachgehen oder geeignete Maßnahmen ergreifen, wie die Weitergabe von Informationen an zuständige Behörden, wenn jemand Hilfe benötigt.
Deine Aktivitäten und die von dir bereitgestellten Informationen
:
Inhalte, die du erstellst, wie Beiträge, Kommentare oder Audio
Inhalte, die du über unsere Kamerafunktion oder deine Einstellungen für Aufnahmen oder über unsere sprachgestützten Funktionen bereitstellst
Nachrichten, die du sendest und empfängst, einschließlich ihrer Inhalte,
vorbehaltlich des anwendbaren Rechts
Metadaten zu Inhalten und Nachrichten
Die Arten von Inhalten, die du dir ansiehst bzw. mit denen du interagierst und wie du mit ihnen interagierst.
Die Apps und Funktionen, die du nutzt, und welche Handlungen du in ihnen durchführst
Käufe oder andere Transaktionen, die du tätigst, einschließlich gekürzter Kreditkartendaten
Hashtags, die du verwendest
Zeitpunkt, Häufigkeit und Dauer deiner Aktivitäten auf unseren Produkten
Dein Foto- oder Video-Selfie, wenn du es uns zur Verfügung stellst, wenn du uns wegen Support für dein Konto kontaktierst
Freunde, Abonnenten und andere Kontakte
App-, Browser- und Geräteinformationen
:
Geräteeigenschaften und Gerätesoftware
Was du gerade auf deinem Gerät tust, z. B. ob sich unsere App im Vordergrund befindet oder ob sich deine Maus bewegt (dies kann dabei helfen, Menschen von Robotern zu unterscheiden).
Identifikatoren, die dein Gerät von dem/den Gerät(en) anderer Nutzer unterscheiden
Gerätesignale
Informationen, die du über deine Geräteeinstellungen geteilt hast
Standortbezogene Informationen
Informationen zum Netzwerk, mit dem du dein Gerät verbindest, einschließlich deiner IP-Adresse
Informationen von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien
Informationen von Partnern, Anbietern und Dritten
Die Verwendung von Cookies durch Facebook in diesem Browser erlauben?
Wir verwenden Cookies und ähnliche Technologien, um Inhalte in Facebook-Produkten bereitzustellen und zu verbessern, um mithilfe der durch Cookies auf und außerhalb von Facebook empfangenen Informationen die Sicherheit zu verbessern, sowie um Facebook-Produkte für Personen bereitzustellen und zu verbessern, die bereits ein Konto haben.
Weitere Informationen zu erforderlichen und optionalen Cookies
In unserer
Cookie-Richtlinie
erfährst du mehr über Cookies und wie wir sie verwenden. Dort kannst du deine Auswahl außerdem jederzeit überprüfen oder ändern.
Alle Cookies erlauben
Nur erforderliche Cookies erlauben
Die Verwendung von Cookies durch Facebook in diesem Browser erlauben?
Wir verwenden Cookies und ähnliche Technologien, um Inhalte in Facebook-Produkten bereitzustellen und zu verbessern, um mithilfe der durch Cookies auf und außerhalb von Facebook empfangenen Informationen die Sicherheit zu verbessern, sowie um Facebook-Produkte für Personen bereitzustellen und zu verbessern, die bereits ein Konto haben.
Weitere Informationen zu erforderlichen und optionalen Cookies
In unserer
Cookie-Richtlinie
erfährst du mehr über Cookies und wie wir sie verwenden. Dort kannst du deine Auswahl außerdem jederzeit überprüfen oder ändern.
Alle Cookies erlauben
Nur erforderliche Cookies erlauben
Sub-policy 1
https://www.google.de/intl/de/policies/privacy/:
Datenschutzerklärung & Nutzungsbedingungen
Übersicht
Datenschutzerklärung
Nutzungsbedingungen
Technologien
Häufig gestellte Fragen
Google-Konto
Datenschutzerklärung
Einführung
Von Google erhobene Daten
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Datenweitergabe
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Anforderungen in Europa
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Rahmenbedingungen für Datenübermittlungen
Wichtige Begriffe
Partner
Aktualisierungen
Google-Datenschutzerklärung
Wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, vertrauen Sie uns Ihre Daten an. Wir sind uns bewusst, dass dies eine große Verantwortung ist und setzen alles daran, Ihre Daten zu schützen und zu gewährleisten, dass Sie die Kontrolle darüber behalten.
In dieser Datenschutzerklärung erfahren Sie, welche Daten von uns erhoben werden, welche Zwecke wir damit verfolgen und wie Sie Ihre Daten aktualisieren, verwalten, exportieren und löschen können.
Wenn das Datenschutzrecht der Europäischen Union oder des Vereinigten Königreichs auf die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Anwendung findet, finden Sie unten im Abschnitt
Anforderungen in Europa
weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten sowie zur Einhaltung dieser Gesetze durch Google.
Privatsphärecheck
Sie möchten Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen ändern?
Privatsphärecheck machen
Wirksam ab dem 16. September 2024
|
Archivierte Versionen
|
PDF herunterladen
Inhalt
Einführung
Von Google erhobene Daten
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Datenweitergabe
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Anforderungen in Europa
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Wir entwickeln eine Vielzahl von Diensten, die Millionen von Menschen Tag für Tag helfen, die Welt ganz neu zu entdecken und mit ihr zu interagieren. Zu unseren Diensten zählen:
Google-Apps, -Websites und -Geräte, wie die Google-Suche, YouTube und Google Home
Plattformen wie der Chrome-Browser und das Android-Betriebssystem
Produkte, die in Apps und Websites von Drittanbietern integriert sind, wie Werbe- und Analyseprodukte und das eingebettete Google Maps
Sie können unsere Dienste auf vielfältige Weise nutzen, um Ihre Privatsphäre zu verwalten. So haben Sie beispielsweise die Möglichkeit, sich für ein Google-Konto zu registrieren, wenn Sie Inhalte wie E-Mails und Fotos erstellen und verwalten oder relevantere Suchergebnisse erhalten möchten. Sie können auch zahlreiche Google-Dienste nutzen, ohne sich anzumelden oder ein Konto zu erstellen, beispielsweise wenn Sie die Google Suche verwenden oder sich YouTube-Videos ansehen. Außerdem ist es möglich, in einem privaten Modus im Web zu surfen, etwa im
Inkognitomodus von Chrome
, sodass andere Personen, die Ihr Gerät verwenden, nicht sehen können, welche Inhalte Sie aufgerufen haben. Bei allen unseren Diensten können Sie Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen ändern und so festlegen, ob wir manche Arten von Daten erheben und wie wir sie verwenden.
Um Ihnen unsere Datenschutzerklärung möglichst verständlich zu machen, haben wir Beispiele, Videos und Definitionen für
Schlüsselbegriffe
angefügt. Wenn Sie dennoch Fragen dazu haben,
können Sie uns gern kontaktieren
.
Von Google erhobene Daten
Im Folgenden erklären wir Ihnen, welche Arten von Daten wir erheben, während Sie unsere Dienste nutzen
Wir erheben Daten, um allen unseren Nutzern bessere Dienste zur Verfügung zu stellen – von der Feststellung grundlegender Informationen wie zum Beispiel Ihrer Sprache bis hin zu komplexeren Fragen wie zum Beispiel
Werbung, die Sie besonders nützlich finden
, den
Personen, mit denen Sie online am häufigsten zu tun haben
, oder den YouTube-Videos, die Sie interessant finden. Welche Daten Google erhebt und wie diese verwendet werden hängt davon ab, wie Sie unsere Dienste nutzen und wie Sie Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen verwalten.
Wenn Sie nicht in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, speichern wir die von uns erhobenen Daten mit
eindeutigen Kennungen
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem
Gerät
verknüpft sind, welche Sie verwenden. Auf diese Weise können wir verschiedene Dinge tun, wie beispielsweise Ihre Einstellungen über Browsersitzungen hinweg beibehalten, zum Beispiel Ihre bevorzugte Sprache oder ob Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse oder Werbung auf Grundlage Ihrer Aktivitäten sehen möchten.
Wenn Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, erheben wir auch Daten, die wir in Ihrem Google-Konto speichern und als
personenbezogene Daten
erachten.
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste bereitstellen
Wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen, stellen Sie uns
personenbezogene Daten
zur Verfügung, darunter Ihren Namen und ein Passwort. Sie können Ihrem Konto auch eine
Telefonnummer
oder
Zahlungsinformationen
hinzufügen. Selbst wenn Sie nicht bei einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, können Sie uns Daten zur Verfügung stellen, etwa eine E-Mail-Adresse, um mit Google zu kommunizieren oder Benachrichtigungen zu unseren Diensten zu erhalten.
Wir erheben auch die Inhalte, die Sie bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste erstellen, hochladen oder von anderen erhalten. Dazu gehören beispielsweise E-Mails, die Sie verfassen und empfangen, Fotos und Videos, die Sie speichern, Dokumente und Tabellen, die Sie erstellen, und Kommentare, die Sie zu YouTube-Videos schreiben.
Daten, die wir bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste erheben
Ihre Apps, Browser und Geräte
Wir erheben Daten über die Apps, Browser und
Geräte
, die Sie beim Zugriff auf Google-Dienste verwenden. Das hilft uns, Funktionen wie automatische Produktupdates anzubieten oder Ihren Bildschirm zu dimmen, wenn Ihr Akku schwach ist.
Zu den von uns erhobenen Daten zählen
eindeutige Kennungen
, der Typ und die Einstellungen des Browsers, der Typ und die Einstellungen des Geräts, das Betriebssystem, Informationen zum Mobilfunknetz wie der Name des Mobilfunkanbieters und die Telefonnummer sowie die Versionsnummer der App. Wir erheben auch Daten über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten. Hierzu zählen u. a. die
IP-Adresse
, Absturzberichte, Systemaktivitäten sowie das Datum, die Uhrzeit und die Verweis-URL Ihrer Anfrage.
Wir erheben diese Daten, wenn ein Google-Dienst auf Ihrem Gerät unsere Server kontaktiert, beispielsweise wenn Sie eine App vom Play Store installieren oder wenn ein Dienst automatische Updates abfragt. Wenn Sie ein
Android-Gerät mit Google Apps
verwenden, kontaktiert Ihr Gerät regelmäßig die Google-Server, um Daten über Ihr Gerät und die Verbindung zu unseren Diensten bereitzustellen. Zu diesen Daten zählen beispielsweise
der Typ Ihres Geräts und der Name Ihres Mobilfunkanbieters
, Absturzberichte, die von Ihnen installierten Apps und, abhängig von den Einstellungen auf Ihrem Gerät,
weitere Informationen dazu, wie Sie Ihr Android-Gerät verwenden
.
Ihre Aktivitäten
Wir erheben in unseren Diensten Daten zu Ihren Aktivitäten. Diese Daten verwenden wir beispielsweise, um Ihnen ein YouTube-Video zu empfehlen, das Ihnen gefallen könnte. Unter anderem könnten folgende Aktivitätsdaten erhoben werden:
Begriffe, nach denen Sie suchen
Videos, die Sie sich ansehen
Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen, die Sie sich ansehen und mit denen Sie interagieren
Sprach- und Audiodaten
Kaufaktivitäten
Personen, mit denen Sie kommunizieren oder Inhalte austauschen
Aktivitäten auf Websites und Apps von Drittanbietern, die unsere Dienste nutzen
Der Chrome-Browserverlauf, den Sie
mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisiert
haben
Wenn Sie unsere
Dienste nutzen, um Anrufe zu tätigen und zu erhalten oder um Nachrichten zu senden und zu empfangen
, erheben wir möglicherweise Anruf- und Nachrichteninformationen wie Ihre Telefonnummer, die Anrufernummer, die Nummer des Angerufenen, Weiterleitungsnummern, die E-Mail-Adressen von Sender und Empfänger, das Datum und die Uhrzeit von Anrufen und Nachrichten, die Dauer von Anrufen, Routing-Informationen und die Art und Anzahl von Anrufen und Nachrichten.
Die in Ihrem Konto gespeicherten Aktivitätsdaten können Sie sich in Ihrem Google-Konto ansehen und sie dort auch verwalten.
Zum Google-Konto
Ihre Standortdaten
Wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, erheben wir Standortinformationen. Dadurch können wir Ihnen Funktionen wie Wegbeschreibungen, Suchergebnisse für Dinge in Ihrer Nähe und Werbung auf Grundlage Ihres Standorts anbieten.
Je nachdem, welche Produkte Sie nutzen und welche Einstellungen Sie auswählen, kann Google verschiedene Arten von Standortinformationen verwenden, um bestimmte Dienste und Produkte hilfreicher zu gestalten. Dazu gehören unter anderem:
GPS- und andere
Sensordaten von Ihrem Gerät
IP-Adresse
Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten
, zum Beispiel von Ihren Suchanfragen oder
Orte, die Sie mit einem Label versehen, etwa Ihr Zuhause oder Ihr Arbeitsplatz
Informationen über Objekte in der Nähe Ihres Geräts
, wie etwa WLAN-Zugriffspunkte, Funkmasten und Bluetooth-fähige Geräte
Die durch uns erhobenen Arten von Standortdaten und wie lange wir diese speichern hängen zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab. Zum Beispiel können Sie mit der App „Einstellungen“ auf Ihrem Android-Gerät
die Standorterfassung Ihres Geräts aktivieren oder deaktivieren
. Wenn Sie eine private Karte mit Orten erstellen möchten, die Sie mit Ihren angemeldeten Geräten besuchen, können Sie auch den
Standortverlauf
aktivieren. Und wenn die Einstellung „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert ist, werden Ihre Suchanfragen und anderen Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten, die möglicherwiese ebenfalls Standortinformationen enthalten, in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert. Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden,
finden Sie hier
.
In manchen Fällen erhebt Google auch Daten über Sie aus
öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
. Wenn beispielsweise Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird, kann die Google-Suchmaschine diesen Artikel indexieren und anderen Personen zeigen, wenn sie nach Ihrem Namen suchen. Unter Umständen erhalten wir auch Daten über Sie von vertrauenswürdigen Partnern. Dazu zählen Verzeichnisdienste, die uns in Google-Diensten anzuzeigende Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, Marketingpartner, die uns Daten über potenzielle Kunden unserer Geschäftsdienste bereitstellen, und Sicherheitspartner, die uns Daten liefern, mit denen wir uns
vor Missbrauch schützen
können. Wir erhalten auch Daten von
Partnern, damit wir in deren Auftrag Werbung und Recherchedienste zur Verfügung stellen können
.
Zum Erheben und Speichern von Daten verwenden wir verschiedene Technologien. Dazu zählen
Cookies
,
Pixel-Tags
, die lokale Speicherung wie etwa
Browser-Webspeicher
oder
Anwendungsdaten-Caches
, Datenbanken und
Serverprotokolle
.
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Wir verwenden Daten zur Verbesserung unserer Dienste
Wir nutzen die von uns im Rahmen unserer Dienste erhobenen Daten für folgende Zwecke:
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
Wir nutzen Ihre Daten zur
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
. Hierzu zählen beispielsweise die Verarbeitung Ihrer Suchbegriffe, um Suchergebnisse einzublenden, oder das Vorschlagen von Empfängern aus Ihren Kontakten, wenn Sie Inhalte teilen möchten.
Wartung und Verbesserung unserer Dienste
Wir verwenden Ihre Daten,
um zu gewährleisten, dass unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
. Beispielsweise verwenden wir sie zur Überprüfung von Störungen oder zur Beseitigung von Problemen, die Sie uns gemeldet haben. Außerdem nutzen wir Ihre Daten, um
unsere Dienste zu verbessern
. Dazu zählt beispielsweise die Feststellung, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die in unseren Diensten verwendete Rechtschreibprüfung verbessern können.
Entwicklung neuer Dienste
Wir nutzen die im Rahmen unserer bestehenden Dienste erhobenen Daten zur Entwicklung neuer Dienste. Beispielsweise halfen uns Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, organisiert haben, bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos.
Bereitstellung personalisierter Dienste, einschließlich Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen
Wir nutzen die von uns erhobenen Daten zur Personalisierung unserer Dienste. Dazu zählen die Bereitstellung von Empfehlungen, von personalisierten Inhalten und
von personalisierten Suchergebnissen
. Beispielsweise erhalten Sie im
Sicherheitscheck
Sicherheitstipps, die auf Ihre persönliche Nutzung von Google-Produkten zugeschnitten sind. Je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen kann Google Play Daten nutzen, etwa über Apps, die Sie installiert haben, und Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, um neue Apps zu empfehlen, die Ihnen gefallen könnten.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen zeigen wir Ihnen möglicherweise auch auf Ihre Interessen und Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten bezogene
personalisierte Werbung
. Wenn Sie beispielsweise nach „Mountainbikes“ suchen, kann auf YouTube Werbung für Sportausrüstung eingeblendet werden. In Ihren Einstellungen für Werbung unter
Mein Anzeigen-Center
können Sie festlegen, welche Daten wir zur Auswahl der präsentierten Werbung verwenden.
Wir zeigen Ihnen keine personalisierte Werbung, die auf
sensiblen Kategorien
, wie der ethnischen Zugehörigkeit, Religion, sexuellen Orientierung oder Gesundheit beruht.
Wir zeigen Ihnen keine personalisierte Werbung auf Grundlage von Ihren Inhalten aus Google Drive, Gmail oder Google Fotos.
Wir geben Daten, durch die Sie persönlich identifizierbar sind, wie beispielsweise Ihren Namen oder Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, nur dann an Werbetreibende weiter, wenn Sie uns dazu auffordern. Wenn Sie beispielsweise Werbung für einen Blumenladen in Ihrer Nähe sehen und die Schaltfläche "Zum Anrufen tippen" auswählen, verbinden wir Ihren Anruf und geben Ihre Telefonnummer möglicherweise an den Blumenladen weiter.
Zu „Mein Anzeigen-Center“
Messung der Leistung
Wir nutzen die Daten zur Analyse und Messung, um zu verstehen, wie unsere Dienste verwendet werden. Beispielsweise analysieren wir Daten über Ihre Besuche auf unseren Websites, um das Design unserer Produkte zu optimieren. Zusätzlich nutzen wir Daten der Werbeanzeigen, mit denen Sie interagieren, einschließlich Ihrer zugehörigen Aktivitäten in der Google Suche, um Werbetreibenden ein besseres Verständnis ihrer Werbekampagnen zu ermöglichen. Dazu nutzen wir verschiedene Tools, wie z. B. Google Analytics. Wenn Sie Websites besuchen oder Apps verwenden, bei denen Google Analytics eingesetzt wird, kann ein Google Analytics-Kunde sich dafür entscheiden, es Google zu ermöglichen,
Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten auf dieser Website oder in dieser App mit Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites oder in anderen Apps zu verknüpfen
, bei denen ebenfalls unsere Werbedienste genutzt werden.
Kommunikation mit Ihnen
Wir nutzen die von uns erhobenen Daten, wie Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, um uns direkt mit Ihnen in Verbindung zu setzen. So könnten wir Ihnen beispielsweise eine Benachrichtigung senden, wenn wir verdächtige Aktivitäten feststellen, wie einen Versuch, sich von einem ungewöhnlichen Standort aus in Ihrem Google-Konto anzumelden. Außerdem könnten wir Sie auch über bevorstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen in Bezug auf unsere Dienste informieren. Und wenn Sie Google kontaktieren, zeichnen wir Ihre Anfrage auf, um Ihnen bei der Lösung etwaiger Probleme behilflich zu sein.
Schutz von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit
Wir nutzen Daten, um die Verbesserung der
Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit
unserer Dienste zu unterstützen. Dazu zählen das Erkennen, Verhindern und Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsrisiken und technischen Problemen, die Google, unseren Nutzern oder
der Öffentlichkeit
schaden könnten.
Um Ihre Daten zu diesen Zwecken zu verarbeiten, verwenden wir verschiedene Technologien. Wir nutzen automatisierte Systeme, die Ihre Inhalte analysieren, sodass wir Ihnen personalisierte Suchergebnisse, personalisierte Werbung oder andere Funktionen bereitstellen können, die auf Ihre Nutzung unserer Dienste zugeschnitten sind. Zusätzlich analysieren wir Ihre Inhalte, damit wir
Missbrauch erkennen können
, wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte. Wir verwenden auch
Algorithmen
, um Muster in Daten zu erkennen. Google Übersetzer hilft beispielsweise Personen, über Sprachbarrieren hinweg zu kommunizieren, indem der Dienst geläufige Sprachmuster in Sätzen erkennt, die übersetzt werden sollen.
Unter Umständen werden
die durch uns erhobenen Daten zu den oben beschriebenen Zwecken dienst- und geräteübergreifend verwendet
. Wenn Sie sich beispielsweise, je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen, Videos von Gitarrenspielern auf YouTube ansehen, kann eine Werbeanzeige für Gitarrenunterricht auf einer Website ausgeliefert werden, auf der unsere Anzeigenprodukte verwendet werden. Je nach Ihren Kontoeinstellungen könnten
Ihre Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites und in Apps
mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten verknüpft werden, um die Dienste von Google und die von Google ausgelieferten Werbeanzeigen zu verbessern.
Wenn andere Nutzer bereits über Ihre E-Mail-Adresse oder andere Sie identifizierende Daten verfügen, zeigen wir diesen Nutzern möglicherweise die öffentlich sichtbaren Daten Ihres Google-Kontos an, wie Ihren Namen und Ihr Foto. Damit können andere Personen beispielsweise eine von Ihnen stammende E-Mail identifizieren.
Bevor wir Daten zu anderen als den in dieser Datenschutzerklärung aufgeführten Zwecken nutzen, bitten wir Sie um Ihre Einwilligung.
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Sie haben Entscheidungsmöglichkeiten in Bezug auf die durch uns erhobenen Daten und ihre Verwendung
In diesem Abschnitt werden die wichtigsten Einstellungen beschrieben, mit denen Sie Ihre Privatsphäre in unseren Diensten verwalten können. Sie können auch den
Privatsphärecheck
verwenden, um wichtige Datenschutzeinstellungen zu überprüfen und anzupassen. Zusätzlich zu diesen Tools bieten wir auch spezifische Datenschutzeinstellungen in unseren Produkten. Mehr dazu erfahren Sie in unserem
Leitfaden zum Datenschutz in Google-Produkten
.
Zum Privatsphärecheck
Daten verwalten, überprüfen und aktualisieren
Wenn Sie angemeldet sind, können Sie Ihre Daten jederzeit in den von Ihnen verwendeten Diensten überprüfen und aktualisieren. Beispielsweise ermöglichen Ihnen Fotos und Drive die Verwaltung bestimmter auf Google gespeicherter Inhaltstypen.
Wir stellen Ihnen auch einen Ort zur Verfügung, an dem Sie die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Daten überprüfen und deren Speicherung steuern können. Ihr
Google-Konto
beinhaltet:
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Aktivitätseinstellungen
Hier können Sie festlegen, welche Arten von Aktivitäten in Ihrem Konto gespeichert werden sollen. Wenn Sie zum Beispiel den YouTube-Verlauf aktiviert haben, werden die Videos, die Sie sich ansehen, und die Dinge, nach denen Sie suchen, in Ihrem Konto gespeichert, damit Sie bessere Empfehlungen erhalten und Videos an der zuletzt angesehenen Stelle fortsetzen können. Und wenn die Einstellung „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert ist, werden Ihre Suchanfragen und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert. So können Dienste persönlicher für Sie gestaltet werden, damit Sie unter anderem schneller Suchergebnisse und nützlichere Empfehlungen zu Apps und Inhalten erhalten. „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ hat auch eine Untereinstellung, mit der Sie festlegen können, ob
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites, in anderen Apps und auf Geräten, die Google-Dienste nutzen
, in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert und zur Verbesserung von Google-Diensten verwendet werden. Zu diesen Informationen gehört beispielsweise, welche Apps Sie auf Android installieren und verwenden.
Aktivitätseinstellungen aufrufen
Einstellungen für Werbung
Hier können Sie Ihre Einstellungen zu Werbeanzeigen verwalten, die auf Google sowie auf Websites und in Apps im Rahmen einer
Partnerschaft mit Google
von Google ausgeliefert werden. Sie können Ihre Interessen verändern, auswählen, ob Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden sollen, um sich relevantere Werbung präsentieren zu lassen, und bestimmte Werbedienste aktivieren oder deaktivieren.
Zu „Mein Anzeigen-Center“
Über mich
Personenbezogene Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto verwalten und festlegen, wer sie in Google-Diensten sehen kann.
Zu "Über mich"
Soziale Empfehlungen
Hier können Sie auswählen, ob Ihr Name und Ihr Foto neben Ihren Aktivitäten wie Rezensionen und Empfehlungen in Werbeanzeigen erscheinen sollen.
Zu "Soziale Empfehlungen"
Websites und Apps, auf bzw. in denen Google-Dienste genutzt werden
Daten von Websites und Apps, auf bzw. in denen Google-Dienste wie Google Analytics genutzt werden, verwalten, die eventuell an Google weitergegeben werden, wenn Sie ihre Dienste aufrufen oder damit interagieren.
Zu Wie wir Daten von Websites oder Apps verwenden, auf bzw. in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden
Möglichkeiten zur Überprüfung und Aktualisierung Ihrer Daten
Meine Aktivitäten
In „Meine Aktivitäten“ können Sie überprüfen und festlegen, welche Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert werden, wenn Sie angemeldet sind und Google-Dienste verwenden, zum Beispiel Ihre Suchanfragen oder Nutzung von Google Play. Sie können sich die Inhalte nach Datum und Thema sortiert ansehen und Ihre Aktivitäten teilweise oder vollständig löschen.
Zu "Meine Aktivitäten"
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard ermöglicht Ihnen die Verwaltung von Daten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Zu Google Dashboard
Ihre personenbezogenen Daten
Hier können Sie Ihre Kontaktdaten wie Ihren Namen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und Ihre Telefonnummer verwalten.
Zu den personenbezogenen Daten
Wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit Ihrem Browser oder Gerät verknüpft sind, z. B.:
Personalisierte Suche:
Hier können Sie auswählen
, ob Ihnen anhand Ihrer Suchaktivitäten relevantere Ergebnisse und Empfehlungen bereitgestellt werden sollen.
YouTube-Einstellungen: Hier können Sie Ihren
YouTube-Suchverlauf
und Ihren
YouTube-Wiedergabeverlauf
pausieren und löschen.
Einstellungen für Werbung: Hier können Sie
Ihre Einstellungen für Werbeanzeigen verwalten
, die Ihnen auf Google und Websites sowie in Apps von Google-Anzeigenpartnern präsentiert werden.
Daten exportieren, entfernen und löschen
Sie können eine Kopie Ihrer Inhalte aus Ihrem Google-Konto exportieren, um diese zu sichern oder sie mit einem anderen Dienst als den von Google zu nutzen.
Daten exportieren
Zum Löschen Ihrer Daten haben Sie folgende Möglichkeiten:
Inhalte aus
bestimmten Google-Diensten
löschen
Bestimmte Elemente in Ihrem Konto unter Verwendung von
Meine Aktivitäten
suchen und dann löschen
Bestimmte Google-Produkte
einschließlich Ihrer mit diesen Produkten verknüpften Daten löschen
Gesamtes Google-Konto löschen
Daten löschen
Sie können über den
Kontoinaktivität-Manager
auch einer anderen Person Zugriff zu Teilen Ihres Google-Kontos gewähren, falls Sie unerwarteterweise nicht in der Lage sind, Ihr Konto zu verwenden.
Und schließlich können Sie auch basierend auf dem anwendbaren Recht und unseren Richtlinien eine
Anfrage zum Entfernen von Inhalten
aus bestimmten Google-Diensten stellen.
Es gibt auch andere Möglichkeiten festzulegen, welche Daten von Google erhoben werden dürfen, und zwar unabhängig davon, ob Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind oder nicht. Hierzu zählen:
Browsereinstellungen: Ihr Browser lässt sich beispielsweise so konfigurieren, dass angezeigt wird, wenn von Google ein
Cookie
in Ihrem Browser gesetzt wurde. Ihr Browser lässt sich auch so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies von einer bestimmten Domain oder allen Domains blockiert werden. Beachten Sie aber, dass Cookies erforderlich sind,
damit unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
und etwa Ihre Spracheinstellungen gespeichert werden können.
Geräteeinstellungen: Ihr Gerät verfügt möglicherweise über Steuerelemente, mit denen Sie festlegen können, welche Daten wir erheben. So können Sie beispielsweise auf Ihrem Android-Gerät
Standorteinstellungen anpassen
.
Datenweitergabe
Datenweitergabe durch Sie
In vielen unserer Dienste können Sie Daten mit anderen Personen teilen. Sie bestimmen in diesem Fall, wie dabei vorgegangen werden soll. Beispielsweise können Sie entscheiden, welche Ihrer Videos auf YouTube öffentlich geteilt werden und welche vertraulich bleiben sollen. Bedenken Sie, dass, wenn Sie Daten öffentlich teilen, Suchmaschinen, einschließlich der Google-Suche, möglicherweise auf diese Daten zugreifen können.
Wenn Sie angemeldet sind und mit Google-Diensten interagieren, z. B. wenn Sie Kommentare zu einem YouTube-Video verfassen oder eine App bei Play rezensieren, werden Ihr Name und Ihr Foto neben Ihrer Aktivität angezeigt. Diese Daten werden wir gegebenenfalls
entsprechend Ihren Einstellungen für "Soziale Empfehlungen"
auch in Werbeanzeigen veröffentlichen.
Datenweitergabe durch Google
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten an Unternehmen, Organisationen oder Personen außerhalb von Google nur in folgenden Fällen weiter:
Mit Ihrer Einwilligung
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir Ihre Einwilligung dazu haben. Wenn Sie beispielsweise
Google Home verwenden, um eine Tischreservierung vorzunehmen
, holen wir Ihre Zustimmung ein, bevor wir dem Restaurant Ihren Namen oder Ihre Telefonnummer weitergeben. Wir bieten Ihnen außerdem Steuerungsmöglichkeiten, damit Sie
Drittanbieter-Apps und -Websites einsehen und verwalten
können, denen Sie Zugriff auf Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gewährt haben. Vor der Weitergabe von
sensiblen personenbezogenen Daten
holen wir Ihre ausdrückliche Einwilligung ein.
Im Falle von Domain-Administratoren
Wenn Sie Mitglied einer Bildungseinrichtung oder Mitarbeiter einer Organisation sind, die Google-Dienste nutzt, haben der
Domainadministrator
und Reseller, die Ihr Konto verwalten, Zugriff auf Ihr Google-Konto. Diese haben folgende Möglichkeiten:
Auf die in Ihrem Konto gespeicherten Daten zugreifen und diese speichern, z. B. Ihre E-Mail
Statistiken zu Ihrem Konto ansehen, z. B. wie viele Apps Sie installieren
Das Passwort für Ihr Konto ändern
Den Zugriff auf Ihr Konto sperren oder beenden
Ihre Kontodaten abrufen, um anwendbare Gesetze, Vorschriften und gerichtliche Verfahren einzuhalten oder einer vollstreckbaren behördlichen Anordnung nachzukommen
Ihre Möglichkeiten einschränken, Daten oder Datenschutzeinstellungen zu löschen oder zu bearbeiten
Für die Verarbeitung durch andere Stellen
Wir stellen personenbezogene Daten unseren
verbundenen Unternehmen
, anderen vertrauenswürdigen Unternehmen oder Personen zur Verfügung, die diese in unserem Auftrag verarbeiten. Dies geschieht auf der Grundlage unserer Weisungen und im Einklang mit unserer Datenschutzerklärung sowie anderen geeigneten Vertraulichkeits- und Sicherheitsmaßnahmen. Beispielsweise nutzen wir Dienstanbieter zur Unterstützung beim Betrieb unserer Rechenzentren, Bereitstellen unserer Produkte und Dienste, Verbessern unserer internen Geschäftsprozesse und Anbieten zusätzlichen Supports für unsere Kunden und Nutzer. Außerdem arbeiten wir mit Dienstanbietern zusammen, die uns beim Prüfen von Videoinhalten auf YouTube aus Gründen der öffentlichen Sicherheit unterstützen und uns durch das Analysieren und Anhören von Beispielausschnitten gespeicherter Audioaufnahmen von Nutzern helfen, die Audioerkennungstechnologien von Google zu verbessern.
Aus rechtlichen Gründen
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten an Stellen außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir nach Treu und Glauben davon ausgehen dürfen, dass die Offenlegung dieser Daten vernünftigerweise notwendig ist, um folgende Zwecke zu erfüllen:
Geltende Gesetze, Vorschriften oder
gerichtliche Verfahren einzuhalten oder einer vollstreckbaren behördlichen Anordnung nachzukommen
. In unserem
Transparenzbericht
veröffentlichen wir Daten über die Anzahl und die Art der Anfragen, die wir von Behörden erhalten.
Geltende Nutzungsbedingungen durchzusetzen, einschließlich der Untersuchung möglicher Verstöße.
Betrug, Sicherheitsmängel oder technische Probleme aufzudecken, zu verhindern oder anderweitig zu bekämpfen.
Die Rechte, das Eigentum oder die Sicherheit von Google,
unserer Nutzer
oder der Öffentlichkeit vor Schaden zu schützen.
Wir geben möglicherweise
nicht personenbezogene Daten
an die Öffentlichkeit und unsere Partner, beispielsweise an Publisher, Werbetreibende, Entwickler oder Rechteinhaber, weiter. Beispielsweise veröffentlichen wir Daten,
um Trends bezüglich der allgemeinen Nutzung unserer Dienste aufzuzeigen
. Darüber hinaus erlauben wir
bestimmten Partnern
, Daten von Ihrem Browser oder Gerät unter Verwendung ihrer eigenen Cookies oder ähnlicher Technologien zu Werbe- und Messzwecken zu erheben.
Falls Google an einem Unternehmenszusammenschluss, einem Unternehmenserwerb oder einem Verkauf von Vermögensgegenständen beteiligt ist, werden wir weiterhin dafür sorgen, die Vertraulichkeit Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten sicherzustellen. Zusätzlich werden wir betroffene Nutzer benachrichtigen, bevor personenbezogene Daten übermittelt oder Gegenstand einer anderen Datenschutzerklärung werden.
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Wir integrieren Sicherheitsfunktionen in unsere Dienste, um Ihre Daten zu schützen
Alle Google-Produkte sind mit starken Sicherheitsfunktionen ausgestattet, die Ihre Daten fortwährend schützen. Die Erkenntnisse, die wir durch die Bereitstellung unserer Dienste gewinnen, helfen uns, Bedrohungen der Sicherheit automatisch abzufangen und zu verhindern, dass Sie mit solchen konfrontiert werden. Wenn wir tatsächlich ein Risiko erkennen, von dem Sie unserer Meinung nach erfahren sollten, benachrichtigen wir Sie und schlagen Ihnen Maßnahmen vor, um sich besser zu schützen.
Wir bemühen uns intensiv darum, Sie und Google vor unbefugtem Zugriff auf Daten oder vor unbefugter Veränderung, Offenlegung oder Vernichtung von Daten zu schützen. Unsere Maßnahmen umfassen Folgendes:
Wir verschlüsseln Ihre Daten, um sie während der Übertragung zu schützen.
Wir bieten eine Vielzahl von Sicherheitsfunktionen, wie
Safe Browsing
, Sicherheitscheck und die
Bestätigung in zwei Schritten
, um Ihnen zu helfen, Ihr Konto zu schützen.
Wir überprüfen laufend unsere Praktiken zur Erhebung, Speicherung und Verarbeitung von Daten, einschließlich der physischen Sicherheitsmaßnahmen, um unsere Systeme vor unbefugtem Zugriff zu schützen.
Der Zugriff auf personenbezogene Daten wird durch uns beschränkt und nur Mitarbeitern, Auftragnehmern und Kundenservicemitarbeitern von Google gewährt, die diese Daten für die weitere Datenverarbeitung unbedingt benötigen. Alle Personen mit diesen Zugriffsrechten sind strengen Vertraulichkeitsverpflichtungen unterworfen und können disziplinarischen Maßnahmen unterzogen oder entlassen werden, falls sie diese Verpflichtungen nicht einhalten.
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Sie können Ihre Daten jederzeit exportieren oder aus Ihrem Google-Konto löschen.
Sie können eine Kopie Ihrer Inhalte aus Ihrem Google-Konto exportieren, um diese zu sichern oder sie mit einem anderen Dienst als den von Google zu nutzen.
Daten exportieren
Zum Löschen Ihrer Daten haben Sie folgende Möglichkeiten:
Inhalte aus
bestimmten Google-Diensten
löschen
Bestimmte Elemente in Ihrem Konto unter Verwendung von
Meine Aktivitäten
suchen und dann löschen
Bestimmte Google-Produkte
einschließlich Ihrer mit diesen Produkten verknüpften Daten löschen
Gesamtes Google-Konto löschen
Daten löschen
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Wir speichern erhobene Daten über verschiedene Zeiträume, abhängig davon, um welche Daten es sich handelt, wie wir sie nutzen und wie Sie Ihre Einstellungen konfigurieren:
Einige Daten können Sie jederzeit löschen, beispielsweise Ihre
personenbezogenen Daten
oder selbst erstellte oder hochgeladene Inhalte, wie
Fotos
und
Dokumente
. Darüber hinaus können Sie in Ihrem Konto gespeicherte
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten
löschen oder
festlegen, dass diese nach einer bestimmten Zeit automatisch gelöscht werden
. Wir speichern diese Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto, bis Sie sie entweder selbst entfernen oder entfernen lassen.
Andere Daten werden nach einer bestimmten Zeit automatisch gelöscht oder anonymisiert, etwa
Werbedaten
in Serverprotokollen.
Einige Daten, etwa dazu, wie oft Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, speichern wir, bis Sie Ihr Google-Konto löschen.
Einige Daten speichern wir für längere Zeit, wenn dies aus legitimen geschäftlichen oder rechtlichen Gründen erforderlich ist. Diese Gründe können Sicherheit, Betrugs- und Missbrauchsabwehr oder eine Dokumentationspflicht im Finanzbereich sein.
Wenn Sie Daten löschen, beginnen wir mit einem Datenlöschvorgang, um dafür zu sorgen, dass die Daten sicher und vollständig von unseren Servern entfernt werden oder nur in anonymisierter Form gespeichert bleiben. Wir bemühen uns, Daten mithilfe unserer Dienste davor zu schützen, irrtümlich oder mutwillig gelöscht zu werden. Aus diesem Grund kann es zwischen der von Ihnen durchgeführten Löschung von Inhalten und dem Zeitpunkt, zu dem Kopien aus unseren aktiven Systemen und Sicherungssystemen gelöscht werden, zu Verzögerungen kommen.
Weitere Informationen zur Dauer der Datenspeicherung bei Google und Angaben dazu, wie lange es dauert, bis wir Ihre Informationen löschen,
finden Sie hier
.
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Wir überprüfen die vorliegende Datenschutzerklärung regelmäßig und verarbeiten Ihre Daten entsprechend dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Datenübermittlung
Wir betreiben
Server auf der ganzen Welt
. Deshalb können Ihre Daten auf Servern verarbeitet werden, die außerhalb des Landes liegen, in dem Sie leben. Datenschutzgesetze sind von Land zu Land unterschiedlich und einige bieten mehr Schutz als andere. Unabhängig davon, wo Ihre Daten verarbeitet werden, wenden wir grundsätzlich dieselben, in der Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen Schutzmaßnahmen an. Ferner halten wir bestimmte
rechtliche Rahmenbedingungen
zu Datenübermittlungen ein.
Sobald wir formale schriftliche Beschwerden erhalten, nehmen wir mit der Person, die die Beschwerde eingereicht hat, Kontakt auf. Wir arbeiten mit den jeweils zuständigen Regulierungsbehörden einschließlich der lokalen Datenschutzaufsichtsbehörden zusammen, um alle Beschwerden bezüglich der Übermittlung Ihrer Daten beizulegen, die wir nicht direkt mit Ihnen klären können.
Anforderungen in Europa
So können Sie Ihre Rechte ausüben und Google kontaktieren
Wenn das Datenschutzrecht der Europäischen Union (EU) oder des Vereinigten Königreichs (UK) auf die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Anwendung findet, stellen wir Ihnen die in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen
Steuerungsmöglichkeiten
zur Verfügung, damit Sie Ihre Rechte ausüben können, Auskunft über Ihre Daten zu erhalten, sie zu aktualisieren, zu
löschen
und deren Verarbeitung einzuschränken. Darüber hinaus haben Sie das Recht, der Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten zu widersprechen oder Ihre Daten in einen anderen Dienst zu exportieren.
Bei weiteren Fragen oder Anliegen hinsichtlich Ihrer Rechte können Sie sich
an Google und an unsere Datenschutzabteilung wenden
. Falls Sie Bedenken bezüglich Ihrer Rechte gemäß lokalem geltenden Recht haben, können Sie sich außerdem an Ihre lokale Datenschutzaufsichtsbehörde wenden.
Datenverantwortlicher
Der für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Informationen zuständige Datenverantwortliche
hängt von Ihrem gewöhnlichen Aufenthaltsort ab, sofern dies in den Datenschutzhinweisen eines bestimmten Dienstes nicht anders angegeben ist:
Google Ireland Limited, mit Sitz in Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Irland, für Nutzer von Google-Diensten, die ihren gewöhnlichen Aufenthalt im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum oder der Schweiz haben.
Google LLC, mit Sitz in 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA, für Nutzer von Google-Diensten, die ihren gewöhnlichen Aufenthalt im Vereinigten Königreich haben.
Google LLC ist unabhängig von Ihrem Wohnort der zuständige Datenverantwortliche für die Verarbeitung von Informationen, die in Diensten wie der
Google Suche
und Google Maps indexiert und angezeigt werden. Google Ireland Limited ist der zuständige Datenverantwortliche für die Verarbeitung von Informationen, mit denen Google AI-Modelle trainiert werden, um sie in Diensten einzusetzen, die Google Ireland Limited im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum oder in der Schweiz bereitstellt.
Rechtsgrundlagen der Verarbeitung
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten zu den in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen
Zwecken
auf der Basis der folgenden rechtlichen Grundlagen:
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, um Ihnen einen Dienst bereitzustellen, den Sie im Rahmen eines Vertrags angefordert haben.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, soweit wir oder
Dritte
ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, dies zu tun. Dabei wenden wir
geeignete Maßnahmen
zum Schutz Ihrer Privatsphäre an.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, wenn dies zum Schutz Ihrer lebenswichtige Interessen oder denen einer anderen Person erforderlich ist.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, wenn wir dazu eine rechtliche Verpflichtung haben.
Wir bitten Sie um Ihre Einwilligung zur Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten für bestimmte Zwecke. Sie haben das Recht, Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit zu widerrufen.
Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen sowie die Art, wie Sie Google-Dienste verwenden, bestimmen, welche Daten verarbeitet werden, zu welchem Zweck dies geschieht und was die Rechtsgrundlagen dafür sind. In der folgenden Tabelle werden diese Verarbeitungszwecke, die Arten der verarbeiteten Daten sowie die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung ausführlicher erläutert.
Warum und wie wir Daten verarbeiten
Welche Daten wir verarbeiten
Rechtliche Gründe
Bereitstellung von Google-Diensten, ‑Produkten und ‑Funktionen
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir verarbeiten die Begriffe, nach denen Sie suchen, um Ihnen entsprechende Suchergebnisse anzuzeigen.
Wir verwenden die IP-Adresse Ihres Geräts, um Ihnen die angeforderten Daten senden zu können, beispielsweise ein YouTube-Video.
Wir verwenden eindeutige IDs, die in Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert sind, um Sie als die Person zu authentifizieren, die auf Ihr Google-Konto zugreifen darf.
Fotos und Videos, die Sie in Google Fotos hochladen, werden verwendet, um Ihnen zu helfen, Alben, Collagen und andere Kreationen zu erstellen, die Sie mit anderen teilen können.
Wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder Artikel von uns kaufen, verwenden wir Informationen wie Ihre Lieferadresse oder Lieferanweisungen – beispielsweise für die Bearbeitung und Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung sowie zur Bereitstellung des Supports für das Produkt oder die Dienstleistung, die Sie kaufen.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Zahlungsinformationen, wenn Sie zusätzlichen Speicherplatz für Google Drive kaufen.
Wir können Kontaktdaten (wie Namen und E‑Mail-Adressen) von Personen verwenden, mit denen Sie in Google-Produkten interagieren. So können wir Ihnen helfen, diese Personen zu finden, wenn Sie in Google-Diensten wie Gmail, Fotos und Assistant etwas mit ihnen teilen oder mit ihnen kommunizieren möchten.
Eine E‑Mail mit einer Flugbestätigung kann verwendet werden, um eine Check‑in-Schaltfläche in Gmail zu erstellen.
Google erhebt auch Daten über Sie aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen. Wenn beispielsweise Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird, kann die Google-Suchmaschine diesen Artikel indexieren und anderen Personen zeigen, wenn sie nach Ihrem Namen suchen. Oder wenn Ihre Unternehmensinformationen auf einer Website erscheinen, können wir sie indexieren und in Google-Diensten anzeigen.
Wir können Ihnen helfen, Ihren Standort mithilfe der
Google-Standortfreigabe
zu teilen. So können andere Sie auf einer Karte finden oder Ihre voraussichtliche Ankunftszeit abschätzen.
Wie im Abschnitt
Datenweitergabe
beschrieben, geben wir personenbezogene Daten außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir Ihre Einwilligung dazu haben. Wir bieten Ihnen außerdem Einstellungen, mit denen Sie
Apps und Websites von Drittanbietern überprüfen und verwalten
können, denen Sie Zugriff auf Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gewährt haben.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Erfüllung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise durch das Bereitstellen eines YouTube-Videos oder durch die Bearbeitung und Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung, wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder physische Waren von uns kaufen.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Verwaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispiel: Verwendung von Kontaktdaten (wie Namen und E‑Mail-Adressen) von Personen, mit denen Sie in Google-Produkten interagieren, damit Sie diese Personen leichter finden, wenn Sie in Google-Diensten wie Gmail, Fotos und Assistant etwas mit ihnen teilen oder mit ihnen kommunizieren möchten.
Ihre
Einwilligung
, z. B. wenn Sie Ihren Standort über die Google-Standortfreigabe teilen.
Aufrechterhaltung und Verbesserung von Google-Diensten, ‑Produkten und ‑Funktionen
Aufrechterhaltung des Dienstes, damit er wie vorgesehen funktioniert, z. B. durch Fehlerbehebung sowie Nachverfolgung und Behebung von Problemen.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir überprüfen fortlaufend die ordnungsgemäße Funktion unserer Dienste, um Probleme zu erkennen. Wenn wir feststellen, dass eine Funktion fehlerhaft ist, ermöglichen uns die vor dem Eintreten des Problems erhobenen Aktivitätsdaten, das Problem schneller zu beheben.
Wir erfassen die Interaktionen von Nutzern mit Schaltflächen in Anwendungen wie Google Maps und der Google Suche, um festzustellen, ob sie wie vorgesehen funktionieren.
Verbesserung der Google-Dienste sowie der Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit dieser Dienste, z. B. durch Erkennung, Verhinderung und Reaktion von bzw. auf Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsrisiken und technische Probleme, die den Dienst oder Nutzer beeinträchtigen könnten.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir analysieren Daten zu Ihren Interaktionen mit unseren Diensten, damit wir die Produkte weiter optimieren können. So können wir beispielsweise besser feststellen, wenn Nutzer zu lange brauchen, um eine bestimmte Aufgabe auszuführen, oder manche Schritte überhaupt nicht beenden können. In diesem Fall können wir diese Funktion überarbeiten und das Produkt für alle verbessern.
Wir analysieren, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die Rechtschreibprüfung für alle unsere Dienste verbessern können.
Wir analysieren die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Wir analysieren Suchanfragen bei Google Shopping, um festzustellen, welche Produkte, Händler und Marken für verschiedene Arten von Suchanfragen relevant sind.
Die Safe Browsing-Funktion von Google Chrome kann Informationen zu verdächtigen Websites zwischen dem Browser eines Nutzers und Google-Servern teilen und dadurch z. B. zum Schutz vor Phishing, Malware und schädlicher Werbung beitragen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Erfüllung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise bei der Verwendung der Interaktionsprotokolle von Google-Apps, um sicherzustellen, dass diese wie vorgesehen funktionieren.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Verwaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die Rechtschreibprüfung für alle unsere Dienste verbessern können.
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen unsere Dienste nutzen, um die Leistung unserer Dienste zu gewährleisten und zu verbessern.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Durchführung von Recherchen, mit denen unsere Dienste für unsere Nutzer verbessert werden und die für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind.
Beispielsweise arbeiten wir daran, die Übersetzungsqualität von Google Übersetzer zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Entwicklung neuer Google-Dienste, ‑Produkte und ‑Funktionen
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Nutzer Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, organisiert haben, halfen uns bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos.
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie kurze Inhalte von Creatorn erstellt und von Nutzern angesehen werden, halfen Google dabei, neue YouTube-Dienste zu entwickeln.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen können wir Audioaufnahmen von Sprachinteraktionen mit Diensten wie der Google Suche, Assistant, Maps und Gboard speichern, um die Audiotechnologien von Google weiterzuentwickeln und zu verbessern.
Wir verwenden Informationen, die online oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind, um neue Modelle für maschinelles Lernen zu trainieren und grundlegende Technologien zu entwickeln, die für verschiedene Google-Produkte wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI-Funktionen eingesetzt werden.
Wir nutzen Ihre Interaktionen mit KI-Modellen und ‑Technologien wie Gemini-Apps, um diese Modelle zu entwickeln, zu trainieren, zu optimieren und zu verbessern, damit sie besser auf Ihre Anfragen reagieren. Wir verwenden sie auch, um Klassifikatoren und Filter zu aktualisieren und dadurch z. B. die Sicherheit, das Sprachverständnis und die Genauigkeit zu verbessern.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Funktionen, die für unsere Nutzer hilfreich sind.
Beispielsweise haben uns Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, verwendet haben, bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos geholfen. Oder wir nutzen Daten, die online oder in anderen öffentlichen Quellen verfügbar sind, um die KI-Modelle von Google zu trainieren sowie Produkte und Funktionen weiterzuentwickeln, die diese grundlegenden Technologien nutzen – wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI.
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Zum Beispiel verwenden wir Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten – wie Ihre Interaktionen mit Gemini-Apps – um Modelle für maschinelles Lernen zu trainieren und zu verbessern und um ihr Sprachverständnis sowie ihre Sicherheitsklassifikatoren und -filter zu aktualisieren.
Mit Ihrer
Einwilligung
, beispielsweise das Speichern von Audioaufnahmen von Sprachinteraktionen mit der Google Suche, Assistant, Maps und Gboard, um Technologien zur Audioerkennung von Google zu entwickeln und verbessern.
Zur Bereitstellung personalisierter Dienste, einschließlich Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen
Um unsere Dienste für Sie anzupassen, etwa über Empfehlungen, personalisierte Inhalte und personalisierte Suchergebnisse.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Der Sicherheitscheck von Google bietet Ihnen Sicherheitstipps, die an Ihre Nutzung von Google-Produkten angepasst sind.
Google News bietet Ihnen möglicherweise lokale Nachrichten, die auf Ihrem ungefähren Standort basieren.
Die Google Suche bietet Ihnen möglicherweise Ergebnisse, die auf ihrem ungefähren Standort basieren.
Google Assistant kann Ihre Kontakte verwenden, um auf Anfrage Nachrichten zu senden, z. B. „SMS an Max Mustermann“.
Google Play nutzt Daten, etwa über Apps, die Sie installiert haben, und Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, um neue Apps zu empfehlen, die Ihnen gefallen könnten.
Möglicherweise zeigen wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Google Suche, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht.
Google kann Werbung basierend auf dem Kontext der von Ihnen besuchten Website anzeigen, beispielsweise Anzeigen für Gartengeräte auf einer Seite mit Tipps zum Gärtnern.
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert haben, können Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse erhalten, die auf Ihren bisherigen Suchanfragen und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten basieren.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen, um auf Ihre Interessen bezogene personalisierte Werbung anzuzeigen.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wenn Sie nach „Mountainbikes“ suchen oder Videos über Mountainbiken ansehen, kann in Ihren Suchergebnissen oder auf YouTube Werbung für Sportausrüstung eingeblendet werden.
Wenn Sie sich auf YouTube Videos zum Thema Backen ansehen, wird Ihnen beim Surfen im Web möglicherweise mehr Werbung zu diesem Thema präsentiert.
Möglicherweise wird Ihnen auch personalisierte Werbung präsentiert, die auf den Daten des Werbetreibenden basiert. Wenn Sie beispielsweise auf der Website eines Werbetreibenden eingekauft haben, kann dieser die Daten über Ihren Besuch zum Einblenden von Werbeanzeigen nutzen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Um einen
Vertrag mit Ihnen auszuführen
, zum Beispiel wenn Google Assistant Ihre Kontakte verwendet, um auf Ihre Anfrage hin eine Nachricht zu senden, wie „Sende eine SMS an Max Mustermann“.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Personalisierung unserer Dienste, um sie nutzerfreundlicher zu gestalten.
Beispielsweise können wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Google Suche zeigen, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht, Sicherheitstipps passend zu Ihrer Nutzung von Google-Produkten geben oder gegebenenfalls die Nutzung altersgerecht anpassen.
Einblenden von Werbung, um viele unserer Dienste kostenlos anbieten zu können.
Zum Beispiel zeigen wir möglicherweise Werbung, die auf dem Kontext einer besuchten Website basiert, wie Werbeanzeigen für Gartengeräte auf einer Seite mit Gartentipps. Bei personalisierter Werbung bitten wir Sie um Ihre Einwilligung.
Mit Ihrer
Einwilligung
– beispielsweise Empfehlungen bei Google Play basierend auf Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, oder personalisierte Werbung auf Grundlage Ihrer Interessen. Zum Beispiel könnte Ihnen Werbung rund um das Thema Backen angezeigt werden, wenn Sie im Web surfen, nachdem Sie auf YouTube Videos über Backen angesehen haben.
Zur Leistungsmessung – Wir nutzen die Daten zur Analyse und Messung, um zu verstehen, wie unsere Dienste verwendet werden.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir analysieren Daten über Ihre Besuche auf unseren Websites, um das Design unserer Produkte zu optimieren.
Wir nutzen Daten zu der Werbung, mit der Sie interagieren, um Werbetreibenden ein besseres Verständnis ihrer Werbekampagnen zu ermöglichen.
Wir verwenden Daten darüber, welche Orte Nutzer in Google Earth am häufigsten anklicken, um zu erfahren, welche Funktionen beliebt sind, und um Fehler zu identifizieren.
Die Google Suche erhebt, wie oft eine bestimmte Anfrage gestellt wurde und wie Nutzer die Qualität ihrer Suchergebnisse wahrnehmen, um die Google Suche noch hilfreicher zu gestalten.
Google Übersetzer analysiert Daten über die Anzahl der angefertigten Übersetzungen und die Häufigkeit, mit der eine Übersetzung als minderwertig eingestuft wird, um mögliche neue Funktionen zu ermitteln und Probleme bei der Nutzung des Dienstes zu beheben.
Wir geben möglicherweise nicht personenidentifizierbare Informationen an unsere Partner – beispielsweise Lizenzgeber von Inhalten – weiter, wenn wir Lizenzgebühren zahlen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen unsere Dienste nutzen, um die Leistung unserer Dienste zu gewährleisten und zu verbessern.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Aufdecken, Verhindern oder anderweitiges Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln oder technischen Problemen bei unseren Diensten.
Beispielsweise beobachten wir Nutzungsmuster in Google Earth, um Programmfehler zu identifizieren.
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, wie oft eine Übersetzung bei Google Übersetzer als minderwertig eingestuft wird, um Probleme bei der Nutzung des Dienstes zu beheben.
Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Funktionen, die für unsere Nutzer hilfreich sind.
Zum Beispiel analysieren wir Daten zur Anzahl der in Google Übersetzer angefertigten Übersetzungen, um mögliche neue Funktionen zu ermitteln.
Einhalten von Verpflichtungen gegenüber unseren Partnern wie Entwicklern und Rechteinhabern.
Zum Beispiel erstellen wir Berichte für die Lizenzgeber von Inhalten, die mit der Zahlung von Lizenzgebühren einhergehen.
Für die Kommunikation mit Ihnen – Wir verwenden die von uns erhobenen Daten, wie etwa Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, um direkt mit Ihnen zu interagieren.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
So könnten wir Ihnen beispielsweise eine Benachrichtigung senden, wenn wir verdächtige Aktivitäten feststellen, z. B. einen Versuch, sich von einem ungewöhnlichen Standort aus in Ihrem Google-Konto anzumelden.
Möglicherweise informieren wir Sie über anstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen unserer Dienste.
Wenn Sie Google kontaktieren, zeichnen wir Ihre Anfrage auf, um Ihnen bei der Lösung eventuell auftretender Probleme behilflich sein zu können.
Google-Dienste wie Google Fotos können Ihnen, abhängig von Ihren Einstellungen, Marketingmitteilungen über Angebote wie beispielsweise Rabattaktionen für Fotodrucke senden.
Google-Dienste wie YouTube Premium und YouTube Music Premium können Sie über anstehende Änderungen Ihres Abonnements informieren.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Zur
Ausführung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise wenn Sie den Google-Support kontaktieren oder sich für Mitteilungen über Produktupdates anmelden.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Wir informieren Sie beispielsweise über unsere Dienste, beispielsweise über anstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen.
Marketing, um Nutzer über unsere Dienste zu informieren.
Zum Beispiel können wir eine E-Mail an Nutzer von Google Fotos senden, die Informationen zu einer Rabattaktion für Fotodrucke enthält.
Zum Schutz von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit
Zur Verbesserung der Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit unserer Dienste. Dazu zählen das Erkennen, Verhindern und Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln und technischen Problemen, die Google, unseren Nutzern oder der Öffentlichkeit schaden könnten.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir erheben und analysieren IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten, um unsere Dienste durch automatisierte Mechanismen vor Missbrauch zu schützen. Dieser Missbrauch kann viele verschiedene Formen annehmen, zum Beispiel das Senden von Spam an Gmail-Nutzer. Außerdem könnte Werbetreibenden durch betrügerisches Klicken auf Werbung Geld gestohlen werden oder Inhalte durch das Starten eines Distributed-Denial-of-Service-Angriffs (DDoS) unterdrückt werden.
Mit der Funktion "Letzte Kontoaktivität" in Gmail können Sie feststellen, ob und wann eine andere Person ohne Ihr Wissen auf Ihre E-Mail zugegriffen hat. In dieser Funktion finden Sie Informationen zu den letzten Aktivitäten in Gmail, wie etwa die IP-Adressen, über die auf Ihre E-Mails zugegriffen wurde, sowie wo und wann der Zugriff erfolgt ist.
Wir analysieren Ihre Inhalte, um
Missbrauch wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte zu erkennen
.
Wir verarbeiten Informationen zu Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten aus unseren Diensten gemäß den Richtlinien von Google zur Entfernung von Inhalten oder gemäß anwendbarem Recht, um das betreffende Ersuchen zu prüfen, Transparenz zu gewährleisten, die Fähigkeit zur Rechenschaftslegung zu verbessern und Missbrauch und Betrug bei diesen Verfahren zu verhindern.
Zur Einhaltung geltender Gesetze, Verordnungen sowie Rechtsverfahren oder Befolgung eines vollstreckbaren behördlichen Ersuchens.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wie andere Technologie- und Kommunikationsunternehmen auch erhält Google regelmäßig Anfragen von staatlichen Behörden und Gerichten auf der ganzen Welt, in denen wir zur Offenlegung von Nutzerdaten aufgefordert werden. Die Achtung Ihrer Privatsphäre und die Sicherheit Ihrer gespeicherten Daten sind zwei wesentliche Aspekte, an denen wir uns bei der Frage orientieren, ob wir diesen rechtlichen Anfragen nachkommen. Unsere Rechtsabteilung prüft jede einzelne Anfrage unabhängig von ihrer Art. Häufig werden Anfragen abgelehnt, die zu allgemein gehalten sind oder bei denen das korrekte Verfahren nicht eingehalten wurde.
Aufgrund rechtlicher Verpflichtungen müssen wir bestimmte Daten speichern, etwa aufgrund einer Dokumentationspflicht im Finanzbereich. Beispielsweise speichern wir aus steuerrechtlichen oder buchhalterischen Gründen Daten zu Zahlungen, die Sie an Google geleistet haben.
Verschiedene Gesetze und Vorschriften verpflichten uns dazu, Maßnahmen zu ergreifen, um sicherzustellen, dass unsere Nutzer alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen. Um Ihr Alter zu bestimmen, verarbeiten wir das von Ihnen angegebene Geburtsdatum. Wir verarbeiten auch Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten, sowohl wenn Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet als auch wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, und verwenden maschinelles Lernen, um festzustellen, ob Sie wahrscheinlich über 18 Jahre alt sind. In bestimmten Fällen, wenn wir nicht bestätigen können, dass Sie alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen, können wir andere Informationen anfordern, um Ihr Alter zu überprüfen, beispielsweise Ihren Personalausweis, Ihre Kreditkarte, ein Foto von Ihnen oder Ihre Telefonnummer.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Durchsetzen rechtlicher Forderungen, einschließlich der Untersuchung möglicher Verletzungen anwendbarer Nutzungsbedingungen.
Wir analysieren beispielsweise Inhalte, um Missbrauch wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte zu erkennen.
Aufdecken, Verhindern oder anderweitiges Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln oder technischen Problemen bei unseren Diensten.
Zum Beispiel erheben und analysieren wir IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten zum Schutz vor automatisiertem Missbrauch.
Schutz der Rechte, des Eigentums und der Sicherheit von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit vor Schaden, einschließlich der Offenlegung von Informationen gegenüber Behörden.
Beispielsweise reagieren wir auf gerichtliche Verfahren oder vollstreckbare Aufforderungen von staatlichen Stellen und Gerichten zur Offenlegung von Daten, nachdem jede Anfrage sorgfältig geprüft wurde, um sicherzustellen, dass sie den anwendbaren Gesetzen entspricht.
Recherchen, durch die unsere Dienste für Nutzer verbessert werden und die für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind.
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten, um die Öffentlichkeit zu informieren, Recherchen zu ermöglichen und Transparenz in Bezug auf diese Ersuchen zu bieten.
Wenn dies zum Schutz Ihrer
lebenswichtigen Interessen
oder denen einer anderen Person erforderlich ist. Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Daten, um sexuellen Missbrauch von Kindern im Internet zu erkennen und zu bekämpfen.
Wenn wir eine
rechtliche Verpflichtung
haben, zum Beispiel zur Aufbewahrung bestimmter Informationen zu Zwecken der Dokumentationspflicht oder zur Verarbeitung und Aufbewahrung von Informationen, um dabei zu helfen sicherzustellen, dass die Nutzer alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen.
Google-Dienste verknüpfen
Wenn Sie ein Nutzer in der EU sind, bieten wir Ihnen die Wahl, eine Verknüpfung zwischen bestimmten Google-Diensten beizubehalten. Weitere Informationen zu Ihren verknüpften Diensten und zum Verwalten Ihrer Auswahl finden Sie unter
Informationen zum GDM und zu Ihren verknüpften Diensten
.
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Anwendungsbereich dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt für alle Dienste, die von Google LLC und seinen
verbundenen Unternehmen
angeboten werden, einschließlich YouTube, Android und Dienste, die auf Websites Dritter bereitgestellt werden, wie Werbedienste. Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt nicht für Dienste, für die gesonderte Datenschutzrichtlinien gelten und die die vorliegende Datenschutzerklärung nicht beinhalten.
Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt nicht für
den Umgang mit Daten durch andere Unternehmen und Organisationen, die unsere Dienste bewerben,
Dienste, die von anderen Unternehmen oder Personen angeboten werden, einschließlich von ihnen angebotene Produkte oder Websites, die möglicherweise Google-Dienste beinhalten, für die die Erklärung gilt, sowie Produkte oder Websites, die Ihnen in Suchergebnissen angezeigt werden oder die über einen Link in unseren Diensten erreicht werden können
Änderungen an dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Wir ändern diese Datenschutzerklärung von Zeit zu Zeit. Wir werden Ihre Rechte im Rahmen dieser Datenschutzerklärung ohne Ihre ausdrückliche Zustimmung nicht einschränken. Wir geben immer das Veröffentlichungsdatum der letzten Änderungen an und bieten Ihnen Zugriff auf
archivierte Versionen
. Bei wesentlichen Änderungen weisen wir deutlicher auf diese hin. So werden Sie zum Beispiel bei bestimmten Diensten per E-Mail über eine Änderung der Datenschutzerklärung benachrichtigt.
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Google-Dienste
Die folgenden Datenschutzhinweise bieten zusätzliche Informationen zu manchen Google-Diensten:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini-Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Mit Family Link verwaltete Google-Konten für Kinder unter 13 Jahren (in einigen Ländern gilt ein anderes Mindestalter für Google-Konten)
Family Link-Leitfaden zum Datenschutz für Kinder und Teenager
Erhebung von Sprach- und Audiodaten im Rahmen von Funktionen für Kinder in Google Assistant
Wenn Sie Mitglied einer Organisation sind, die Google Workspace oder Google Cloud Platform verwendet, erfahren Sie in den
Datenschutzhinweisen zu Google Cloud
, wie diese Dienste Ihre personenbezogenen Informationen erheben und verarbeiten.
Weitere hilfreiche Ressourcen
Die folgenden Links bieten hilfreiche Ressourcen, um weitere Informationen über unsere Praktiken und Datenschutzeinstellungen zu erhalten.
Ihr Google-Konto
verfügt über zahlreiche Einstellungen, mit denen Sie Ihr Konto verwalten können.
Der
Privatsphärecheck
führt Sie durch die wichtigsten Datenschutzeinstellungen für Ihr Google-Konto.
Im
Google Sicherheitscenter
erhalten Sie Informationen zu unseren integrierten Sicherheitsmaßnahmen und Datenschutzeinstellungen. Außerdem können Sie hier die Tools kennenlernen, mit denen Sie innerhalb Ihrer Familie Grundregeln für die Nutzung digitaler Onlinemedien aufstellen können.
In den
Google-Datenschutzinformationen für Jugendliche
finden Sie Antworten auf einige der uns am häufigsten gestellten Fragen zum Datenschutz
Der Abschnitt
Datenschutz & Nutzungsbedingungen
bietet weitere Hintergrundinformationen zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung und zu unseren Nutzungsbedingungen.
Unter
Technologien
finden Sie weitere Informationen zu folgenden Themen:
So verwendet Google Cookies
Die für
Werbung
verwendeten Technologien
Wie wir Daten von Websites oder Apps verwenden, auf bzw. in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden
Wichtige Begriffe
Algorithmus
Ein Prozess oder Regelwerk, dem ein Computer beim Ausführen von Problemlösungsverfahren folgt.
Applikationsdaten-Cache
Ein Applikationsdaten-Cache ist ein Datenspeicher auf einem Gerät. Damit kann eine Webanwendung zum Beispiel ohne Internetverbindung ausgeführt oder die Leistung der Anwendung durch schnelleres Laden der Inhalte verbessert werden.
Browser-Webspeicher
Mithilfe des Browser-Webspeichers können Websites Daten in einem Browser auf einem Gerät speichern. Wenn der Speicher als "lokaler Speicher" verwendet wird, können Daten sitzungsübergreifend gespeichert werden. Dadurch sind sie auch nach dem Schließen und erneuten Öffnen des Browsers weiterhin abrufbar. Eine Technologie, die dies ermöglicht, ist HTML 5.
Cookies
Ein Cookie ist eine kleine Datei, die eine Zeichenkette enthält, die an Ihren Computer gesendet wird, wenn Sie eine Website aufrufen. Wenn Sie die Website das nächste Mal besuchen, kann diese anhand des Cookies Ihren Browser wiedererkennen. Cookies können Nutzereinstellungen und andere Informationen speichern. Ihr Browser lässt sich so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies abgelehnt werden oder dass angezeigt wird, wenn ein Cookie gesendet wird. Einige Funktionen oder Dienste einer Website werden ohne Cookies möglicherweise nicht richtig ausgeführt. Lernen Sie mehr darüber,
wie Google Cookies verwendet
und wie Google Daten, einschließlich Cookies, verwendet,
wenn Sie die Websites oder Apps unserer Partner nutzen
Eindeutige IDs
Bei einer eindeutigen ID handelt es sich um eine Zeichenfolge, anhand derer ein Browser, eine App oder ein Gerät eindeutig identifiziert werden kann. Solche IDs haben eine unterschiedliche Verwendungsdauer und unterscheiden sich darin, ob sie durch den Nutzer zurückgesetzt werden können und wie der Nutzer auf sie zugreifen kann.
Eindeutige IDs werden zu verschiedenen Zwecken verwendet, etwa aus Sicherheitsgründen und zur Betrugserkennung, zum Synchronisieren von Diensten wie dem E-Mail-Posteingang oder zum Speichern von Einstellungen und Anbieten personalisierter Werbung. In Cookies gespeicherte eindeutige IDs dienen beispielsweise dazu, Websites die Darstellung von Browserinhalten in Ihrer bevorzugten Sprache zu ermöglichen. Ihr Browser lässt sich so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies abgelehnt werden oder dass angezeigt wird, wenn ein Cookie gesendet wird. Weitere Informationen dazu,
wie Google Cookies verwendet
Auf anderen Plattformen als Browsern werden eindeutige IDs zur Erkennung eines bestimmten Geräts oder einer App auf diesem Gerät verwendet. Eine eindeutige ID wie die Werbe-ID wird beispielsweise verwendet, um Ihnen auf Android-Geräten relevante Werbung anzuzeigen. Dies können Sie in Ihren Geräteeinstellungen
verwalten
. Eindeutige IDs können auch vom Hersteller einem Gerät fest zugewiesen werden. Diese IDs werden gelegentlich auch als "Universally Unique ID" oder kurz "UUID" bezeichnet. Ein Beispiel hierfür ist die IMEI-Nummer eines Smartphones. Anhand dieser eindeutigen ID können wir etwa unseren Dienst an Ihr Gerät anpassen oder Geräteprobleme im Zusammenhang mit unseren Diensten analysieren.
Gerät
Ein Gerät ist ein Computer, mit dessen Hilfe auf Google-Dienste zugegriffen werden kann. Beispielsweise werden Desktop-Computer, Tablets, intelligente Lautsprecher und Smartphones als Geräte bezeichnet.
Google-Konto
Um einige unserer Dienste nutzen zu können, ist es erforderlich, ein
Google-Konto
zu erstellen und einige personenbezogene Daten (typischerweise Ihren Namen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und ein Passwort) anzugeben. Mithilfe dieser Kontoinformationen ist es möglich, Sie zu authentifizieren, wenn Sie auf Dienste von Google zugreifen, und Ihr Konto vor nicht autorisierten Zugriffen durch andere Nutzer zu schützen. Sie können Ihr Konto jederzeit über die Google-Kontoeinstellungen bearbeiten oder löschen.
IP-Adresse
Jedem Gerät, das mit dem Internet verbunden ist, wird eine Nummer zugewiesen. Diese wird als Internet Protocol(IP)-Adresse bezeichnet. Diese Nummern werden normalerweise in Blöcken zugewiesen, die bestimmten geografischen Gebieten zugeordnet sind. Anhand der IP-Adresse kann oftmals der Ort identifiziert werden, von dem aus sich das Gerät mit dem Internet verbindet.
Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden
Nicht-personenbezogene Daten
Das sind Nutzer-Informationen, die erfasst werden, sodass sie nicht länger auf individuell identifizierbare Nutzer verweisen können.
Personenbezogene Daten
Hierbei handelt es sich um Daten, die Sie uns zur Verfügung stellen und anhand derer Sie persönlich identifiziert werden können (z. B. Ihr Name, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse oder Zahlungsinformationen), oder sonstige Daten, die von Google mit Informationen dieser Art in Verbindung gebracht werden können, beispielsweise Informationen, die wir mit Ihrem Google-Konto verknüpfen.
Pixel-Tag
Ein Pixel-Tag wird auf einer Website oder innerhalb einer E-Mail-Nachricht platziert, um bestimmte Aktivitäten wie das Aufrufen von Websites oder das Öffnen von E-Mails zu erfassen. Pixel-Tags werden häufig in Kombination mit Cookies eingesetzt.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten
Hierbei handelt es sich um besondere Kategorien personenbezogener Daten wie etwa vertrauliche medizinische Informationen, die Zugehörigkeit zu einer bestimmten ethnischen Gruppe, politische oder religiöse Gesinnungen oder sexuelle Neigungen.
Serverprotokolle
Wie bei den meisten Websites zeichnen unsere Server automatisch Ihre Aufrufe unserer Websites auf. Diese „Serverprotokolle“ enthalten normalerweise Ihre Webanfrage, die IP-Adresse, den Browsertyp, die Browsersprache, das Datum und die Uhrzeit Ihrer Anfrage sowie ein oder mehrere Cookies, die Ihren Browser eindeutig identifizieren können.
Ein typischer Protokolleintrag für die Suche nach dem Begriff "Autos" sieht folgendermaßen aus:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
ist dabei die IP-Adresse, die der Internetanbieter dem Nutzer zuweist. Je nach Dienst kann dem Nutzer jedes Mal, wenn er eine Verbindung mit dem Internet herstellt, eine andere Adresse zugewiesen werden.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
sind das Datum und die Uhrzeit der Suchanfrage.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
ist die angeforderte URL einschließlich Anfrage.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
sind der verwendete Browser und das verwendete Betriebssystem.
740674ce2123a969
ist die eindeutige Cookie-ID, die diesem Computer beim ersten Besuch von Google zugewiesen wird. Hinweis: Cookies können von Nutzern gelöscht werden. Wenn der Nutzer seit dem letzten Aufruf von Google das Cookie vom Computer gelöscht hat, wird ihm beim nächsten Aufruf von Google auf dem entsprechenden Gerät erneut eine solche eindeutige Cookie-ID zugewiesen.
Verbundene Unternehmen
Ein verbundenes Unternehmen ist eine juristische Person, die zur Google-Unternehmensgruppe gehört, einschließlich der folgenden Unternehmen, die Dienstleistungen in der EU anbieten: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp und Google Dialer Inc. Weitere Informationen zu den
Unternehmen, die Geschäftsdienstleistungen in der EU anbieten
Verweis-URL
Eine Verweis-URL (Uniform Resource Locator) ist die Information, die ein Webbrowser in der Regel an eine Ziel-Website übermittelt, wenn Sie auf einen Link zu der betreffenden Website klicken. Die Verweis-URL enthält die URL der letzten Website, die im Browser aufgerufen wurde.
Zusätzliche Informationen
Ähnliche Informationen im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer körperlichen oder psychischen Gesundheit
Wenn Sie von uns angebotene Fitnessprodukte und ‐Apps wie Fitbit, die Pixel Watch, Nest oder Google Fit verwenden, erheben wir Daten von Ihnen, z. B. Ihre Größe und Ihr Gewicht. Mithilfe dieser Apps und Geräte sammeln wir außerdem Daten wie Schlafrhythmus, Herzfrequenz, Hauttemperatur, verbrannte Kalorien und zurückgelegte Schritte.
Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, die unsere Dienste nutzen
Websites und Apps, bei denen Google-Dienste wie Werbung und Analysen integriert sind, geben Daten an uns weiter.
Diese Daten werden unabhängig vom verwendeten Browser oder Browsermodus erhoben. Beispielsweise kann der Inkognitomodus in Chrome zwar dazu beitragen, dass andere Personen, die Ihr Gerät verwenden, nicht sehen können, welche Inhalte Sie aufgerufen haben. Websites und Apps von Drittanbietern, bei denen unsere Dienste integriert sind, können dennoch Daten an Google weitergeben, wenn Sie sie öffnen.
Hier finden Sie weitere Informationen
zu einigen der Optionen, mit denen Sie festlegen können, welche Daten weitergegeben werden, wenn Sie Websites und Apps öffnen oder nutzen, die Google-Dienste verwenden.
Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und Web- & App-Aktivitäten aktiviert sind, können Daten zu Ihren Aktivitäten auf Websites, in Apps und in Diensten von Google in den Web- & App-Aktivitäten Ihres Kontos gespeichert werden. Einige Aktivitäten können Informationen über den ungefähren Ort enthalten, an dem Sie sich bei der Nutzung des Google-Dienstes aufgehalten haben. Wenn Sie unter Verwendung eines ungefähren Orts nach etwas suchen, wird dafür ein Gebiet von mindestens drei Quadratkilometern verwendet. Alternativ wird der Ort erweitert, bis der Bereich den Standort von mindestens 1.000 Personen umfasst. So wird Ihre Privatsphäre besser geschützt.
In einigen Fällen werden Orte, an denen Sie in der Vergangenheit gesucht haben, möglicherweise dazu verwendet, einen relevanten Standort für Ihre Suche zu schätzen. Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Berlin nach Cafés suchen, zeigt Google bei zukünftigen Suchanfragen möglicherweise Ergebnisse für Berlin an.
Unter
Meine Aktivitäten
können Sie Ihre Web- & App-Aktivitäten ansehen und verwalten.
Android-Gerät mit Google-Apps
Android-Geräte mit Google-Apps sind Geräte, die von Google oder einem unserer Partner verkauft werden und umfassen Smartphones, Kameras, Fahrzeuge, Wearables und Fernseher. Diese Geräte nutzen Google Play-Dienste und andere vorinstallierte Apps. Dazu zählen Dienste wie Gmail, Maps, die Kamera- und Telefon-App Ihres Smartphones, die Sprachausgabe, die Tastatureingabe und Sicherheitsfunktionen. Weitere Informationen über Google Play-Dienste
finden Sie hier
.
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
Im Folgenden finden Sie Beispiele dafür, wie wir Ihre Daten zur Bereitstellung unserer Dienste nutzen:
Wir verwenden die IP-Adresse Ihres Geräts, damit Sie die von Ihnen angeforderten Daten laden können, wie etwa ein YouTube-Video.
Wir verwenden eindeutige IDs, die in Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert sind, um Sie als die Person zu authentifizieren, die auf Ihr Google-Konto zugreifen darf.
Fotos und Videos, die Sie in Google Fotos hochladen, werden verwendet, um Ihnen zu helfen, Alben, Collagen und andere Kreationen zu erstellen, die Sie mit anderen teilen können.
Weitere Informationen
Eine Flugbestätigung, die Sie per E-Mail erhalten, kann verwendet werden, um eine Check-in-Schaltfläche in Gmail zu erstellen.
Wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder Artikel von uns kaufen, teilen Sie uns möglicherweise Informationen wie Ihre Lieferadresse oder Lieferanweisungen mit. Wir verwenden diese Informationen beispielsweise für die Verarbeitung, die Durchführung und die Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung sowie zur Bereitstellung des Supports für den Artikel oder die Dienstleistung, die Sie kaufen.
Bestimmte Google-Dienste
Beispielsweise können Sie
Ihren Blog
aus Blogger oder
eine Google-Website, die Ihnen gehört
, aus Google Sites löschen. Zusätzlich können Sie
Rezensionen
löschen, die Sie zu Apps, Spielen und anderen Inhalten im Play Store verfasst haben.
Bestimmte Partner
Beispielsweise gestatten wir Creatorn und Werbetreibenden, mit Messunternehmen zusammenzuarbeiten, um mithilfe von Cookies oder ähnlichen Technologien mehr über die Zielgruppe ihrer YouTube-Videos oder Werbeanzeigen zu erfahren. Ein weiteres Beispiel sind Händler auf unseren Shopping-Seiten, die mithilfe von Cookies ermitteln, wie viele Nutzer ihre Produkteinträge sehen.
Hier erhalten Sie weitere Informationen
zu diesen Partnern und zu deren Verwendung Ihrer Daten.
Cookies – Damit unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
Wir verwenden beispielsweise ein Cookie namens "lbcs", mit dessen Hilfe sich eine große Zahl von Google Docs-Dokumenten in einem einzigen Browser öffnen lässt. Wird dieses Cookie blockiert, kann Google Docs nicht korrekt ausgeführt werden.
Weitere Informationen
Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten auf dieser Website mit Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites verknüpfen
Google Analytics nutzt eigene Cookies, also Cookies, die vom Google Analytics-Kunden gesetzt wurden. Bei der Verwendung unserer Systeme können Google Analytics-Kunden und Google über Google Analytics generierte Daten mit Drittanbieter-Cookies verknüpfen, die durch Besuche auf anderen Websites generiert wurden. Beispielsweise könnte ein Werbetreibender seine Google Analytics-Daten dazu verwenden, relevantere Werbung zu erstellen oder seinen Traffic genauer zu analysieren.
Weitere Informationen
Der für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Informationen zuständige Datenverantwortliche
Das ist das mit Google verbundene Unternehmen, welches für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten und die Einhaltung der anwendbaren Datenschutzgesetze verantwortlich ist.
der Öffentlichkeit
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten gemäß den Richtlinien von Google zur Entfernung von Inhalten oder gemäß anwendbarem Recht, um das betreffende Ersuchen zu prüfen sowie Transparenz zu gewährleisten, die Rechenschaftspflicht zu verbessern und Missbrauch und Betrug bei diesen Verfahren zu verhindern.
Dienste nutzen, um Anrufe zu tätigen und zu erhalten oder um Nachrichten zu senden und zu empfangen
Beispiele für diese Dienste sind:
Google Voice zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Anrufen, Senden von SMS und Verwalten der Mailbox
Google Meet zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Videoanrufen
Gmail zum Senden und Empfangen von E-Mails
Google Chat zum Senden und Empfangen von Nachrichten
Google Duo zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Videoanrufen und Senden und Empfangen von Nachrichten
Google Fi für einen Telefontarif
Dritte
Beispielsweise verarbeiten wir Ihre Daten, um Rechteinhabern Nutzungsstatistiken bereitzustellen, sie also darüber zu informieren, wie ihre Inhalte in unseren Diensten genutzt wurden. Wir könnten Ihre Daten auch dann verarbeiten, wenn Personen nach Ihrem Namen suchen und wir Suchergebnisse von Websites anzeigen, die öffentlich verfügbare Daten über Sie enthalten.
für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten, um die Öffentlichkeit zu informieren, Recherchen zu ermöglichen und Transparenz in Bezug auf diese Ersuchen zu bieten.
Geeignete Sicherheitsmaßnahmen
Beispielsweise können wir Daten anonymisieren oder verschlüsseln, damit sie mit keinen anderen Daten über Sie verknüpft werden können.
Weitere Informationen
Geräte
Wir können beispielsweise Informationen von Ihren Geräten nutzen, um Ihnen bei der Entscheidung behilflich zu sein, welches Gerät Sie für die Installation einer App oder zum Ansehen eines Films verwenden sollten, die Sie bei Google Play gekauft haben. Diese Informationen verwenden wir außerdem zum Schutz Ihres Kontos.
Gerichtliches Verfahren oder vollstreckbares behördliches Ersuchen
Wie andere Technologie- und Kommunikationsunternehmen auch erhält Google regelmäßig Anfragen von staatlichen Behörden und Gerichten auf der ganzen Welt, in denen wir zur Offenlegung von Nutzerdaten aufgefordert werden. Die Achtung Ihrer Privatsphäre und die Sicherheit Ihrer gespeicherten Daten sind zwei wesentliche Aspekte, an denen wir uns bei der Frage orientieren, ob wir diesen rechtlichen Anfragen nachkommen. Unsere Rechtsabteilung prüft jede einzelne Anfrage unabhängig von ihrer Art. Häufig werden Anfragen abgelehnt, die zu allgemein gehalten sind oder bei denen das korrekte Verfahren nicht eingehalten wurde. Weitere Informationen finden Sie in unserem
Transparenzbericht
.
Gewährleisten und verbessern
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, wie Personen mit Werbung interagieren, um die Leistung unserer Werbeanzeigen zu verbessern.
Gewährleisten, dass unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
Beispielsweise überprüfen wir fortlaufend, ob unsere Systeme ordnungsgemäß funktionieren, sodass Probleme erkannt werden können. Wenn wir feststellen, dass eine Funktion fehlerhaft ist, ermöglichen uns die vor dem Eintreten des Problems erfassten Aktivitätsdaten, das Problem schneller zu beseitigen.
Ihre Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites und in Apps
Diese Aktivitäten könnten durch die Nutzung von Google-Diensten entstehen. Beispiele dafür sind die Synchronisierung Ihres Kontos mit Chrome oder Besuche von Websites und Apps von Google-Partnern. Viele Websites und Apps arbeiten bei der Verbesserung ihrer Inhalte und Dienste mit Google zusammen. Beispielsweise können Websites unsere Werbedienste wie AdSense oder Analysetools wie Google Analytics verwenden oder andere Inhalte wie Videos von YouTube einbetten. Von diesen Produkten können Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten an Google weitergegeben werden. Je nach
Ihren Kontoeinstellungen
und den verwendeten Produkten können diese Daten mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten verknüpft werden, zum Beispiel, wenn ein Partner Google Analytics in Verbindung mit unseren Werbediensten verwendet.
Weitere Informationen über die Datennutzung durch Google
, wenn Sie die Websites oder Apps unserer Partner verwenden
In deren Namen Werbung und Recherchedienste bereitstellen
Beispielsweise können Händler Daten von ihren Kundenkartenprogrammen hochladen, um Informationen zu diesen Programmen in die Such- oder Shopping-Ergebnisse aufzunehmen oder sich ein besseres Bild von der Leistung ihrer Werbekampagnen zu machen. Wir stellen Werbetreibenden nur zusammengefasste Berichte zur Verfügung, die keine Informationen über einzelne Personen preisgeben.
in unseren Diensten erhobene Daten verwenden
Je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen finden Sie im Folgenden Beispiele für die Verwendung der von uns in unseren Diensten erhobenen Daten:
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und eine Suche auf Google durchführen, erscheinen neben Suchergebnissen aus dem öffentlichen Web auch relevante Informationen aus den Inhalten, die in anderen Google-Produkten wie Gmail oder Google Kalender vorhanden sind. Dazu zählen unter anderem der Status Ihrer gebuchten Flüge, Restaurant- und Hotelreservierungen oder Ihre Fotos.
Weitere Informationen
Wenn Sie mit jemandem über Gmail kommuniziert haben und diese Person zu einem Google Docs-Dokument oder einem Termin in Google Kalender hinzufügen möchten, wird die E-Mail-Adresse automatisch vervollständigt, sobald Sie mit der Eingabe des Namens beginnen. Diese Funktion vereinfacht das Teilen von Inhalten mit Freunden und Bekannten.
Weitere Informationen
Die Google App kann Daten nutzen, die Sie in anderen Google-Produkten gespeichert haben, um Ihnen, entsprechend Ihren Einstellungen, personalisierte Inhalte einzublenden. Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Ihren Web- & App-Aktivitäten Suchanfragen gespeichert haben, kann Ihnen die Google App Nachrichtenartikel und andere zu Ihren Interessen passende Informationen auf der Basis Ihrer Aktivitäten zeigen, wie z. B. Sportergebnisse.
Wenn Sie Ihr Google-Konto mit Google Home verknüpfen, können Sie über Google Assistant Ihre Daten verwalten und Dinge erledigen. So können Sie beispielsweise Ihrem Google Kalender Termine hinzufügen oder die Terminübersicht für einen bestimmten Tag aufrufen, Statusaktualisierungen zu einem gebuchten Flug abrufen oder Informationen wie Wegbeschreibungen an Ihr Smartphone senden.
Weitere Informationen
Wenn Sie ein Nutzer in der EU sind, wirken sich Ihre Entscheidungen zum Verknüpfen von Diensten darauf aus, wie bestimmte Google-Dienste die Daten dienstübergreifend verwenden können.
Informationen über Objekte in der Nähe Ihres Geräts
Wenn Sie die Standortdienste von Google unter Android nutzen, können wir die Leistung von Apps verbessern, die, wie Google Maps, Standortdaten benötigen. Wenn Sie den Standortdienst von Google nutzen, sendet Ihr Gerät über Sensoren wie den Beschleunigungsmesser, über nahe gelegene Mobilfunkmasten und über WLAN-Zugangspunkte, wie die MAC-Adresse und die Signalstärke, Informationen an Google. Diese Daten ermöglichen eine bessere Bestimmung Ihres Standorts. Den Google-Standortdienst können Sie in den Einstellungen Ihres Geräts aktivieren.
Weitere Informationen
Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen, die Sie sich ansehen und mit denen Sie interagieren
Beispielsweise erheben wir Daten zu Aufrufen und Interaktionen mit Werbeanzeigen, damit wir Werbetreibenden zusammengefasste Berichte bereitstellen können, aus denen hervorgeht, ob wir ihre Werbeanzeige auf einer Seite ausgeliefert haben und ob die Werbeanzeige von einem Nutzer gesehen wurde. Darüber hinaus können auch andere Interaktionen gemessen werden, etwa wie Sie Ihre Maus über eine Werbeanzeige bewegen oder ob Sie mit der Seite interagieren, auf der die Werbeanzeige eingeblendet wird.
löschen
Sie können beispielsweise, wie oben beschrieben, basierend auf dem anwendbaren Recht (einschließlich Datenschutzrecht) und unseren Richtlinien das
Entfernen von Inhalten aus bestimmten Google-Diensten beantragen
, einschließlich Inhalten, in denen sich möglicherweise Ihre Daten befinden.
Missbrauch erkennen
Wenn wir auf unseren Systemen Spam, Malware, illegale Inhalte (einschließlich
Darstellungen des sexuellen Missbrauchs und der Ausbeutung von Kindern
) und andere Formen von Missbrauch feststellen, die gegen unsere Richtlinien verstoßen, können wir Ihr Konto deaktivieren oder andere angemessene Maßnahmen ergreifen. Unter bestimmten Umständen melden wir den Verstoß auch den zuständigen Behörden.
Öffentlich zugängliche Quellen
Beispielsweise erheben wir Daten, die online oder in anderen öffentlichen Quellen verfügbar sind, um die KI-Modelle von Google zu trainieren sowie Produkte und Funktionen wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI weiterzuentwickeln. Wenn Ihre Unternehmensinformationen auf einer Website erscheinen, können wir sie indexieren und in Google-Diensten anzeigen.
Orte, denen Sie ein Label hinzufügen, z. B. Ihr Zuhause oder Ihr Arbeitsplatz
Sie können wichtige Orte in Ihrem Google-Konto speichern, z. B. Ihr Zuhause oder Ihren Arbeitsplatz. Wenn Sie Ihre Privat- oder Arbeitsadresse festlegen, werden damit bestimmte Aktionen einfacher, etwa das Abrufen von Wegbeschreibungen oder Ergebnissen in der Nähe Ihrer Privat- oder Arbeitsadresse. Außerdem sehen Sie relevantere Werbung.
Sie können Ihre Privat- und Arbeitsadresse jederzeit in Ihrem
Google-Konto
bearbeiten oder löschen.
Partnerschaft mit Google
Es gibt mehr als zwei Millionen Partnerwebsites und -apps im Google-Werbenetzwerk.
Weitere Informationen
Personalisierte Suchergebnisse
Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und die Einstellungen für Web- & App-Aktivitäten aktiviert sind, erhalten Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse auf der Basis Ihrer früheren Suchaktivitäten und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten.
Weitere Informationen dazu erhalten Sie hier.
Auch wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, können Sie personalisierte Suchergebnisse erhalten. Wenn Sie dieses Maß an Personalisierung bei der Suche nicht wünschen, können Sie
privat suchen und surfen
oder die
personalisierte Suche in abgemeldetem Zustand
deaktivieren.
Personalisierte Werbung
Möglicherweise wird Ihnen auch personalisierte Werbung präsentiert, die auf den Daten des Werbetreibenden basiert. Wenn Sie beispielsweise auf der Website eines Werbetreibenden eingekauft haben, kann dieser die Daten über Ihren Besuch zum Einblenden von Werbeanzeigen nutzen.
Weitere Informationen
Personalisierung unserer Dienste
Beispielsweise können wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Suche zeigen, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht.
Personen, mit denen Sie online am häufigsten zu tun haben
Wenn Sie zum Beispiel beim Schreiben einer E-Mail eine Adresse in das Feld "Empfänger", "Cc" oder "Bcc" eingeben, schlägt Gmail Ihnen Adressen von Personen vor,
die Sie am häufigsten kontaktieren
.
Sensible Kategorien
Wenn wir Ihnen personalisierte Werbung präsentieren, so basiert diese auf Themen, von denen wir denken, dass Sie aufgrund Ihrer Aktivitäten daran interessiert sein könnten. Beispielsweise könnten wir Werbung für Themen wie "Kochen und Rezepte" oder "Flugreisen" einblenden. Wir verwenden jedoch nicht solche Themen und schalten nicht solche personalisierten Werbeanzeigen, die auf sensiblen Kategorien wie ethnischer Zugehörigkeit, Religion, sexueller Orientierung oder Gesundheit basieren.
Dasselbe verlangen wie auch von unseren Werbetreibenden
, die unsere Dienste nutzen.
Sensordaten von Ihrem Gerät
Ihr Gerät ist möglicherweise mit Sensoren ausgestattet, die zur genaueren Bestimmung Ihres Standorts und Ihrer Bewegungen verwendet werden können. Beispielsweise kann mithilfe eines Beschleunigungsmessers Ihre Bewegungsgeschwindigkeit erfasst werden und mit einem Gyroskop die Richtung festgestellt werden, in die Sie sich bewegen.
Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden
Server auf der ganzen Welt
Wir betreiben Rechenzentren
auf der ganzen Welt
, um Nutzern unsere Produkte ununterbrochen zur Verfügung stellen zu können.
Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit
Im Folgenden finden Sie Beispiele für die Nutzung Ihrer Daten zur Gewährleistung von Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit unserer Dienste:
Durch das Erheben und Analysieren von IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten können wir unsere Dienste durch automatisierte Mechanismen vor Missbrauch schützen. Dieser Missbrauch nimmt viele verschiedene Formen an, zum Beispiel das Senden von Spam an Gmail-Nutzer. Außerdem könnte Werbetreibenden durch betrügerisches Klicken auf Werbeanzeigen Geld gestohlen werden oder Inhalte durch das Starten eines Distributed-Denial-of-Service-Angriffs (DDoS) unterdrückt werden.
Mit der Funktion "Letzte Kontoaktivität" in Gmail können Sie feststellen, ob und wann eine andere Person ohne Ihr Wissen auf Ihre E-Mail zugegriffen hat. In dieser Funktion finden Sie Informationen zu den letzten Aktivitäten in Gmail, wie etwa die IP-Adressen, über die auf Ihre E-Mails zugegriffen wurde, sowie wo und wann der Zugriff erfolgt ist.
Weitere Informationen
Sprach- und Audiodaten
Sie können zum Beispiel entscheiden, ob Sie möchten, dass Google eine Audioaufnahme in Ihrem Google-Konto speichert, wenn Sie mit der Google Suche, Google Assistant und Google Maps interagieren. Wenn Ihr Gerät einen Befehl zur Aktivierung der Sprachsteuerung erkennt, beispielsweise „Hey Google“, zeichnet Google sowohl Ihre Stimme und Audio als auch einige Sekunden vor der Aktivierung auf.
Weitere Informationen
Synchronisation mit Ihrem Google-Konto
Ihr Chrome-Browserverlauf wird nur dann in Ihrem Konto gespeichert, wenn Sie in Chrome die Synchronisierung mit Ihrem Google-Konto aktiviert haben.
Weitere Informationen
Telefonnummer
Wenn Sie Ihrem Konto Ihre Telefonnummer hinzugefügt haben, kann diese abhängig von Ihren Einstellungen in Google-Diensten für unterschiedliche Zwecke verwendet werden. Beispielsweise kann Ihre Telefonnummer dazu genutzt werden, Ihnen zu helfen, wieder auf Ihr Konto zugreifen zu können, wenn Sie Ihr Passwort vergessen haben. Außerdem kann sie anderen Personen helfen, Sie zu finden und mit Ihnen Kontakt aufzunehmen. Schließlich kann sie verwendet werden, um für Sie relevantere Werbung einzublenden.
Weitere Informationen
Trends aufzuzeigen
Wenn viele Nutzer nach etwas Bestimmtem suchen, kann dies Aufschluss über aktuelle Trends geben. Google Trends analysiert Suchanfragen in der Google Websuche, um die Anzahl der Suchanfragen in einem bestimmten Zeitraum zu ermitteln, und veröffentlicht eine Zusammenfassung dieser Ergebnisse.
Weitere Informationen
Unsere Dienste verbessern
Beispielsweise können wir anhand von Cookies analysieren, wie Nutzer mit unseren Diensten interagieren. Diese Analyse kann uns helfen, unsere Produkte zu optimieren. So könnten wir zum Beispiel feststellen, dass Nutzern die Durchführung einer bestimmten Aufgabe zu lange dauert oder dass manche Schritte überhaupt nicht durchgeführt werden können. In diesem Fall können wir diese Funktion überarbeiten und das Produkt für alle verbessern.
unserer Nutzer
Beispielsweise gibt Google Daten zu Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten aus unseren Diensten an Lumen weiter, um Missbrauch zu verhindern und die Transparenz und Rechenschaft in Bezug auf unsere Moderation von Online-Inhalten zu verbessern. Lumen erfasst und analysiert diese Ersuchen, um Forschung zu ermöglichen, mit deren Hilfe Internetnutzer ihre Rechte besser verstehen.
Weitere Informationen
Vor Missbrauch schützen
Beispielsweise können uns Informationen über Sicherheitsbedrohungen helfen, Sie zu informieren, wenn wir denken, dass Unbefugte Zugriff auf Ihr Konto erlangt haben (an diesem Punkt können wir Ihnen helfen, Maßnahmen zum Schutz Ihres Kontos zu ergreifen).
Werbung, die Sie besonders nützlich finden
Wenn Sie sich beispielsweise auf YouTube Videos zum Thema Backen ansehen, werden Ihnen beim Surfen im Web unter Umständen mehr Werbeanzeigen zu diesem Thema eingeblendet. Anhand Ihrer IP-Adresse können wir auch Ihren ungefähren Standort ermitteln, damit wir Werbung für Pizza-Lieferservices in der Nähe einblenden können, wenn Sie den Suchbegriff "Pizza" eingeben. Hier finden Sie weitere Informationen
über Werbung bei Google
und
warum Ihnen bestimmte Werbeanzeigen präsentiert werden
.
Zahlungsinformationen
Wenn Sie Ihrem Google-Konto eine Kreditkarte oder eine andere Zahlungsmethode hinzufügen, können Sie damit in allen unseren Diensten Artikel einkaufen, wie z. B. Apps im Play Store. Unter Umständen bitten wir Sie um weitere Informationen, wie eine Unternehmenssteuernummer, um Ihre Zahlung verarbeiten zu können. In manchen Fällen müssen wir Ihre Identität überprüfen und könnten Sie dafür nach Informationen fragen.
Wir können Zahlungsinformationen auch verwenden, um zu überprüfen, ob Sie die Altersbeschränkungen einhalten. Dies kann beispielsweise der Fall sein, wenn Sie ein falsches Geburtsdatum angegeben haben, das darauf schließen lässt, dass Sie für ein Google-Konto nicht alt genug sind.
Weitere Informationen
Google
Über Google
Datenschutz
Nutzungsbedingungen
Transparenz-Center
Eine Drop‑down-Liste, um die Sprache der Website zu ändern. Jede Option ist der Name einer Sprache. Es gibt insgesamt 65 Optionen.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Sub-policy 2
https://www.instagram.com/about/legal/privacy/:
Privacy Center home
Search
Privacy topics
More privacy resources
Privacy Policy
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
What information do we collect?
How do we use your information?
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
How do we share information with third parties?
How do the Meta Companies work together?
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
How long do we keep your information?
How do we transfer information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
How will you know the Policy has changed?
How to contact Meta with questions
Legal basis information
Other policies and articles
Settings
Privacy Policy
How we use info for AI at Meta
Based on feedback from regulators, we’re still delaying our plans to use your information from Meta Products to develop and improve
AI at Meta
. We’ll let you know before we start using this information for this purpose, and how you can exercise your right to object.
Other updates
We're updating our Privacy Policy. The updates go into effect on April 7, 2025.
Read the new policy.
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
Effective November 14, 2024
|
View printable version
|
See previous versions
Highlights
We at Meta want you to understand what information we collect, and how we use and share it. That’s why we encourage you to read our Privacy Policy. This helps you use
Meta Products
in the way that’s right for you.
In the Privacy Policy, we explain how we collect, use, share, retain and transfer information. We also let you know your rights. Each section of this Policy includes helpful examples and simpler language to make our practices easier to understand. We’ve also added links to resources where you can learn more about the privacy topics that interest you.
It's important to us that you know how to control your privacy, so we also show you where you can manage your information in the settings of the Meta Products you use. You can
update these settings
to shape your experience.
Read the full Policy below.
What Products does this Policy cover?
Learn more in Privacy Center about managing your privacy
What information do we collect?
Highlights
The information we collect and process about you depends on how you use our
Products
. For example, we collect different information if you sell furniture on Marketplace than if you post a reel on Instagram. When you use our Products, we collect some information about you
even if you don't have an account
.
Here's the information we collect:
Your activity and information you provide
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
Information from partners, vendors and other third parties
What if you don’t let us collect certain information?
Some information is required for our Products to work. Other information is optional, but without it, the quality of your experience might be affected.
Learn more
What if the information we collect doesn’t identify individuals?
In some cases information is de-identified, aggregated, or anonymized by third parties so that it no longer identifies individuals before it’s made available to us. We use this information as described below without trying to re-identify individuals.
Take control
Manage the information we collect about you
Privacy Center
How do we use your information?
Highlights
We use
information we collect
to provide a personalized experience to you, including ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products), along with the other purposes we explain in detail below.
For some of these purposes, we use information
across our Products
from the accounts you choose to add to your Accounts Center, and
across your devices
. The information we use for these purposes is automatically processed by our systems. But in some cases, we also use
manual review
to access and review your information.
To use less information that’s connected to individual users, in some cases we de-identify or aggregate information or anonymize it so that it no longer identifies you. We use this information in the same ways we use your information as described in this section.
Here are the ways we use your information:
To provide, personalize and improve our Products
We use information we have to provide and improve our
Products
. This includes personalizing features, content and
recommendations
, such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
, Stories and ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products). We use
information with special protections
you choose to provide for these purposes, but not to show you ads.
Read more about how we use information to provide, personalize and improve our Products:
How we show ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
How we use information to improve our Products
How we use location-related information
To promote safety, security and integrity
We use information we collect to help protect people from harm and provide safe, secure Products.
Learn more
To provide measurement, analytics and business services
Lots of people rely on our Products to run or promote their businesses or share content. We help them measure how well their ads and other content, products and services are working.
Learn more
To communicate with you
We communicate with you using information you've given us, like contact information you've entered on your profile.
Learn more
To research and innovate for social good
We use information we have, information from researchers and datasets from publicly available sources, professional groups and non-profit groups to conduct and support research.
Learn more
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
Highlights
On Meta Products
Learn more about the different cases when your information can be shared on our
Products
:
People and accounts you share and communicate with
Content others share or reshare about you
Public content
With integrated partners
You can choose to connect with
integrated partners
who use our Products. If you do, these integrated partners receive information about you and your activity.
These integrated partners can always access information that’s public on our Products. Learn more about other information they receive and how they handle your information:
When you use an integrated partner’s product or service
When you interact with someone else’s content on an integrated partner’s product or service
How integrated partners handle your information
Take control
Learn more about audiences
Privacy Center
Manage apps and websites
How do we share information with third parties?
Highlights
We don't sell any of your information to anyone, and we never will. We also require
partners
and other
third parties
to follow rules about how they can and cannot use and disclose the information we provide.
Here’s more detail about who we share information with:
Partners
Advertisers and Audience Network publishers (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
Partners who use our analytics services
Partners who offer goods or services on our Products and commerce services platforms
Integrated partners
Vendors
Measurement vendors
Marketing vendors
Service providers
Service providers
Third parties
External researchers
AI integrations
Other third parties
We also share information with other
third parties
in response to legal requests, to comply with applicable law or to prevent harm.
Read the Policy
.
And if we sell or transfer all or part of our business to someone else, in some cases we’ll give the new owner your information as part of that transaction, but only as the law allows.
How do the Meta Companies work together?
Highlights
We are part of the
Meta Companies
that provide Meta Company Products.
Meta Company Products
include all the
Meta Products
covered by this Policy, plus other products like WhatsApp and more.
We share information we collect, infrastructure, systems and technology with the other Meta Companies.
Learn more
about how we transfer information to other countries.
We also process information that we receive about you from other Meta Companies, according to their terms and policies and as permitted by applicable law. In some cases, Meta acts as a
service provider
for other Meta Companies. We act on their behalf and in accordance with their instructions and terms.
Why we share across the Meta Companies
Meta Products share information with other Meta Companies:
To promote safety, security and integrity and comply with applicable laws
To provide optional features and integrations
To understand how people use and interact with Meta Company Products
See some examples
of why we share.
More resources
Review the privacy policies of the other Meta Companies
Facebook Help Center
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
Highlights
Under applicable data protection law, companies must have a legal basis to process personal data. When we talk about "processing personal data," we mean the ways we collect, use and share your information, as we described in the other sections of this Policy above.
What is our legal basis?
You have the following rights under GDPR and other relevant data protection laws:
Access and correct information
Withdraw consent
Port your information
Download your information
Erase information
Object
Make a complaint
How long do we keep your information?
Highlights
We keep information as long as we need it to provide our Products, comply with legal obligations or protect our or other’s interests. We decide how long we need information on a case-by-case basis. Here’s what we consider when we decide:
If we need it to operate or provide our Products. For example, we need to keep some of your information to maintain your account.
Learn more
.
The feature we use it for, and how that feature works. For example, messages sent using Messenger’s vanish mode are retained for less time than regular messages.
Learn more
.
How long we need to retain the information to comply with certain legal obligations.
See some examples
.
If we need it for other legitimate purposes, such as to prevent harm; investigate possible violations of our terms or policies; promote safety, security and integrity; or protect ourselves, including our rights, property or products
In some instances and for specific reasons, we’ll keep information for an extended period of time.
Read our Policy
about when we may preserve your information.
How do we transfer information?
Highlights
Why is information transferred to other countries?
Where is information transferred?
How do we safeguard your information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
Highlights
We access, preserve, use and share your information:
In response to legal requests, like search warrants, court orders, production orders or subpoenas. These requests come from
third parties
such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
Learn more
about when we respond to legal requests.
In accordance with applicable law
To promote the safety, security and integrity of
Meta Products
, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
.
We may access or preserve your information for an extended amount of time.
Learn more
.
How will you know the Policy has changed?
We'll notify you before we make material changes to this Policy. You’ll have the opportunity to review the revised Policy before you choose to continue using our Products.
How to contact Meta with questions
You can learn more about how privacy works on
Facebook
and on
Instagram
, and in the
Facebook Help Center
. If you have questions about this Policy, or have questions, complaints or requests regarding your information, you can contact us as described below.
The data controller responsible for your information is Meta Platforms Ireland Limited, which you can
contact online
, or by mail at:
Meta Platforms Ireland Limited
ATTN: Privacy Operations
Merrion Road
Dublin 4
D04 X2K5, Ireland
Contact the Data Protection Officer
for Meta Platforms Ireland Limited.
You also have the right to lodge a complaint with Meta Platforms Ireland's lead supervisory authority, the Irish Data Protection Commission, or your local supervisory authority.
Legal basis information
Consent
We process information as described below when you have given us your consent to do so, which we may ask through in-product experiences, to enable particular features, or to enable device-based settings. The categories of information we use and why and how they are processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Processing information with special protections that you provide so we can share it with those you choose, to provide, personalise and improve our Products and to undertake analytics.  We’ll collect, store, publish and apply automated, or sometimes manual, processing for these purposes.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Any information with special protections that you choose to provide, such as your religious views, your sexual orientation, political views, health, racial or ethnic origin, philosophical beliefs or trade union membership, or as part of surveys you choose to participate in, and where you have given your explicit consent
Personalizing ads on the Meta Products:
If we show you ads on Meta Products, including Meta Audience Network, depending on your
settings
, we will use your information across the account(s) in your Accounts Centre to show you ads, including using cookies, to personalize your ads and measure how those ads perform.
If we show you ads on Meta Products, our ads system automatically processes information that we've collected and stored associated with you. In accordance with your Ad settings, our ads system uses this information to understand your interests and your preferences and personalize your ads across the Meta Products.
Learn more
about your Ad settings.
Our ads system prioritizes what ad to show you based on what audience advertisers want to reach. Then we match the ad to people who might be interested.
Learn more
about how our ads system works.
Learn more
about how we choose the ads that you see.
You can change your choice at any time in your “Ad Preferences”.
Your activity and information that you provide
:
Content that you create, such as posts, comments or audio
Content that you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content, including ads, that you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features that you use and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions that you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you're doing on your device, such as whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users'
Device signals
Information that you've shared through your device settings (e.g. GPS location)
Information about the network that you connect your device to
Location-related  information
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Using information from partners, vendors and other third parties to tailor the ads you see: If we show you ads on Meta Products, with your consent we’ll use information that partners, vendors and other third parties provide us about activity off the Meta Products and that we have associated with you to personalize ads that we show you on the Meta Products, and on websites, apps and devices that use our advertising services. We receive this information whether or not you’re logged in or have an account on our Products, see the
Cookies Policy
for more information.
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request when you use some of our Products. For example, when you direct us we share your email address or other information that you might choose to share with an advertiser so that they can contact you with additional information about a promoted product. The type of third party and categories of information shared depend on the circumstances of what you ask us to share.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like your contact, profile or other information, like posts or comments
Collecting information that you allow us to receive through the device-based settings you enable (such as access to your GPS location, camera or photos) which we use to provide the features or services described when you enable the setting.
App, browser and device information
:
Information from device settings
Verifying your identity or account, or helping to protect against suspicious activity including impersonation and identity misuse, using face analysis which may include facial recognition technology if you select it.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Your account information, profile photo, or
your photo or video selfie, if you choose to provide it
When we process information that you provide to us based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal. You also have the right to port that information you provide to us based on your consent. To exercise your rights, visit your device-based settings, and visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings and our Help Centers.
Performance of a contract
For all people who have the legal capacity to enter into an enforceable contract (for example, by being the age of majority or above in their country of residence), we process information as necessary to conclude and perform our contracts with you (the
Meta Terms
and
Instagram Terms
, the
Supplemental Meta Platforms Technologies Terms of Service
, the
Supplemental Portal Terms of Service
, the
Meta AI Terms of Service
and the
Supplemental Meta View Terms of Service
, together, the “terms"). The purposes for which we process information for our contracts, the categories of information we use and how information is processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Personalising the Meta Products (other than ads): Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories); and
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, and in some instances not only automated processing but also manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features,
Undertake analytics, and
Facilitate your purchases and payments on Meta Pay or other Meta checkout experiences.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts, identity and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the
Oversight Board
,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review and, in some cases, remove content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To communicate with you: We use information you’ve given us (like contact information on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
We’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your e-mail address to respond when you contact us.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Transferring, storing or processing your information globally. We share information we collect globally, both internally across our offices and data centers and externally with our partners, third parties and service providers. Because Meta is global, with users, partners and employees around the world, transfers are necessary to:
Operate and provide the services described in the terms that apply to the Meta Product(s) you are using. This includes allowing you to share information and connect with your family and friends around the globe; and
So we can fix, analyze and improve our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
We'll use the information we have to provide these services; if you choose not to provide certain information (other than limited account information which is necessary to create a
Facebook account
or an
Instagram account
), your experience using the Meta Products may be affected. For example, you may see less relevant recommendations on the Products, or your use of the Products may be restricted.
When we process information that you provide to us as necessary for concluding or performing our contracts with you, you have the right to port it under the GDPR. To exercise your rights, visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings, or learn more in our Help Centers.
Compliance with a legal obligation
The categories of information we use, why we process your information based on compliance with a legal obligation and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
For processing information when the law requires it: Where we are under an obligation to disclose information such as, for example, if we receive a valid legal request for certain information (such as an Irish search warrant), we will access, preserve and / or share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others.
The way in which the information will be processed depends on the specific circumstances, see
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and integrity?
for more.
Information for Law Enforcement Authorities
provides information on the operational guidelines law enforcement needs to follow.
Examples of Irish and EU laws enforceable in Ireland that could give rise to an obligation requiring us to process the information we hold about you are:
Civil and commercial matters: where we are in receipt of a court order or otherwise required to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings, such as under Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters.
Criminal matters: to comply with requests from Irish law enforcement to provide information in relation to an investigation, such as under Section 10 of the Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 as amended by 6(1)(a) of the Criminal Justice Act 2006, or to take steps to report information to law enforcement where required.
Consumer matters: to comply with our obligations under consumer law such as the Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014.
Corporate and taxation matters: to comply with our obligations such as the Companies Act 2014.
Regulatory matters: to comply with our obligations to engage with regulators, such as the Data Protection Commission under the General Data Protection Regulation and the Data Protection Act 2018.
Financial matters: to comply with our obligations under applicable financial services law such as the European Union (Payment Services) Regulations 2018
View the
current list of laws
which are enforceable in Ireland that give rise to a legal obligation for Meta which results in the processing of information. New laws may be enacted or other obligations may become binding on our processing of your information which may require us to process your information and we will update this list from time to time.
The categories of information depend on the specific circumstances of each mandatory request or obligation. Only the information necessary to comply with the relevant legal obligation will be processed. For example, for civil matters, this will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information). However, depending on the circumstances it could include the following:
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Legitimate interests
We rely on our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of a third party, where they are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms ("legitimate interests"). The categories of information we use, the legitimate interests relied on and why and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Legitimate interests relied on
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
If you are a registered user of the Meta Products
For people under the age of majority (under 18, in most applicable countries) who have a limited ability to enter into an enforceable contract only, where we may be unable to process your information on the grounds of contractual necessity.
Personalising the Meta Products: Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
News Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories),
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Learn more
about how we use information about you to personalise your experience on and across Meta Products and how we choose the ads that you see.
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
(other than using partner data to tailor ads to you)
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, automated processing, and in some instances manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide advertising products,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features, and
Undertake analytics.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To enable people under the age of majority to use and connect to the Meta Products in an easy and intuitive manner.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public profile information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the Oversight Board,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review, and in some cases remove, content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on the Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
To secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, and to protect the safety of people under the age of majority, including to prevent exploitation or other harms to which such individuals may be particularly vulnerable.
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating with you:
We use information you have given us (like contact information you’ve entered on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
we’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your email address to respond to you when you contact us.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
For all people, including those under the age of majority
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and how their content is performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help users, businesses, and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their content, websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realise using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our other partners; and
In the interests of developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
If we show you ads on Meta Products:
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, advertisers and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, advertisers and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's ads, content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and ads, and how their content and ads are performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help businesses, advertisers and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, advertisers, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realize using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our advertisers and other partners; and
In the interests of advertisers, developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content and advertising on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating, engaging and sharing across the Meta Company Products:
To provide a seamless, consistent and richer, innovative, experience across the Meta Company Products and to enable cross app interactions, sharing, viewing and engaging with content, including posts and videos.
In our interest to provide seamless, consistent and richer, innovative communication, engagement and sharing experiences across Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Business intelligence and analytics:
To understand, in aggregate, your usage of and across our Products, to accurately count people and businesses; and
Validate metrics directly related to these, in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to adhere to (shareholder/earning) reporting obligations.
In our interest to measure the use of our Products and count the people who interact with our Products in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to enable provision of accurate and reliable reporting.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Location-related information
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you:
Depending on your settings, we’ll share marketing communications with you.
We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide, including your contact information like e-mail address
App, browser and device information
:
Device identifiers
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from researchers we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
For example, we analyse information that we have about migration patterns during crises. This helps relief organizations get aid to the right places.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation of information as well as manual (human) review, and share information, as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programmes.
In our interest and those of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Anonymising your information
In some cases, we anonymise information we have about you, such as your activity on and off our Products, and use the resulting information, for example, to provide and improve our Meta Products, including ads.
In our interest to fund our provision of the Meta Products, provide relevant advertising to users, and improve ads delivery and Meta Products;
In the interests of advertisers to help them to reach relevant audiences who may be interested in their information, products or services;
In the interests of users that Meta practice data minimisation and privacy by design in respect of their information
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to legal requests.
See
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promote safety, integrity and security in limited circumstances outside of the performance of our contracts with you:
Our Meta Products are delivered to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We apply automated processing, as well as manual (human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request:
You may choose to share your contact information, profile information and other data with our partners: The types of partners with whom information is shared depends on the features of our service that you use and the manner in which you choose to use them. For example, you may choose to share your email address, birthday, friends list, hometown or other information with a partner if you choose to connect your Facebook account to their app.
To deliver  quality experiences to users who use our partners’ apps, in our best interest and in the interest of our users.
To facilitate and improve users' experiences in their apps, in the interests of our partners who want to facilitate and improve consumers' experiences in their apps.
Information you provide (for example, your email address, birthday, friends’ list and hometown).
If you are using a device we cannot associate with a registered user of the Meta Products
Promote safety, integrity and security:
Our Meta Products are delivered in a manner to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We collect and store information we have for this purpose and apply automated processing and manual (i.e. human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and research and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users generally and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you: We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail address.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide including your contact information like your e-mail address
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from research partners we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programs.
In our interest and in the interest of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to
legal requests
.
See '
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
' for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Provide and improve our Products:
We use information we collect to:
Provide products and curate features
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To improve the Meta Company Products in a consistent manner, to correct technical glitches, and to optimise functionality.
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary to pursue our legitimate interests or those of a third party, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, such processing; to exercise your right, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings.
We will consider several factors when assessing an objection, including: our users' reasonable expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort. Unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons, your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
If you are under the age of majority in your country and there is no enforceable contract in place, we will take particular account of the fact that you are below the age of majority when conducting our assessment of our legitimate interests and the balancing  of your interests and rights. We provide specific protections for people below the age of majority to ensure that they are aware of the risks, consequences, safeguards and rights associated with the processing of their information.
Tasks carried out in the public interest
The purposes for which we anticipate processing your information as a task in the public interest, the processing we undertake, and the information we use is set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Undertaking research for social good:  We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to undertake research and other tasks in the public interest, such as sharing relevant research data with third parties like international organisations and academics both in and outside the EEA. The public interest is required to be laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Articles 168 and 179 of the Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To promote safety, integrity and security: In limited fact specific circumstances, we will access, preserve and share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others where necessary to perform a task in the public interest. For example, we might share information with others for the purposes of combatting unlawful or harmful behaviour where it is in the public interest to do so and where the public interest is laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Section 53 of the Data Protection Act 2018 and Regulation (EU) 2021/1232.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from Partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary for a task carried out in the public interest, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, our processing. To exercise your rights, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings. In assessing an objection, we will consider several factors, including: our users' reasonable user expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort.
Your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information, unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
Protection of your vital interests or that of another person
The categories of information we use, why we process your information to protect your vital interests or those of another person and how it’s processed are set out below
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Protecting the vital interests of you and/or those of another person: We apply automated processing techniques, conduct manual (human) review and share information, including with law enforcement and others, in circumstances where someone’s vital interests require protection, such as in the case of emergencies. These vital interests include protection of your life, physical or mental health, wellbeing or integrity or that of others, and detecting, removing, and reporting illegal content. In protecting such vital interests we aim to combat harmful conduct and promote safety, integrity and security, including, for example, when we are investigating reports of harmful conduct or taking appropriate action, such as sharing information with relevant authorities, when someone needs help.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content,
subject to applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Allow the use of cookies from Instagram on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Instagram, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Allow the use of cookies from Instagram on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Instagram, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Sub-policy 3
https://about.pinterest.com/privacy-policy:
Pinterest Business
Newsroom
News
Company
Impact
Press assets
Contact
Impact
People
Product
planet
Impact
People
Product
planet
Impact
People
Product
planet
Impact
People
Product
planet
Sub-policy 4
https://twitter.com/privacy?lang=de:
Skip to main content
Datenschutzrichtlinien
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Privacy Center
Hilfe-Center
Archiv der Datenschutzerklärungen
PDF herunterladen
X Datenschutzrichtlinien
Gültig ab: 15. November 2024
Vor dem Scrollen bitte lesen
Es ist wirklich schwer, alle mit einer Datenschutzerklärung zufrieden zu stellen. Die meisten Personen, die X nutzen, wollen etwas Kurzes und leicht Verständliches. Wir wünschten zwar, wir könnten alles, was Sie wissen müssen, in einen Post packen, aber unsere Regulierungsbehörden verlangen von uns, dass wir unseren rechtlichen Verpflichtungen nachkommen und alle Richtlinien sehr detailliert beschreiben.
Aus diesem Grund haben wir unsere Datenschutzrichtlinien so einfach wie möglich formuliert, damit Sie in der Lage sind, informierte Entscheidungen zu treffen, wenn Sie X nutzen. Unser Ziel ist, dass Sie verstehen, welche Daten wir erfassen, wie sie genutzt und wann sie weitergegeben werden, und dass Sie Kontrolle darüber haben.
Wenn Sie also nicht jedes Wort der Datenschutzerklärung lesen, sollten Sie wenigstens Folgendes wissen:
X ist eine öffentliche Plattform
Erfahren Sie, was angezeigt und durchsucht werden kann
Wir erheben einige Daten
über Sie
Erfahren Sie, was wir erfassen und wie
Dienste unserer verbundenen Unternehmen können ihre eigenen Richtlinien haben
Erfahren Sie mehr über verbundene Unternehmen
Wir verwenden Ihre Daten zur Verbesserung von X
Erfahren Sie, wie wir Ihre Daten nutzen
Sie haben die Kontrolle über Ihr Erlebnis
Erfahren Sie, wie Sie Ihre Einstellungen aktualisieren
Wenn Sie Fragen zur Datennutzung haben, dann stellen Sie sie!
Erfahren Sie, wie Sie uns kontaktieren können
Datenschutzrichtlinien
1. Daten, die wir erheben
2. Wie wir Daten verwenden
3. Weitergabe von Daten
4. Wie lange wir Daten aufbewahren
5. Übernehmen Sie die Kontrolle
6. Ihre und unsere Rechte
7. Die Zielgruppe von X
8. Änderungen an diesen Datenschutzrichtlinien
9. Allgemein
10. Kontaktaufnahme mit X
Datenschutzrichtlinien
1. Daten, die wir erheben
2. Wie wir Daten verwenden
3. Weitergabe von Daten
4. Wie lange wir Daten aufbewahren
5. Übernehmen Sie die Kontrolle
6. Ihre und unsere Rechte
7. Die Zielgruppe von X
8. Änderungen an diesen Datenschutzrichtlinien
9. Allgemein
10. Kontaktaufnahme mit X
1. Daten, die wir erheben
Die Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie X nutzen, lassen sich in drei Kategorien unterteilen.
1.1 Daten, die Sie uns zur Verfügung stellen.
Zur Nutzung einiger unserer Produkte und Dienste benötigen Sie einen Account, und zur Erstellung eines Accounts müssen Sie uns bestimmte Daten zur Verfügung stellen. Gleichfalls können wir, wenn Sie unsere kostenpflichtigen Produkte und Dienste nutzen, Ihnen diese nicht zur Verfügung stellen, wenn wir Ihre Zahlungsdaten nicht erhalten. Grundsätzlich brauchen wir für viele unserer Produkte und Dienste bestimmte Daten, damit Sie sie nutzen können.
Persönliche Accounts.
Wenn Sie einen Account erstellen, müssen Sie uns einige Daten zur Verfügung stellen, damit wir Ihnen unsere Dienste bereitstellen können. Dazu gehören ein Anzeigename (zum Beispiel „Gestalter*innen“); ein Nutzername (zum Beispiel @XGestalter*innen); ein Passwort; eine E-Mail-Adresse oder Telefonnummer; ein Geburtsdatum, Ihre Anzeigesprache und Daten zur einmaligen Anmeldung bei Dritten (wenn Sie diese Anmeldemethode wählen). Sie können sich auch dafür entscheiden, Ihren Standort in Ihrem Profil und in Ihren Posts zu teilen und Ihr Adressbuch auf X hochzuladen, damit Sie leichter nach Personen suchen können, die Sie kennen. Ihre Profildaten, einschließlich Ihres Anzeigenamens und Ihres Nutzernamens, sind immer öffentlich, aber Sie können entweder Ihren echten Namen oder ein Pseudonym verwenden. Denken Sie auch daran, dass Sie mehrere X Accounts einrichten können, zum Beispiel wenn Sie verschiedene Aspekte Ihrer Identität zum Ausdruck bringen möchten, sei es beruflich oder anderweitig.
Professionelle Accounts.
Wenn Sie einen
professionellen Account
einrichten, müssen Sie uns auch eine professionelle Kategorie angeben und können uns weitere Daten zur Verfügung stellen, einschließlich Postanschrift, Kontakt-E-Mail-Adresse und Kontakt-Telefonnummer. Alle diese Daten sind immer öffentlich.
Zahlungsdaten.
Wenn Sie Werbeanzeigen oder andere Angebote kaufen möchten, die im Rahmen unserer kostenpflichtigen Produkte und Dienste zur Verfügung gestellt werden, müssen Sie uns Zahlungsdaten zur Verfügung stellen, einschließlich Ihrer Kredit- oder Debitkartennummer, des Ablaufdatums der Karte, des CVV-Codes und der Rechnungsadresse.
Bevorzugte Einstellungen.
Wenn Sie in Ihren
Einstellungen
bestimmte Präferenzen angeben, erheben wir diese Daten, damit wir Ihre Wünsche berücksichtigen können.
Biometrische Informationen.
Wenn Sie dazu Ihre Einwilligung gegeben haben, können wir Ihre biometrischen Daten zu Sicherheits- und Identifikationszwecken erfassen und verwenden.
Stellenbewerbungen/Empfehlungen.
Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten (z. B. Informationen aus Ihrer Biografie, Ihren beruflichen Werdegang, Ihren Bildungsgang, Ihre Beschäftigungspräferenzen, Fähigkeiten und Fertigkeiten oder Ihre Aktivität und Interaktionen bei der Stellensuche, zusätzlich zu den Informationen, die wir bereits gemäß dem Abschnitt „Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie X nutzen“ unserer Datenschutzerklärung weiter unten erfassen) dafür erfassen und heranziehen, Ihnen potenzielle Jobs zu empfehlen, sie an potenzielle Arbeitgeber weiterzuleiten, wenn Sie sich auf eine Stelle bewerben, sodass Arbeitgeber potenzielle Kandidat*innen finden können, und Ihnen relevantere Werbung zu zeigen.
1.2 Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie X nutzen.
Wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, erheben wir Daten darüber, wie Sie unsere Produkte und Dienste nutzen. Mithilfe dieser Daten stellen wir Ihnen Produkte und Dienste zur Verfügung und tragen dazu bei, dass X sicherer und respektvoller für alle und relevanter für Sie ist.
Nutzungsinformationen.
Wir erfassen Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten auf X, darunter:
Von Ihnen gepostete Beiträge und andere Inhalte (einschließlich Datum, Anwendung und Version von X) sowie Informationen zu Ihrer Broadcast-Aktivität (z. B. Spaces), einschließlich von Ihnen erstellter Broadcasts und deren Erstellungszeitpunkt, Ihrer Listen, Lesezeichen und Communities, denen Sie angehören.
Ihre Interaktionen mit den Inhalten anderer Nutzer*innen, wie z. B. Reposts, „Gefällt mir“-Angaben, Lesezeichen, geteilten Inhalten, Downloads, Antworten, wenn andere Nutzer*innen Sie in Inhalten erwähnen oder markieren oder wenn Sie sie erwähnen oder markieren, und Broadcasts, an denen Sie teilgenommen haben (einschließlich Ihres Verlaufs in Bezug auf angesehene/angehörte Inhalte, Kommentare, Sprechbeiträge und Reaktionen).
Wie Sie mit anderen auf der Plattform interagieren, beispielsweise mit Personen, denen Sie folgen, und Personen, die Ihnen folgen, Metadaten in Bezug auf
verschlüsselte Nachrichten
und, wenn Sie
Direktnachrichten
verwenden, auch den Inhalt der Nachrichten, die Empfänger*innen sowie Datum und Uhrzeit der Nachrichten.
Wenn Sie mit uns kommunizieren, beispielsweise per E-Mail, erheben wir Daten über die Kommunikation und deren Inhalt.
Wir erheben Daten über Links, mit denen Sie in unseren Diensten interagieren (auch in den E-Mails, die wir Ihnen schicken).
Käufe und Zahlungen.
Damit Sie unter Verwendung von X-Funktionen oder -Diensten eine Zahlung tätigen oder Geld senden können, auch über einen Vermittler, erhalten wir möglicherweise Informationen zu Ihrer Transaktion, etwa wann sie getätigt wurde, wann ein Abonnement abläuft oder automatisch verlängert wird und welche Beträge gezahlt oder erhalten wurden.
Gerätedaten.
Wir erfassen Informationen von und über die Geräte, die Sie für den Zugriff auf X verwenden, darunter:
Daten über Ihre Verbindung, wie beispielsweise Ihre IP-Adresse, den Browsertyp und verwandte Informationen.
Daten über Ihr Gerät und seine Einstellungen, wie beispielsweise Geräte- und Werbe-ID, Betriebssystem, Anbieter, Sprache, Speicher, installierte Apps und Akkustand.
Das Adressbuch Ihres Geräts, wenn Sie sich dazu entschieden haben, es mit uns zu teilen.
Standortinformationen.
Wenn Sie X verwenden, erfassen wir einige Informationen zu Ihrem ungefähren Standort, um Ihnen den erwarteten Dienst bereitzustellen, einschließlich der Anzeige relevanter Werbung. Sie können auch wählen, ob Sie Ihren aktuellen genauen Standort oder Orte, an denen Sie X zuvor genutzt haben, teilen möchten, indem Sie diese Einstellungen in Ihrem Account aktivieren.
Abgeleitete Identität.
Wir können Informationen sammeln oder erhalten, die wir verwenden, um auf Ihre Identität zu schließen, wie unten beschrieben:
Wenn Sie sich mit einem Browser oder Gerät bei X anmelden, verknüpfen wir diesen Browser oder dieses Gerät mit Ihrem Account. Vorbehaltlich Ihrer Einstellungen können wir Ihren Account auch mit anderen Browsern oder Geräten verknüpfen als mit denen, die Sie für die Anmeldung bei X nutzen (oder Ihr abgemeldetes Gerät oder Ihren Browser mit anderen Browsern oder Geräten oder von X generierten Identifikatoren verknüpfen).
Wenn Sie X andere Daten zur Verfügung stellen, einschließlich einer E-Mail-Adresse oder Telefonnummer, verknüpfen wir diese Daten mit Ihrem X Account. Vorbehaltlich Ihrer Einstellungen können wir anhand dieser Daten auch andere Daten über Ihre Identität ableiten, zum Beispiel indem wir Ihren Account mit Hashes von E-Mail-Adressen verknüpfen, die gemeinsame Komponenten mit der E-Mail-Adresse haben, die Sie X zur Verfügung gestellt haben.
Wenn Sie auf X zugreifen und nicht angemeldet sind, können wir anhand der von uns erhobenen Daten Rückschlüsse auf Ihre Identität ziehen.
Protokollinformationen.
Wenn Sie Inhalte auf unseren Produkten und Diensten ansehen oder auf andere Weise mit ihnen interagieren, erhalten wir möglicherweise Informationen, auch wenn Sie keinen Account erstellt haben oder abgemeldet sind, beispielsweise:
IP-Adresse und zugehörige Informationen; Browsertyp und -sprache; Betriebssystem; die verweisende Webseite; Zugriffszeiten; besuchte Seiten; Standort; Ihr Mobilfunkanbieter; Geräteinformationen (einschließlich Geräte- und Anwendungs-IDs); Suchbegriffe und IDs (einschließlich derjenigen, die nicht als Abfragen übermittelt wurden); Ihnen auf X angezeigte Anzeigen; von X generierte Kennungen; und mit Cookies verknüpfte Kennungen. Wir erhalten Protokolldaten auch, wenn Sie auf Links in unseren Diensten klicken, sich diese ansehen oder mit ihnen interagieren, u. a. wenn Sie eine andere Applikation über X installieren.
Werbung.
Wenn Sie Werbung ansehen oder mit ihr interagieren, die wir auf oder außerhalb von X bereitstellen, erfassen wir möglicherweise Informationen zu diesen Ansichten oder Interaktionen (z. B. Ansehen einer Videoanzeige oder eines Prerolls, Anklicken einer Anzeige, Interagieren mit Reposts oder Antworten auf eine Anzeige).
Cookies und ähnliche Technologien.
Wie viele Websites verwenden wir Cookies und ähnliche Technologien, um zusätzliche Daten zur Website-Nutzung zu sammeln und unsere Dienste zu betreiben. Für viele Teile unserer Produkte und Dienste, wie etwa die Suche und Anzeige öffentlicher Profile, sind Cookies nicht erforderlich. Weitere Informationen zur Verwendung von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien finden Sie
hier
.
Interaktionen mit unseren Inhalten auf Websites Dritter.
Wenn Sie sich unsere Inhalte auf Websites von Dritten ansehen, die X Inhalte wie eingebettete Timelines oder Buttons zum Posten integrieren, können wir Protokolldaten erhalten, einschließlich der von Ihnen besuchten Webseite.
1.3 Daten, die wir von Dritten erhalten.
Wenn Sie andere Online-Produkte und -Dienste nutzen, können sie Daten über diese Nutzung an uns weitergeben.
Werbepartner, Entwickler, Verleger.
Unsere Werbe- und Geschäftspartner geben Daten wie Browser-Cookie-IDs, von X generierte Identifikatoren,
IDs von Mobilgeräten, gehashte Nutzerdaten wie E-Mail-Adressen, demografische Daten oder Interessensdaten sowie auf einer Website oder App angesehene Inhalte oder durchgeführte Aktionen an uns weiter. Einige unserer Werbepartner, insbesondere unsere Werbekunden, ermöglichen es uns auch, ähnliche Daten direkt von ihrer Website oder App zu erheben, indem sie unsere Werbetechnologie integrieren. Daten, die von Werbepartnern und verbundenen Unternehmen weitergegeben oder von X von den Websites und Apps der Werbepartner und verbundenen Unternehmen erhoben werden, können mit den anderen Daten kombiniert werden, die Sie mit X teilen und die X erhält,
generiert oder
über Sie ableitet, wie an anderer Stelle in diesen Datenschutzrichtlinien beschrieben.
Andere Dritte, Account-Verbindungen und Integrationen.
Wir können Daten über Sie von Dritten erhalten, die nicht unsere Werbepartner sind, wie beispielsweise von anderen X Nutzer*innen, Entwickler*innen und Partner*innen, die uns helfen, die Sicherheit und Qualität von Inhalten auf unserer Plattform zu bewerten, von unseren
verbundenen Unternehmen
und von anderen Diensten, die Sie mit Ihrem X Account verknüpfen. Sie können sich entscheiden, Ihren X Account mit Ihrem Account bei einem anderen Dienst zu verbinden und dieser andere Dienst kann uns Daten über Ihren Account bei diesem Dienst senden.
2. Wie wir Daten verwenden
Aufgrund der Funktionsweise der Systeme, die unsere Dienste für Sie anbieten, ist es nicht einfach, die Verwendung der von uns erhobenen Daten aufzuschlüsseln. So kann beispielsweise dieselbe Dateninformation in verschiedener Art und Weise für verschiedene Zwecke verwendet werden, damit letztlich ein einziger Dienst erbracht werden kann. Am zweckdienlichsten ist es wahrscheinlich, die fünf wichtigsten Arten und Weisen zu erläutern, in der wir Daten verwenden. Wenn Sie Fragen haben, die nicht beantwortet werden, können Sie uns jederzeit
kontaktieren
. Mehr im Folgenden:
2.1 Betreiben, Verbessern und Personalisieren unserer Dienste.
Die von uns erhobenen Daten nutzen wir zur Bereitstellung und zum Betrieb der X Produkte und Dienste. Außerdem verbessern und personalisieren wir mit den erhobenen Daten unsere Produkte und Dienste, damit Sie ein besseres Erlebnis auf X haben, u. a. indem wir Ihnen relevantere Inhalte und Werbung zeigen, Ihnen Personen und Themen vorschlagen, denen Sie folgen können, und Ihnen helfen,
verbundene Unternehmen
, Apps von Dritten und Dienste zu entdecken. Wir können die Daten, die wir erheben, und öffentlich verfügbare Daten zum Training unserer Modelle für Maschinenlernen oder künstliche Intelligenz für die in dieser Richtlinie dargelegten Zwecke heranziehen.
Wir können die Daten, die wir von Accounts anderer Dienste erheben, bei denen Sie sich zur Verknüpfung mit Ihrem X Accounts entschieden haben, heranziehen, damit wir Ihnen Funktionen wie dienstübergreifendes Posting oder dienstübergreifende Authentifizierung bieten und unsere Dienste betreiben können.
Anhand Ihrer Kontaktdaten helfen wir anderen, Ihren Account zu finden, wenn Ihre Einstellungen dies zulassen, u. a. über Dienste von Dritten und Client-Applikationen.
Vorbehaltlich Ihrer
Einstellungen
stellen wir mithilfe Ihrer Daten unsere Dienste für Werbung und gesponserte Inhalte bereit, was dabei hilft, die Werbeanzeigen auf X für Sie relevanter zu gestalten. Anhand dieser Daten messen wir auch die Effektivität von Werbeanzeigen und helfen, Ihre Geräte zu erkennen, damit wir Werbeanzeigen auf und außerhalb von X für Sie schalten können. Einige unserer Werbepartner ermöglichen es uns auch, ähnliche Daten direkt von ihrer Website oder App zu erheben, indem sie unsere Werbetechnologie integrieren. Daten, die von Werbepartnern und verbundenen Unternehmen weitergegeben oder von X von den Websites und Apps der Werbepartner und verbundenen Unternehmen erhoben werden, können mit den anderen Daten kombiniert werden, die Sie mit X teilen und die X erhält, generiert oder über Sie ableitet, wie an anderer Stelle in unseren Datenschutzrichtlinien beschrieben.
2.2  Sicherheit und Schutz fördern.
Anhand der von uns erhobenen Daten sorgen wir für den Schutz und die Sicherheit unserer Nutzer*innen, unserer Produkte, unserer Dienste und Ihres Accounts. Dazu gehören die Überprüfung Ihrer Identität, die Authentifizierung Ihres Accounts und die Abwehr von Betrug, unbefugter Nutzung und illegalen Aktivitäten. Außerdem bewerten und beeinflussen wir mithilfe der Daten die Sicherheit und Qualität der Inhalte auf X. Das beinhaltet die Untersuchung und Durchsetzung unserer Richtlinien und AGB sowie des geltenden Rechts.
2.3 Messen, Analysieren und Verbessern unserer Dienst.
Anhand der von uns erhobenen Daten messen und analysieren wir die Effektivität unserer Produkte und Dienste und lernen besser verstehen, wie Sie sie nutzen, damit wir sie weiter verbessern können.
2.4 Kommunikation mit Ihnen über unsere Dienste.
Anhand der von uns erhobenen Daten kommunizieren wir mit Ihnen über unsere Produkte und Dienste, u. a. über Produktaktualisierungen und Änderungen unserer Richtlinien und AGB. Wenn Sie sich dafür entscheiden, können wir Ihnen auch gelegentlich Marketingnachrichten schicken.
2.5 Forschung.
Anhand der Daten, die Sie uns mitteilen oder die wir erheben, führen wir Forschung, Umfragen, Produkttests und Fehlerbehebungen durch, die uns helfen, unsere Produkte und Dienste zu betreiben und zu verbessern.
3. Weitergabe von Daten
Sie sollten wissen, auf welche Weise wir Ihre Daten weitergeben, warum wir sie weitergeben und wie Sie dies beeinflussen können. Es gibt fünf grundsätzliche Möglichkeiten, wie wir Ihre Daten weitergeben.
3.1 Wenn Sie posten und teilen.
An die breite Öffentlichkeit
. Sie weisen uns an, diese Daten so weit wie möglich offenzulegen. Die Inhalte von X, einschließlich Ihrer Profildaten (z. B. Name/Pseudonym, Nutzername, Profilbilder), sind für die breite Öffentlichkeit zur Ansicht zugänglich. Die Öffentlichkeit muss sich nicht anmelden, um einen Teil der Inhalte auf X zu sehen. X Inhalte sind auch außerhalb von X auffindbar, zum Beispiel über die Ergebnisse von Suchanfragen in Internet-Suchmaschinen oder in Videos, die heruntergeladen und anderswo geteilt wurden (abhängig von Ihren
Einstellungen
).
An andere X Nutzer*innen.
Abhängig von Ihren
Einstellungen
und basierend auf den X Produkten und Diensten, die Sie nutzen, geben wir Folgendes weiter:
Ihre Interaktionen mit X-Inhalten anderer Benutzer, z. B. Antworten und Personen, denen Sie folgen.
Inhalte, die Sie an bestimmte X Nutzer*innen senden, wie beispielsweise über
Direktnachrichten
. Zur Beachtung: Wenn Sie Daten wie Direktnachrichten oder geschützte Posts mit einer Person geteilt haben, die über einen Dienst eines Dritten auf X zugreift, können die Daten an den Dienst des Dritten weitergegeben werden.
An Partner.
Abhängig von Ihren
Einstellungen
stellen wir auch bestimmten Dritten Daten zur Verfügung, damit sie uns beim Angebot oder Betrieb unserer Produkte und Dienste unterstützen. In unserem
Hilfe-Center
erfahren Sie mehr über diese Partnerschaften. Ob X Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an diese Partner weitergibt, steuern Sie über die Option „Datenaustausch mit Geschäftspartnern“ in Ihren
Einstellungen für Datenschutz und Sicherheit
. (Diese Einstellung steuert nicht die Weitergabe, die an anderer Stelle in diesen Datenschutzrichtlinien beschrieben wird, wie beispielsweise wenn wir Daten mit unseren Dienstleistern oder durch andere als die in diesem
Hilfe-Center
-Artikel beschriebenen Partnerschaften teilen.)
3.2 Mit Drittanbietern und Drittanbieterintegrationen.
An Dienstleister.
Wir können Ihre Daten an unsere
Dienstleister
weitergeben, die in unserem Auftrag Funktionen und Dienste erbringen, u.a. Zahlungsdienstleister, die Zahlungen ermöglichen; Servicepartner, die unsere verschiedenen Blogs und Wikis hosten; Servicepartner, die uns helfen, die Nutzung unserer Dienste zu verstehen, Anbieter von Bewerberverfolgungssystemen, die Bewerber- und Stellendaten an mögliche Arbeitgeber versenden und von ihnen enthalten, und solche, die Betrugserkennungsdienste anbieten.
An Werbekunden.
Werbeeinnahmen ermöglichen es uns, unsere Produkte und Dienste zur Verfügung zu stellen. Werbekunden können Daten aus Ihrer Interaktion mit ihren Werbeanzeigen auf oder außerhalb von X erhalten. Wenn Sie beispielsweise in unseren Diensten auf einen externen Link oder eine Werbeanzeige klicken, kann der Werbekunde oder der Betreiber der Website herausfinden, dass Sie von X gekommen sind, zusammen mit anderen Daten, die mit der Werbeanzeige, auf die Sie geklickt haben, verknüpft sind, wie beispielsweise Merkmale der Zielgruppe, die damit erreicht werden sollte, und andere von X generierte Identifikatoren für diese Werbeanzeige. Sie können auch andere personenbezogene Daten von Ihnen erheben, wie beispielsweise Cookie-Identifikatoren oder Ihre IP-Adresse.
Inhalte und Integrationen von Dritten.
Wir geben Ihre Daten mit Ihrer Einwilligung oder auf Ihre Anweisung hin weiter oder legen diese offen, beispielsweise wenn Sie
einen Web-Client oder eine Applikation eines Dritten autorisieren
, auf Ihren Account zuzugreifen, oder uns anweisen, Ihr Feedback an ein Unternehmen weiterzugeben. Gleichfalls arbeiten wir zur Verbesserung Ihrer Nutzung mit Dritten zusammen, damit ihre Videoinhalte auf X angezeigt oder Inhalte plattformübergreifend geteilt werden können. Wenn Sie sich Inhalte unserer Videopartner oder plattformübergreifenden Partner ansehen oder anderweitig mit diesen interagieren, können diese Ihre personenbezogenen Daten erhalten und verarbeiten, wie in ihren Datenschutzerklärungen beschrieben. Für Videoinhalte können Sie Ihre
Autoplay-Einstellungen
anpassen, wenn Sie möchten, dass die Inhalte nicht automatisch abgespielt werden.
Kooperation mit Dritten.
Wenn Sie die entsprechenden
Einstellungen
vorgenommen haben oder sich dazu entschließen, Ihre Daten weiterzugeben, können wir Ihre Informationen an Dritte weitergeben oder offenlegen. Wenn Sie sich nicht abmelden, können die Empfänger der Informationen diese in einigen Fällen zusätzlich zu den in der Datenschutzrichtlinie von X genannten Zwecken auch für ihre eigenen unabhängigen Zwecke verwenden, darunter beispielsweise zum Trainieren ihrer Modelle künstlicher Intelligenz, ob generativ oder anderweitig.
Durch unsere APIs.
Wir verwenden Technologien wie
APIs
und Einbettungen zur Bereitstellung öffentlicher X Daten für Websites, Apps und andere zu ihrer Nutzung, zum Beispiel damit Posts auf einer Nachrichten-Website angezeigt werden können oder damit analysiert werden kann, was Personen auf X äußern. Wir stellen diese Inhalte in der Regel in begrenztem Umfang kostenlos zur Verfügung und erheben Lizenzgebühren für den Zugriff in großem Umfang. Wir haben
Standard
-Geschäftsbedingungen, die regeln, wie diese Daten verwendet werden können, und ein Compliance-Programm zur Durchsetzung dieser Bedingungen. Diese Personen und Unternehmen sind jedoch nicht mit X verbunden und ihre Angebote spiegeln möglicherweise nicht die Aktualisierungen wider, die Sie auf X vornehmen. Weitere Informationen darüber, wie wir der Welt öffentliche Daten auf X zur Verfügung stellen, finden Sie unter
https://developer.x.com
.
3.3 In Fällen, in denen es gesetzlich vorgeschrieben ist, zur Verhinderung von Schaden oder im öffentlichen Interesse.
Wir können Ihre Daten aufbewahren, verwenden, weitergeben oder offenlegen, wenn wir glauben, dass es für einen der folgenden Zwecke vernünftigerweise notwendig ist:
zur Einhaltung eines Gesetzes, einer Verordnung oder
zur Erfüllung eines rechtsgültigen Verfahrens oder einer behördlichen Anfrage
zum Schutz der Sicherheit einer Person, zum Schutz der Sicherheit oder Integrität unserer Plattform, u. a. zur Verhinderung von Spam, Missbrauch oder böswilligen Akteuren auf unseren Diensten
Erklären, warum wir Inhalte oder Konten aus unseren Diensten entfernt haben (z. B. wegen eines Verstoßes gegen
unsere Regeln
);
zur Lösung von Problemen mit Betrug und Sicherheit oder technischen Problemen
zum Schutz unserer Rechte oder unseres Eigentum oder der Rechte oder des Eigentums der Personen, die unsere Dienste nutzen
Wir können außerdem verschiedene Signale und Ihre Daten zur Ableitung, Aufbewahrung, Nutzung, Weiterleitung oder Offenlegung Ihres Alter und Ihrer Identitätsinformationen heranziehen, damit wir gesetzliche Vorschriften einhalten können sowie je nach Sachlage im Interesse von Sicherheit, Schutz, Betrugsbekämpfung, Sorgfaltspflichten in Bezug auf Kund*innen und Unternehmen sowie zur Identitätsprüfung. Zu diesen Zwecken können wir Ihre Alters- und Identitätsinformationen auch an unsere Partner, Dienstanbieter und andere weitergeben oder offenlegen.
3.4 An unsere verbundenen Unternehmen.
Wir können Daten an unsere
verbundenen Unternehmen
weitergeben, damit unsere Produkte und Dienste zur Verfügung gestellt werden können.
3.5 Änderung der Eigentumsverhältnisse.
Wir können Daten über Sie in Verbindung mit einer Fusion, Übernahme, Reorganisation, einem Verkauf von Vermögenswerten oder einem Konkurs weitergeben, verkaufen oder übertragen. Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt für Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, die (vor und nach dem Abschluss einer Transaktion) an das neue Unternehmen weitergegeben oder übertragen werden.
4. Wie lange wir Daten aufbewahren
Wir bewahren verschiedene Arten von Informationen für unterschiedlich lange Zeiträume auf, abhängig davon, wie lange wir sie benötigen, damit wir Ihnen unsere Produkte und Dienste bereitstellen und unseren gesetzlichen Verpflichtungen nachkommen können, sowie aus Sicherheitsgründen. Zum Beispiel:
Wir speichern Ihre Profilinformationen wie Ihren Anzeigenamen, Benutzernamen, Ihr Passwort und Ihre E-Mail-Adresse für die Dauer Ihres Kontos. Ohne die Speicherung dieser Informationen können wir Ihnen unsere Produkte und Dienstleistungen nicht bereitstellen.
Wir speichern Ihre Nutzungsinformationen, beispielsweise die von Ihnen veröffentlichten Inhalte, Ihre Interaktionen mit den Inhalten anderer Nutzer*innen und Ihre Interaktion mit anderen auf der Plattform, solange Ihr Account besteht oder bis diese Inhalte entfernt werden.
Wir speichern Ihre Zahlungsinformationen, einschließlich Ihrer Kredit- oder Debitkartennummer und Rechnungsadresse, für die Dauer, in der Sie unsere kostenpflichtigen Produkte und Dienste nutzen. Aufzeichnungen von Transaktionen werden im Einklang mit geltendem Recht länger aufbewahrt.
Wenn Sie mit uns kommunizieren, beispielsweise per E-Mail, bewahren wir Informationen über die Kommunikation und deren Inhalt bis zu 18 Monate lang auf, es sei denn, wir müssen sie für einen längeren Zeitraum aufbewahren, um unseren gesetzlichen Verpflichtungen nachzukommen oder unsere gesetzlichen Rechte auszuüben oder zu verteidigen.
Wir erfassen Geräteinformationen, Standortinformationen, abgeleitete Identitätsinformationen und Protokollinformationen im Allgemeinen mithilfe von Cookies. Wir bewahren Cookies und mithilfe von Cookies erfasste Informationen bis zu 13 Monate lang auf. Weitere Informationen zur Verwendung von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien finden Sie
hier
.
Informationen zu Ihren Ansichten oder Interaktionen mit Anzeigen mit oder ohne X sowie zu Ihrer Interaktion mit unseren Inhalten auf Websites von Drittanbietern speichern wir bis zu 90 Tage lang.
Wir speichern von Werbe- und Geschäftspartnern weitergegebene Informationen bis zu 90 Tage lang.
Wenn Sie gegen unsere Regeln verstoßen und Ihr Account gesperrt wird, können wir die Identifikatoren, die Sie zur Erstellung des Accounts verwendet haben (z. B. E-Mail-Adresse oder Telefonnummer), auf unbestimmte Zeit speichern. Dadurch wollen wir verhindern, dass Wiederholungstäter*innen neue Accounts erstellen.
Um gesetzliche Anforderungen zu erfüllen und aus Sicherheitsgründen müssen wir bestimmte Informationen möglicherweise länger aufbewahren, als in unseren Richtlinien angegeben. Zum Beispiel:
Damit wir einem Gesetz, einer Verordnung, einem rechtsgültigen Verfahren oder einer behördlichen Anfrage nachkommen können.
Darunter fällt die Erfüllung einer rechtlich angemessenen Aufbewahrungsanfrage von Strafverfolgungsbehörden. Weitere Informationen zum Zugriff durch Strafverfolgungsbehörden finden Sie
hier
.
Im Zusammenhang mit Rechtsansprüchen, Rechtsstreitigkeiten und behördlichen Angelegenheiten.
Einschließlich der Fälle, in denen es vernünftigerweise notwendig ist, Informationen zu Ihrem Konto aufzubewahren, um X gegen Rechtsansprüche zu verteidigen.
Um die Sicherheit unserer Produkte und Dienstleistungen zu gewährleisten.
Einschließlich der Fälle, in denen es erforderlich ist, Ihre Daten länger zu speichern, um den Missbrauch unserer Produkte und Dienstleistungen zu untersuchen und zu bekämpfen.
Bedenken Sie, dass öffentliche Inhalte auch nach ihrer Entfernung von X noch woanders vorhanden sein können. Suchmaschinen und andere Drittanbieter können beispielsweise Kopien Ihrer Beiträge auf Grundlage ihrer eigenen Datenschutzrichtlinien länger aufbewahren, selbst nachdem sie auf X gelöscht wurden oder abgelaufen sind. Weitere Informationen zur Suchsichtbarkeit finden Sie
hier
.
5. Übernehmen Sie die Kontrolle
5.1 Zugriff, Berichtigung, Übertragbarkeit.
Sie können auf die Daten, die Sie uns zur Verfügung gestellt haben, zugreifen, sie berichtigen oder ändern, indem Sie Ihr Profil bearbeiten und Ihre Account-
Einstellungen
anpassen.
Unter
Deine X Daten
erfahren Sie mehr über die Daten, die wir über Sie erhoben oder abgeleitet haben.
Hier
können Sie Zugriff auf weitere Daten anfordern.
Sie können eine Kopie Ihrer Daten, z. B. Ihrer Posts, herunterladen, indem Sie den Anweisungen
hier
folgen.
Zum Schutz Ihrer Privatsphäre und zur Aufrechterhaltung der Sicherheit ergreifen wir Maßnahmen zur Überprüfung Ihrer Identität, bevor wir Ihnen Auskunft über Ihre personenbezogenen Daten gewähren oder einem Antrag auf Löschung, Übertragbarkeit oder einem anderen damit zusammenhängenden Antrag nachkommen. In bestimmten Situationen können wir Ihren Antrag auf Zugriff, Berichtigung oder Übertragbarkeit ablehnen, z. B. wenn Sie Ihre Identität nicht nachweisen können.
5.2 Löschung Ihrer Daten.
Wenn Sie den Anweisungen
hier
folgen, wird Ihr Account deaktiviert und Ihre Daten werden in eine Warteschlange zur Löschung gestellt. Ist Ihr X Account deaktiviert, sind der Account, Ihr Anzeigename, Ihr Nutzername und Ihr öffentliches Profil auf X.com, in X für iOS und in X für Android nicht mehr sichtbar. Bis zu 30 Tage nach der Deaktivierung ist eine Wiederherstellung Ihres X Accounts möglich, falls er versehentlich oder fälschlich deaktiviert wurde.
5.3 Widerspruch, Einschränkung oder Rückzug Ihrer Einwilligung.
Hier
können Sie Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen und andere Account-Funktionen verwalten. Wenn Sie Ihre Einstellungen ändern, kann es einige Zeit dauern, bis Ihre Auswahl in unseren Systemen vollständig umgesetzt ist. Abhängig davon, welche Einstellungen Sie angepasst haben, können Sie auch Änderungen bei Ihrer X Nutzung oder Einschränkungen beim Zugriff auf bestimmte Funktionen feststellen. Sie können auch zusätzliche Einstellungen verwalten, wenn Sie mit bestimmten Inhalten und Funktionen in verschiedenen Teilen der Plattform interagieren, z. B. ob ein
Space
aufgezeichnet wird oder ob
Videos, die Sie hochladen,
von anderen heruntergeladen werden können.
5.4 Anfragen von bevollmächtigten Vertreter*innen.
Wenn Sie eine Anfrage bezüglich des Zugriffs, der Berichtigung oder der Löschung Ihrer Daten oder der Daten einer anderen Person, deren bevollmächtigte*r Vertreter*in Sie sind, stellen möchten, können Sie sich auch mit der Methode an uns wenden, die im Abschnitt „Wie kann ich X kontaktieren?“ unserer Datenschutzrichtlinien unten beschrieben ist. Wir können von Ihnen verlangen, dass Sie zusätzliche Daten zur Überprüfung zur Verfügung stellen.
6. Ihre und unsere Rechte
Wir stellen X Personen auf der ganzen Welt zur Verfügung und bieten allen unseren Nutzer*innen, unabhängig von ihrem Wohnort, viele der gleichen Datenschutz-Tools und Kontrollmöglichkeiten. Es kann jedoch sein, dass sich Ihre Nutzung etwas anders gestaltet als für Nutzer*innen in anderen Ländern. Das soll sicherstellen, dass X die lokalen Anforderungen respektiert.
6.1 Wir stützen uns bei der Nutzung Ihrer Daten auf bestimmte Rechtsgrundlagen.
X hat die Rechtsgrundlagen, auf deren Grundlage es X erlaubt ist, Ihre Daten zu erheben, zu verwenden, weiterzugeben und anderweitig zu verarbeiten, sorgfältig geprüft. Wenn Sie mehr erfahren und die Feinheiten besser verstehen möchten, empfehlen wir Ihnen, sich diese
zusätzlichen Informationen über die Datenverarbeitung
anzusehen. Und nein, wir verkaufen Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht.
6.2 Wir verlagern Ihre Daten, damit X für Sie funktioniert.
So wie Sie sich mit X nahtlos an globalen Konversationen mit Personen in Ländern auf der ganzen Welt beteiligen, muss X Daten über Grenzen hinweg und in verschiedene Länder auf der ganzen Welt verlagern, damit der sichere und zuverlässige Dienst, auf den Sie sich verlassen, möglich wird. Wenn Sie zum Beispiel in Europa leben und eine Konversation mit jemandem in den USA führen, müssen Daten zwischen diesen Ländern ausgetauscht werden, damit die Konversation möglich wird. Das ist es, was Sie von uns erwarten.
Wir nutzen auch Rechenzentren und Cloud-Anbieter und beauftragen
unsere verbundenen Unternehmen
sowie Dritte und
Dienstleister
in vielen Teilen der Welt, damit sie uns bei der Bereitstellung unserer Dienste helfen. Bevor wir Daten zwischen Ländern übertragen, prüfen wir die Risiken, die für die Daten bestehen können, und verlassen uns, sofern zutreffend, auf
Standardvertragsklauseln
(SCCs), um sicherzustellen, dass Ihre Datenschutzrechte geschützt sind. Um eine Kopie der SCCs anzufordern, kontaktieren Sie uns bitte
hier
. Wenn Daten an Dritte weitergegeben werden, verlangen wir von ihnen, dass sie den gleichen Schutz für Ihre Daten gewährleisten, wie wir selbst bieten.
X ist an Datenschutz-Rahmenvereinbarungen (Data Privacy Frameworks, DPF) zwischen der EU und den USA und zwischen der Schweiz und den USA und an der Ausweitung des EU-US PDF auf das Vereinigte Königreich
beteiligt
. X beachtet bei jeglicher Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten, die aus der Europäischen Union, der Schweiz und dem Vereinigten Königreich stammen, die DPF-Prinzipien in Bezug auf die DPF zwischen der EU und den USA bzw. der Schweiz und den USA bzw. in Bezug auf die Ausweitung des EU-US PDF auf das Vereinigte Königreich. Wenn Sie eine Anfrage oder Beschwerde bezüglich unserer Teilnahme am DPF haben, kontaktieren Sie uns bitte
hier
. Im Rahmen unserer Beteiligung an den DPF versuchen wir bei Streitigkeiten zwischen Ihnen und uns in Bezug auf unsere Einhaltung der DPF-Prinzipien, diese durch unser internes Beschwerdeverfahren zu lösen, alternativ durch die in den USA basierte unabhängige Schlichtungsstelle
JAMS
, und unter bestimmten Bedingungen durch das DPF-Schlichtungsverfahren anhand der Verfahren und gemäß den Bedingungen, die in
Anhang 1
zu den DPF-Prinzipien beschrieben sind. DPF-Teilnehmer unterliegen den Untersuchungs- und Durchsetzungsbefugnissen der US-amerikanischen Federal Trade Commission und anderer autorisierter gesetzlicher Stellen. Unter bestimmten Umständen können die beteiligten Parteien für die Übertragung personenbezogener Daten aus der EU, der Schweiz und dem Vereinigten Königreich an Dritte außerhalb der EU, der Schweiz und des Vereinigten Königreichs haftbar sein. Weitere Informationen zum EU-US-DPF, zum Schweiz-US-DPF und zur britischen Erweiterung des EU-US-DPF
finden Sie hier
.
7. Die Zielgruppe von X
8. Änderungen an diesen Datenschutzrichtlinien
Die aktuellste Version dieser Datenschutzerklärung regelt unsere Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten und wir können diese Datenschutzerklärung gelegentlich nach Bedarf überarbeiten.
Wenn wir diese Datenschutzrichtlinien überarbeiten und Änderungen vornehmen, die wir als wesentlich erachten, werden wir Sie darüber informieren und Ihnen die Möglichkeit geben, die überarbeiteten Datenschutzrichtlinien zu überprüfen, bevor Sie X weiter nutzen.
9. Allgemein
Die X Datenschutzrichtlinien sind auf Englisch verfasst, werden aber durch Übersetzungen in mehreren Sprachen verfügbar gemacht. X strebt an, dass die Übersetzungen die englische Originalversion so genau wie möglich wiedergeben. Im Falle von Abweichungen oder Unstimmigkeiten hat jedoch die englischsprachige Version der X Datenschutzrichtlinien Vorrang. Sie erkennen an, dass Englisch die Referenzsprache für die Interpretation und Konstruktion der Bedingungen der X Datenschutzrichtlinien ist.
10. Kontaktaufnahme mit X
Wir möchten von Ihnen hören, wenn Sie Gedanken oder Fragen zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung haben. Sie können uns über unsere Seite für
Anfragen zum Datenschutz
kontaktieren oder uns an die unten angegebene Adresse schreiben.
Informationen zu unserer Handhabung von Anfragen im Rahmen des California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) finden Sie
hier
. Informationen zur Handhabung von „Consumer Health Data“ und zu zugehörigen Anfragen, wie sie im „My Health My Data Act“ des US-Bundesstaates Washington und in anderen, ähnlichen Gesetzen von US-Bundesstaaten definiert sind, finden Sie
hier
.
Wenn Sie in den USA oder einem anderen Land außerhalb der Europäischen Union, der EFTA-Staaten oder des Vereinigten Königreichs leben, ist der für Ihre personenbezogenen Daten Verantwortliche X Corp. unter folgender Adresse:
X Corp.
Attn: Privacy Policy Inquiry
865 FM 1209, Building 2
Bastrop, TX 78602
Wenn Sie in der Europäischen Union, den EFTA-Staaten oder dem Vereinigten Königreich leben, ist der Datenverantwortliche, der für Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verantwortlich ist, Twitter International Unlimited Company mit der folgenden Adresse:
Twitter International Unlimited Company
Attn: Data Protection Officer
One Cumberland Place, Fenian Street
Dublin 2, D02 AX07 IRLAND
Wenn Sie in der Schweiz wohnen, können Sie unseren Vertreter auch unter der folgenden Adresse kontaktieren:
Twitter Switzerland GmbH
Attn: Data Protection Officer
c/o Wasag Treuhand AG
Bolligenstrasse 18
Bern, 3006, SWITZERLAND
Wenn Sie Bedenken bezüglich unserer
Datenverarbeitungspraktiken
äußern möchten, haben Sie das Recht, sich über die auf ihrer Website aufgelisteten
Kontaktdaten
an Ihre örtliche Aufsichtsbehörde oder an die federführende Aufsichtsbehörde der Twitter International Unlimited Company, die Irish Data Protection Commission, zu wenden.
Vorherige Erklärungen anzeigen
Übernehmen Sie die Kontrolle über Ihre Privatsphäre
Einstellungen anpassen
Cookies… aber nicht zum Essen...
X und seine Partner möchten dir mit Cookies einen besseren, sichereren und
  schnelleren Service bieten und unser Geschäft unterstützen. Einige Cookies sind erforderlich,
  wenn du unsere Services nutzen möchtest, verbessern unsere Services und sorgen dafür, dass sie korrekt funktionieren.
Mehr über deine Wahlmöglichkeiten erfahren
.
Alle Cookies akzeptieren
Unwesentliche Cookies ablehnen
Sub-policy 5
https://tradetracker.com/de/privacy-policy/:
Recent LinkedIn posts
A warm welcome to our new colleagues who have successfully completed the TradeTracker bootcamp.
KAYAK launches their affiliate programme with TradeTracker!
Latest Videos
TradeTracker präsentiert Mobile Metrics!
TradeTracker präsentiert Real Attribution!
Connect
Paul van Doorn
CEO TradeTracker.com
Nach der Gründung von TradeTracker im Jahr 2004, leitete er das Unternehmen mehr als ein Jahrzehnt bis zum heutigen Zeitpunkt: eine international führende Größe im Performance-Marketing.
Wir sind global
Aufgrund TadeTrackers internationaler Präsenz und als Mitglied der Online Gemeinschaft wissen wir die Möglichkeit des Internets bestens zu nutzen, um nationale Grenzen zu überwinden.
Unsere international aufgestellten Geschäftsstellen helfen uns dabei.
Unser Ehrgeiz zu wachsen hat bereits dazu geführt, dass wir in über 19 verschiedenen Ländern vertreten sind und an weiteren Plänen zur Expansion arbeiten.
Europe
Belgique - Français
België - Nederlands
Česká republika
Deutschland
Danmark
España
Suomi - Suomea
France
Italia
Nederland
Norge
Polska
Россия
Sverige
Portugal - Portugues
United Kingdom
Österreich - Deutsch
Eesti
Magyarország
Schweiz - Deutsch
Ukraine
Asia
Middle East - English
India
North America
Mexico
United States
Canada - English
Canada - French
South America
Brasil - Português
Argentina
Affiliate marketing platform - TradeTracker
Vertriebspartner
Werbekunden
Was ist Affiliate Marketing
Eigenschaften
Real Attribution
Mobile Metrics
Admonitor
Werbung
Neuigkeiten
Blog
Events
Videos
Wissenszentrum
Fallstudien
Einblicke
Wissensdatenbank
Glossar
Stellenangebote
Member login
I’m Advertiser
Login
Not already our Advertiser?
Sign up here
I’m Publisher
Login
Not already our Publisher?
Sign up here
DATENSCHUTZ-BESTIMMUNGEN
Bei TradeTracker ist uns Ihre Privatsphäre wichtig. Zum besseren Schutz Ihrer Privatsphäre erklären wir unsere Informationspraktiken und die Wahl, die Sie über die Art und Weise treffen können, wie Ihre persönlichen Daten gesammelt, verwendet und offengelegt werden. Um diese Aussage leicht zu finden, haben wir sie auf unserer Homepage und an jeder Stelle, an der ihre persönlichen Informationen angefordert werden können, zur Verfügung gestellt.
Von uns gesammelte Informationen
TradeTracker sammelt viele Arten von Informationen, um effektiv arbeiten und Ihnen die besten Produkte, Dienstleistungen und Erfahrungen bieten zu können. Wir sammeln Informationen, wenn Sie sich registrieren, sich anmelden und unsere Websites und Dienste nutzen. Wir können auch in einigen Fällen Informationen von anderen Unternehmen erwerben. Wir sammeln diese Informationen auf vielfältige Weise, unter anderem durch Web-Formulare, Technologien wie
cookies
, Web-Protokollierung und Software auf Ihrem Computer oder einem anderen Gerät. Diese Informationen werden nur mit Ihrer Einwilligung oder auf einer vertretbaren rechtlichen Grundlage erhoben. Wir mussten einerseits die Anforderungen unseres Unternehmens berücksichtigen, und andererseits Ihr Recht auf Privatsphäre bestmöglich schützen. Da die Datenerhebung in der Regel mit Hilfe von Cookies erfolgt, finden Sie auf unserer Cookie-Statement-Seite nähere Informationen darüber, welche personenbezogenen Daten wir verarbeiten.
Wie wir Ihre persönlichen Informationen verwenden
TradeTracker nutzt die gesammelten Informationen, um die von uns angebotenen Produkte und Services zu betreiben, zu verbessern und zu personalisieren. Wir können die Informationen auch nutzen, um mit Ihnen zu kommunizieren, zum Beispiel über Ihr Konto und Sicherheits-Updates. Wir können die Informationen auch verwenden, um die Anzeigen, die Sie auf unseren werbefinanzierten Diensten sehen, relevanter zu machen.
Gründe, warum wir Ihre persönlichen Informationen weitergeben
Mit Ausnahme des in dieser Datenschutzerklärung Beschriebenen werden wir ohne Ihre Zustimmung keine persönlichen Daten an Dritte weitergeben, es sei denn, wir sind gesetzlich dazu verpflichtet. Ihre Daten können an Dritte weitergegeben werden, die wir beauftragt haben, um unsere Dienstleistungen zu ermöglichen, wie z.B. Software- oder IT-Lieferanten. Darüber hinaus werden Ihre Daten auch zwischen den verschiedenen an der Online-Werbung beteiligten Parteien ausgetauscht und die Werbewirksamkeit gemessen. Dies sind die Betreiber der Anzeigen und der Websites, die die Werbeanzeigen anzeigen. Diese stellen uns Ihre persönlichen Daten zur Verfügung, woraufhin wir die Informationen über die Verarbeitung dieser Daten austauschen.
Zugriff auf Ihre persönlichen Informationen
Einige TradeTracker-Services geben Ihnen die Möglichkeit, Ihre persönlichen Daten anzuschauen oder online zu bearbeiten. Um zu verhindern, dass Andere Ihre persönlichen Informationen sehen, müssen Sie sich zuerst anmelden. Wie Sie auf Ihre persönlichen Daten zugreifen, hängt davon ab, welche Seiten oder Dienste Sie verwendet haben.
Kommunikationseinstellungen
Sie können die Übertragung zukünftiger Werbe-E-Mails von TradeTracker-Websites und -Diensten unterbinden, indem Sie die spezifischen Anweisungen in der erhaltenen E-Mail befolgen. Abhängig vom jeweiligen Service haben Sie auch die Möglichkeit, proaktiv über den Erhalt von Werbe-E-Mails, Telefonaten und Post für bestimmte TradeTracke- Websites oder -Dienste zu entscheiden.
TradeTracker Account
Ein TradeTracker-Account ermöglicht es Ihnen, sich für TradeTracker-Produkte, -Websites und -Dienste anzumelden. Wenn Sie ein TradeTracker-Konto erstellen, bitten wir Sie um bestimmte Informationen. Wenn Sie sich mit Ihrem TradeTracker Account in einer Website oder einem Dienst anmelden, erfassen wir bestimmte Informationen, um Ihre Identität im Namen der Website oder einer Dienstleistung zu überprüfen, um Sie vor bösartiger Kontonutzung zu schützen und um die Effizienz und Sicherheit des TradeTracker-Kontos zu wahren. Wir senden auch bestimmte, nicht personenbezogene Daten an Webseiten oder Dienste, für die Sie sich mit Ihrem TradeTracker-Konto angemeldet haben.
Versicherung
Ihre persönlichen Daten werden niemals länger gespeichert, als es für die in dieser Datenschutzerklärung oder auf der Website beschriebenen Zwecke erforderlich ist, es sei denn, wir sind gesetzlich dazu verpflichtet.
Sicherheit
Wir nehmen den Schutz Ihrer Daten sehr ernst und ergreifen stets geeignete Maßnahmen, um Missbrauch zu verhindern. Wenn Sie Grund zu der Annahme haben, dass Ihre Daten nicht ordnungsgemäß gesichert sind oder es Anzeichen von Missbrauch gibt, kontaktieren Sie uns bitte umgehend.
Ihre Rechte
Sie haben das Recht, Ihre persönlichen Daten einzusehen, zu korrigieren, zu löschen, zu verschieben oder einzuschränken. Sie haben auch das Recht, Ihre Einwilligung zur Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu widerrufen oder der Verarbeitung zu widersprechen. Sie können solche Anfragen an die untenstehenden Kontaktdaten senden. Wir werden Ihre Anfrage so schnell wie möglich beantworten. Stellen Sie sicher, dass Sie deutlich angeben, wer Sie sind, damit wir sicher sein können, dass wir keine Daten von der falschen Person ändern oder löschen.
Behörde für personenbezogene Daten
Wir möchten Sie auch darauf hinweisen, dass Sie, wenn Sie dies wünschen, eine Beschwerde bei der Bundesbeauftragten für den Datenschutz und die Informationsfreiheit einreichen können.
Änderungen dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Diese Datenschutzerklärung kann sich ändern. Es ist ratsam, diese Erklärung regelmäßig zu prüfen, damit Sie über diese Änderungen informiert sind.
Eine ausführliche Beschreibung finden Sie in unserer internationalen
Datenschutzerklärung
.
Scroll to top
TradeTracker uses cookies. If you continue on our website, you agree with it
placing cookies and processing this data
by us and our partners.
Sub-policy 6
https://www.adgoal.de/de/privacy.html:
As of June 5, 2024, Adgoal is no longer active.
All operations have been taken over by Takeads. If you are an active user, you can log in and retrieve your data by November 5, 2024. For further information or assistance, please visit
https://takeads.com/
Thank you for your understanding.
Log in
Sub-policy 7
http://yieldkit.com/legal-notes/privacy-policy/:
Skip to content
PRIVACY POLICY
WITH THIS PRIVACY POLICY WE WOULD LIKE TO INFORM YOU ABOUT HOW WE PROCESS PERSONAL DATA. THE PROTECTION OF YOUR PRIVACY IS OF THE UTMOST IMPORTANCE TO US, SO IT GOES WITHOUT SAYING THAT WE COMPLY WITH ALL THE LEGAL STIPULATIONS ON DATA PROTECTION.
Name and Contact Details of the Responsible Party
Yieldkit GmbH
Executive Board: David Reed (CEO), Nils Grabbert (CTO), Michael Schambach (CFO)
An der Alster 45, 20099 Hamburg, Germany
Email:
info@yieldkit.com
Phone: +49-40-416-204-01
DATA PROTECTION OFFICER
Should you have any questions about our data protection measures, the processing of your data or the protection of your rights as a data subject, you can contact us and our data protection officer as follows:
EXTERNAL DATA PROTECTION OFFICER
ePrivacy GmbH
represented by Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer
Große Bleichen 21, 20354 Hamburg
If you have any questions or concerns regarding your information, please contact
privacy@yieldkit.com
.
If you wish to communicate directly with our data protection officer (because you have a particularly sensitive matter for example), please contact them by post, as communication by e-mail could always have security gaps. Please state in your request that your concern relates to the company
Yieldkit GmbH.
PERSONAL DATA
To which extent and in which form we process and save personal data depends on the groups of data subjects. Thereby we distinguish as follows: publisher, advertiser/merchant and user.
Publishers
are website operators, who use Yieldkit services by implementing the Yieldkit code to activate and integrate a JavaScript into their website. The management and use of the Yieldkit account takes place over a web-based portal which is accessible through a browser-login.
Advertisers/merchants
are advertisers who use the Yieldkit technologies to connect with publishers who use Yieldkit services. Upon request, the management and use of a Yieldkit account can take place over a web-based portal which is accessible through a browser-login.
We define
partners
as both groups, advertisers/merchants and publishers.
Users
are website visitors, who use  Yieldkit’s publisher websites or websites of Yieldkit itself.
Personal data is all information about identified or identifiable persons. This includes the following categories of personal data that we process, from:
Publishers
First and last name
Address (Street, house number, ZIP-code, city, state, country)
Website(s)
Email address(es)
Login data
Bank details/paypal
Tax information
User data (see user data)
Advertisers/Merchants
First and last name
Address (Street, house number, ZIP-code, city, state, country)
Website(s)
Email address(es)
Login data (if applicable)
Tax information
User Data
Contact information like names, email addresses and your message, if you are using the contact form on our website
Behavioural data (which link is clicked)
Browser and browser version
Operating system
Screen size
Used device
Country
City
Time of access
Referrer (from which domain the user is accessing the website)
Used online-shop and if applicable order value
Online identifier (e.g. Cookie-ID´s)
Anonymized IP-address (shortened)
Logfiles
Website(s) which the user is visiting in the context of the offering
Amount of data transferred
Name of internet service provider
Indication of whether access was successful
IP-adresses
USE OF COOKIES
General Information About Cookies
A cookie is a text file containing an identification number which, when the website is used, is transmitted to the user’s computer together with the other data actually requested and stored there. The file is kept there for later access and serves to authenticate the user. Since cookies are only simple files and not executable programs, they do not pose any danger to the computer.
Depending on the settings selected by the user in their internet browser, the latter automatically accepts cookies. However this setting can be changed and the storage of cookies deactivated or set in such a way that the user is informed as soon as a cookie is set. If the use of cookies is deactivated, some functions of the website may not be available or may only be available to a limited extent. You can prevent the setting of cookies by our website at any time by means of a corresponding setting in the internet browser used and thus permanently object to the setting of cookies.
Cookies that are already active can be deleted at any time via the settings of your internet browser or other software programs. We may work together with advertising partners who help us to make our online offer more interesting for you. In this case, cookies from partner companies may also be stored on your hard drive when you visit our website (cookies from third parties).
Session Cookies
Session cookies are used for the duration of a session and are automatically deleted when the executing browser is closed. They ensure, for example, that video and audio files can be played, that your user input is temporarily stored during the time of entry and thus the user-friendliness is improved.
Persistent Cookies
Persistent cookies remain on your end device after closing the browser. These cookies can, for example, save your user preferences, such as language settings, and analyse user behaviour on our website. Storage duration of persistent cookies corresponds to the respective duration of the individual cookie. Afterwards they are automatically deleted.
Opt-in and Opt-out
Yieldkit adheres to the Europe-wide principles of the EDAA, the Online Behavioral Advertising Framework.
Users who do not agree with the collection of their data can opt-out
here
.
Additionally you can perform a cross-customer opt-in and a cross-customer opt-out, via the “Your Ad
Choices” management by our partner
https://www.youronlinechoices.com/
. To opt-out or opt-in, click
https://www.youronlinechoices.com/uk/your-ad-choices
.
PURPOSE OF PROCESSING
We process your data for the following purposes:  Providing the
Yieldkit
service on our website and the websites of our Publishers  Improvement of our service  Contract fulfillment Customer Care  Partner service  Correspondence  Registration and Login on
Yieldkit
websites  Advertising purposes such as the distribution of our newsletter  Quality assurance and statistics  Solely aggregated reporting for partners.
LEGAL BASIS
We base the processing of your data on the following legal bases:
Your consent, if you have given us such consent (Art. 6 (1) (a) GDPR),
The initiation or execution of a contract with you (Art. 6 (1) (b) GDPR),
The implementation of our legitimate interests (Art. 6 (1) (f) GDPR).
LEGITIMATE INTERESTS
When processing your data, we pursue the following legitimate interests:
Improvement of our service
Protection of our systems against misuse
Statistics
REQUIREMENT OR OBLIGATION TO PROVIDE DATA
Unless this is expressly stated, the provision of your data is not required or obligatory.
RETENTION PERIOD
We store your data,
if you have consented to the processing, at most until you revoke your consent;
if we need the data for the execution of a contract, at most for as long as the contractual relationship with you exists;
if we use the data on the basis of a legitimate interest, at most for as long as your interest in deletion or anonymisation does not outweigh the data;
insofar as statutory storage obligations exist, until the end of the storage periods.
DATA RECIPIENTS
When processing your data, we work with the following service providers who have access to your data:
Autopilot
We use AutopilotHQ,
140 2nd Street 5th Floor San Francisco, CA 94105 United States
for automatic email transmission. Therefore we process email addresses from you. To object or to revoke your consent please contact us via an email to
privacy@yieldkit.de
. For more information, please visit
https://www.autopilothq.com/legal/privacy-policy
.
AWS
We use
Amazon Web Services, Inc., 410 Terry Avenue North, Seattle WA 98109, United States
for hosting our services. Therefore we process online identifier and usage data from our website from you. To object or to revoke your consent please contact us via an email to
privacy@yieldkit.de
. For more information, please visit
https://aws.amazon.com/privacy/?nc1=h_ls
.
Cloudflare
We use the Cloudflare service of Cloudflare Inc., 101 Townsend Street, San Francisco, California 94107, USA as a so-called CDN (Content Delivery Network). The integration takes place to secure our internet presence and to optimise loading times. IP addresses and the data of your browser are processed. Through this service online applications are distributed, accelerated and protected.
To object or to revoke your consent please contact us via an email to
privacy@yieldkit.de
.
For more information, please visit
https://www.cloudflare.com/privacypolicy/
.
Flyeralarm
We use the services of
FLYERALARM GmbH, Alfred-Nobel-Str. 18, 97080 Würzburg as online print shop.
Therefore we process contact data like names and addresses from you in case we are allowed to send you printed advertisements. To object or to revoke your consent please contact us via an email to
privacy@yieldkit.de
. For more information, please visit
https://www.flyeralarm.com/de/content/index/open/id/23/datenschutzerklaerung.html
.
Google Analytics
We use the Google Analytics service and the Google Search Console Integration of Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, 4 Barrow Street, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland. Cookies are used to collect and analyse usage data on our website so that we can optimise and improve our services. We use the anonymisation extension “_anonymizeIp()” for the anonymised recording of the IP address.
Google’s privacy policy:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=de
.
In order to prevent the processing of your data you can download or rather set and save an opt-out cookie via these links:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=de
or
https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/google-analytics-opt-out/fllaojicojecljbmefodhfapmkghcbnh?hl=de
Pipedrive
We use the services of Pipedrive OÜ,
Mustamäe tee 3a, 10615 Tallinn, Estonia for our customer relationship management.
Therefore we process contact details, addresses and rarely mail communications from you. To object or to revoke your consent please contact us via an email to
privacy@yieldkit.de
. For more information, please visit
https://www.pipedrive.com/en/privacy
.
reCaptcha
We use the reCaptcha service of Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, 4 Barrow Street, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland. The service determines whether the input to an internet form is by a bot or other automated processing or by a human being. Your IP address, which is shortened for anonymisation, and data required for reCaptcha are transmitted to Google, whereby no combination of other data from Google takes place.
To the privacy policy of Google:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=de
Trello
We use the tool Trello made available by
Atlassian Corporation PLC,
Primrose Street, C/O Herbert Smith Freehills Llp Exchange House, London EC2A 2EG, United Kingdom as our porject management tool.
Therefore we process contact details, addresses and rarely mail communications from you. To object or to revoke your consent please contact us via an email to
privacy@yieldkit.de
. For more information, please visit
https://www.atlassian.com/legal/privacy-policy
.
TRANSFER TO THIRD COUNTRIES
Data is being transferred to countries outside the European Economic Area. We only transfer personal data to third countries where the EU Commission has confirmed an adequate level of protection or where we can ensure the careful handling of personal data by means of contractual agreements or other suitable guarantees, such as certifications or proven compliance with international security standards.
United States of America (Standard Contractual Clauses)
YOUR RIGHTS
As a data subject, you have the following rights:
To request information about the processing of your data, as well as to receive a copy of your personal data. Among other things you may request information on the purposes of the processing, the categories of personal data processed, the recipients of the data (if a transfer is made), the duration of the storage or the criteria for determining the duration;
To receive personal data relating to you in a structured, common and machine-readable format or to transfer it to another person in charge;
To correct your data. If your personal data is incomplete, you have the right to complete the data, taking into account the purposes of the processing;
To have your data deleted or blocked;
To have the processing restricted;
To object to the processing of your data;
To revoke your consent to the processing of your data for the future
and
To complain to the responsible supervisory authority about unauthorised data processing.
VERSION OF THE PRIVACY POLICY
If our processes change, we will adjust the information in this privacy policy.
Status of this privacy policy:
18.01.2021
Privacy Preference
We need your consent before you can continue on our website.
We use cookies and other technologies on our website. Some of them are essential, while others help us to improve this website and your experience.
Personal data may be processed (e.g. IP addresses), for example for personalized ads and content or ad and content measurement.
You can find more information about the use of your data in our
privacy policy
.
You can revoke or adjust your selection at any time under
Settings
.
Privacy Preference
Essential
Essential cookies enable basic functions and are necessary for the proper function of the website.
Marketing
Marketing cookies are used by third-party advertisers or publishers to display personalized ads. They do this by tracking visitors across websites.
Accept all
Save
Accept only essential cookies
Individual Privacy Preferences
Cookie Details
Privacy Policy
Imprint
Privacy Preference
We use cookies and other technologies on our website. Some of them are essential, while others help us to improve this website and your experience.
Personal data may be processed (e.g. IP addresses), for example for personalized ads and content or ad and content measurement.
You can find more information about the use of your data in our
privacy policy
.
Here you will find an overview of all cookies used. You can give your consent to whole categories or display further information and select certain cookies.
Accept all
Save
Accept only essential cookies
Back
Privacy Preference
Essential (1)
Essential cookies enable basic functions and are necessary for the proper function of the website.
Show Cookie Information
Hide Cookie Information
Name
Borlabs Cookie
Provider
Owner of this website
,
Imprint
Purpose
Saves the visitors preferences selected in the Cookie Box of Borlabs Cookie.
Cookie Name
borlabs-cookie
Cookie Expiry
1 Year
Marketing (1)
Marketing
Marketing cookies are used by third-party advertisers or publishers to display personalized ads. They do this by tracking visitors across websites.
Show Cookie Information
Hide Cookie Information
Accept
Google Analytics
Name
Google Analytics
Provider
Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland
Purpose
Cookie by Google used for website analytics. Generates statistical data on how the visitor uses the website.
Privacy Policy
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en
Cookie Name
_ga,_gat,_gid
Cookie Expiry
2 Months
Privacy Policy
Imprint
Sub-policy 8
https://www.oracle.com/legal/privacy/index.html:
Skip to content
Accessibility Policy
Products
Industries
Resources
Customers
Partners
Developers
Company
Close Search
Search Oracle.com
QUICK LINKS
Oracle Cloud Infrastructure
Oracle Fusion Cloud Applications
Oracle Database
Download Java
Careers at Oracle
Search
Country
Close
Would you like to visit an Oracle country site closer to you?
Visit Oracle
                                    Ireland
No thanks, I'll stay here
See this page for a different country/region
View Accounts
Back
Cloud Account
Sign in to Cloud
Sign Up for Free Cloud Tier
Oracle Account
Sign-In
Create an Account
Help
Sign Out
Contact Sales
Menu
Menu
Privacy @ Oracle
Privacy Policies
Overview of Privacy Policies
General
Services
Recruiting
Facilities and Physical Security
Customer Data Research and Development
Life Sciences Healthcare Research
Restaurants eStore
Dyn Internet Performance Tools
Privacy Choices
Terms of Use
Copyright
Trademarks
Logos
EEO / Pay Transparency
Law Enforcement Requests Report
Country-Specific Privacy Notices
Oracle Cerner
More
Country-Specific Privacy Notices
Oracle Cerner
Overview of Privacy Policies
General
Services
Recruiting
Facilities and Physical Security
Customer Data Research and Development
Life Sciences Healthcare Research
Restaurants eStore
Dyn Internet Performance Tools
Privacy Choices
Oracle respects your preferences concerning the collection and use of your Personal Information. The following Oracle privacy policies are tailored for the different ways your Personal Information may be collected, used, shared and processed by different Oracle lines of business:
The
Oracle General Privacy Policy
addresses information we collect in connection with your use of Oracle websites, mobile applications, and social media pages that link to the General Privacy Policy, your interactions with Oracle during in-person meetings at Oracle facilities or at Oracle events, and in the context of other online or offline sales and marketing activities.
The
Oracle Services Privacy Policy
describes our privacy and security practices that apply when handling (i) services personal information in order to perform Consulting, Technical Support, Cloud and other services on behalf of Oracle customers; and (ii) personal information contained in systems operation data generated by the interaction of (end-)users of these services with Oracle systems and networks.
The
Oracle Recruiting Privacy Policy
addresses information we may collect in connection with Oracle’s online and offline recruiting efforts.
The
Oracle Facilities and Physical Security Privacy Policy
addresses the processing of personal information by Oracle through the use of Facial Recognition technology as part of our safety and security measures in select Oracle campuses and facilities in the United States.
The
Customer Data Research and Development Privacy Policy
describes Oracle’s processing of personal information in connection with Oracle’s artificial intelligence and machine learning activities in order to analyze, develop, and improve Oracle products and services, and for security and compliance purposes.
The
Oracle Life Sciences Healthcare Research Privacy Policy
addresses the processing of  personal information by Oracle Life Sciences to facilitate Oracle health research activities.
The
Oracle Restaurants eStore Privacy Policy
describes Oracle’s processing of personal information in connection with Oracle’s provision of the Oracle Restaurants eStore Products and Services.
The
Dyn Internet Performance Tools Privacy Policy
provides information on the collection, use, sharing and processing of personal information by Oracle in connection with Dyn’s Recursive DNS service, Updater Client, Gauge web browser extension, and RUM beacons.
The
Oracle Advertising Privacy Policy
addresses how Oracle facilitates the collection and use of marketing and interest-based information to help enable interest-based advertising by our Oracle Advertising customers.
Pursuant to the E.U. General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA), and other applicable laws and regulations, individuals may have data subject rights enabling them to request to access, delete, correct, remove or limit the use, or receive a copy of their personal information in Oracle’s possession or for which Oracle is otherwise responsible. If you would like to exercise your rights, please refer to the applicable privacy policy above or visit the
Privacy Choices
tab for more information.
Sub-policy 9
http://amobee.com/privacy/technology/:
Renew or change your cookie consent
X
Trust
GO TO:
Privacy Guidelines
Consumer Opt Out of Targeted Advertising
Infringement Policy
Advertiser Guidelines
Data Guidelines
Inventory Guidelines
General Data Protection Regulation Policy
California Consumer Privacy Act Disclosures
UK Tax Strategy Statement
UK Modern Slavery Act Statement
Privacy Policy
Last Updated: April 6, 2022
Click Here to Opt-Out of Interest-Based Advertising
We, at the Nexxen Group (Tremor International Ltd (a Nexxen Brand), Nexxen Inc. (f/k/a Amobee Inc.), Nexxen Group LLC (f/k/a Unruly LLC and RhythmOne, LLC), Unruly Group Ltd (d/b/a Nexxen Group Ltd.), Tremor Video, Inc. and affiliates (including our Affiliates (as defined below)), collectively the “
Nexxen Group
”, “
Company
”, “
we
”, “
us
” or “
our
”),
understand that your privacy is important to you.  We use advertising cookies and similar tracking technologies (such as SDKs or pixel tags) to automatically collect information about your device (such as your computer, mobile device or Smart-TV) and related activities on certain websites or platforms to send you targeted ads. You may always opt out of our targeted advertisements by clicking on the opt-out button on the relevant device.
Such opt-out will affect only the device where you have made that selection. After you opt out, the Company will no longer collect this information to deliver targeted ads on such device. Ads may continue to be served based on information available in the Internet environment, such as the content of a web page, browser type, time of day and operating system. If you have opted out of our advertising cookies and other similar tracking technologies on a device and subsequently delete the “opt out” cookie from your browser on such device, change your browser, or buy a new computer/device, you will need to repeat this process and opt out again.
We are a member of, and adhere to, the self-regulatory principles of the
European Digital Advertising Alliance
(EDAA).
Contact Us:
privacy@nexxen.com
Last Updated July 10, 2023
We understand that your privacy is important to you. This privacy policy (the “Privacy Policy”) explains how we collect, use, and disclose information collected through our web-based, connected-TV and mobile-based advertising services, as well as the Sites listed below. This policy does not apply to any entities that the Company does not own or control. For information about how we collect and use information through our corporate websites, including
www.nexxen.com
,
www.amobee.com
,
www.tremorinternational.com
,
www.tremorvideo.com
,
www.unruly.co
, and
www.rhythmone.com
(collectively, the “
Sites
“), please scroll down to
Section 9
titled “PRIVACY INFORMATION FOR THE COMPANY’S CORPORATE WEBSITES.” If you’d like to opt-out from having ads tailored to you by Company (whether through web or mobile delivery mechanisms), please follow the instructions in Section 6 (“
Your Choices
”) below.
1. The Company Platform
The Company operates several platforms and services that comprise our “Services.”  These include the Unruly Platform (formally known as RhythmOne Platform), Tremor Video DSP, and Unruly DMP.
As further described below, through our Services, we work with websites, web services, content publishers, mobile applications, and various platforms (like connected TVs, aka “CTV” platforms) that provide services for those types of organizations, in particular to help them display personalized and more engaging ads on their properties. In many cases, providing personalized ads help businesses of all sizes (including small and mid-sized businesses) to get their name out, and help website operators, content publishers, app developers and platform owners to subsidize the cost of their content – often, allowing them to provide consumers with some or all of their content for free.  We also work with advertisers (and their service providers) – brands, retailers, entertainment companies, non-profits and others – to help them advertise in a way that is efficient and relevant to both them and the consumer.   We use data in a variety of ways to help support these businesses, and likewise provide a variety of ways for consumers to control how data is used to market to them.  The purpose of this Privacy Policy is to explain what that data is, how it is used, and what those choices are.
2. The Information We Collect and Use In Providing Our Services
We are able to help advertisers as well as publishers provide more relevant content and targeted advertising by collecting certain information about you, including when you interact with our Services.  This may include your interactions with our customers, which include:
(a) advertisers and other ad partners (collectively, “
Advertisers
”) to show you ads that we think may interest you, on our Services and on other companies’ websites, apps, and devices; and
(b) publishers, app developers and other customers who CTVs, web and mobile apps or other online services (collectively, “
Publishers
”).
In this Privacy Policy, when we use the term “
Customers
”, we are referring to both Advertisers and Publishers, as described above.
Sometimes we work with other marketing or advertising services, demand partners, service providers or data platforms who provide certain services (such as measurement and analytics solutions) to us as well as Customers; we refer to these companies as “
Partners
.”
We (or our Customers or Partners) may provide relevant content and targeted advertising to consumers by using automated technologies such as cookies, including non-HTTP cookies, pixel tags, mobile identifiers and SDKs, each of which we describe below, and in
Section 3
below titled, “Cookies, Pixel Tags, SDKs and Similar Technologies”.   These technologies often generate or collect unique identifiers, such as cookie IDs or mobile advertising IDs.
We describe below these and other categories of information that we receive from consumers’ operating systems, browsers and devices, as well as from Customers, Partners, advertising platforms and networks, and data resellers.  (Some companies may fit into more than one such category.)  We have tried to describe the information that we collect or receive in a way that is easy to understand:
a.    Information that you provide to us directly
We collect certain information that you provide to us, including your contact and other information – for example, when you visit our Sites or when you contact us.
You may also interact with and provide information to us in other ways, including but not limited to when you complete a survey, enter a contest, giveaway, or sweepstakes, choose to hear from us or participate in our marketing or promotion campaigns. When you do so, we collect the information you provide to us, for example, your contact information.
If you submit to us a request to access or delete your information, we will collect your contact information and other information, as needed, to respond to your request.
b. Identifiers automatically collected from website and app sources,
whether directly or through other content and information platforms, including:
Online cookie IDs;
Mobile advertising identifiers (e.g., IDFAs, Ad IDs) and other mobile device or browser identifiers;
IP addresses;
Wi-Fi access points;
Product model numbers;
Chipset IDs; and
Identifiers related to the device used, such as CTVs (e.g. name of device and any “friendly name” assigned by you to the device)
We refer to all of the above as “IDs“
c.    Online usage information or “log” information
We collect data about your interactions with our Sites and the Services. Such data is generally related to the above IDs and include:
Language and region settings;
Data related to or describing a web browser, operating system, and device, such as the name and version of your browser, as well as hardware and software version of the app;
Connection data, including (as described above) current IP address, from which location may be inferred;
Online usage data including websites visited, websites visited prior to a web visit, date/time stamp;
Information related to interactions with ads and marketing, such as consumer engagement with an ad (i.e. ads that you view and click on);
Information related to interactions with websites, such as whether a consumer was “referred” through another website or a shared link;
TV viewership data (including information about the content and programs viewed, and amount of time spent viewing Smart TV content, as further described in this Section 2 on “Viewing Data” below); and
We may link any of the above to our own or our Partners’ and Customers’ IDs.
We receive the above information from Customers and Partners, advertising platforms and networks, and data resellers.  (Some companies may fit into more than one of those categories.)
d.    Demographic and Interest-Based Information
We may collect, use, or create “audience segments” (also referred to as “data segments), which are generally used to tailor advertising and marketing to consumers and to analyze consumer interaction with such ads.  Audience segments are interest-based or demographic-based groupings of large numbers of users, generally in aggregated form, tied to the above IDs.  For instance, an inference that Ad ID X35%979J is interested is “Sports” might be drawn from the fact that the browser often views sports-related content.  Or, an inference that Cookie ID 4Qj7e9!x may be interested in a new car may be drawn from the corresponding browsers frequent search of new automobile reviews.   (Actual IDs are generally much longer strings of code; the above are simply used for illustration.)
Sometimes these inferences are made from “offline data” that is coded and linked to cookies and IDs (and further linked to our own cookies and IDs) by Partners that create “hashed” (coded) values to replace “real-world” identifiers such as email addresses.
Sometimes these inferences are made from demographic information (“protected classifications” for purposes of the California Consumer Privacy Act).
Sometimes, these audience segments are associated with the likelihood to have a particular health condition.   A list of our standard health segments is
here
. (We endeavor to update the list frequently, but the list may not be current to the precise date.)   In addition, we may sometimes create “custom” health-related segments, or work with Customers or Partners who use such segments.  Those “custom” segments change over time, but a representative sample is included. Note that such information is only collected/processed at an aggregate level and solely in the U.S. and Canada.
e.    Transactional information from our Customers
Our Customers may provide us with their own proprietary or licensed information, including “audience segments” described above, to help us better perform or deliver our Services.
f.    Geolocation Information
The mobile information we collect or receive from our Partners and Customers also may include geolocation information, which may be precise, that may help us or our Customers to target ads or tailor content to your precise location. For instance, if we believe that you are often near a particular store in Northern New Jersey, we might send you an ad targeted to that store, rather than another store in the general area.
g.    Viewing Data
We provide advertising services to certain Smart TV and connected devices (like Hisense and VIDAA Smart TVs), which
,
like many CTVs, are equipped with Automatic Content Recognition (“ACR”) functionality that (when enabled) enable us to collect certain information from the device in order to provide personalized advertising and measurement based on the programming  or ads watched on those devices and other devices connected to the same  IP address.
What is Viewing Data?
When enabled on the Smart TV device, the Company will use audio-based ACR technology to collect information about the programming content (e.g. TV channels and shows, movies, and advertisements watched) playing on the device, including content from any media players, gaming consoles, over-the-air broadcast, or other audiovisual sources playing through the Smart TV. We call this information the “
Viewing Data
” and this also includes information such as timestamp, IP address, and Smart TV device identifier.
The ACR technology captures a “fingerprint” from the Smart TV, and the fingerprint is mapped against a content repository and ad catalog to identify what was played through the TV. Content or ad ID, IP address, device ID, and other metadata are appended to the audio fingerprint. These identifiers are ingested into the Company’s platform and mapped to a Household ID, and then aggregated with other data sources.  The ACR process will associate the data collected with the device’s IP address, but otherwise does not utilize directly identifiable personal information for the purposes of personalized advertising or measurement.
For example, we may collect TV viewing information such as the programs, commercials, and channels you view, the date, time and duration of the viewing. It may also include information about the TV or display, including IP address and SmartTV device ID.
How is Viewing Data used and shared?
To create audience segments:
We use Viewing Data, such as the content, programs or ads watched on your Smart TV, to include you and your household in relevant audience segments for interest-based advertising, as described below. A segment is a grouping of consumer profiles by one or more attributes (e.g. food fans, sports enthusiasts, sitcom fans, etc.). Individuals are identified by a digital identifier (like an IP address) in these segments but are not identifiable by name or other personal information that directly reveals their identity. We also share these audience segments with our Partners for their own purposes, including to enable their interest-based advertising activities.
Targeting Personalized Ads:
We use Viewing Data to help us, and our Partners, target and show you personalized ads that we think may interest you or other members of your household (a practice known as “interest-based advertising
“
) across your devices, based on the audience segments created from your Viewing Data (as described above). These ads may be shown to you on your Smart TV or other linked devices sharing the same IP address.
Audience Measurement:
We use Viewing Data to generate measurement reports to help us and our Partners understand the effectiveness of ad campaigns, including the audience that saw their ads and how they responded.  We collect information such as the creative and placement ID, IP address, and whether you viewed or interacted with an ad.
Linking devices for household targeting: With the assistance of our third-party service providers, we use the IP address collected from your Smart TV to identify “households” (a group of linked devices sharing the same IP address broadcast by a modem). This allows us and our Partners to deliver personalized advertising to you and other members of your household across various devices (such as mobile phones and tablets) and browsers based on audience segments associated with your household. If you do not enable
,
or if you otherwise opt-out of personalized advertising on your Smart TV, we will no longer collect and use your Smart TV IP address to identify your household for personalized advertising purposes. However, once you opt out of personalized advertising, you may continue to see personalized advertising on devices that were previously targeted based on Viewing Data that was shared when personalized advertising was still enabled on your Smart TV, prior to the opt-out.
Our Partners:
More information about each of our Partners and how they may use data about you and your household is available at:
https://tremorinternational.com/partners/
How can I turn OFF or ON the Viewing Data (ACR) feature?
The option to enable ACR (and related functionality) is presented during the initial setup of the Smart TV and can also be accessed at any time via the Settings of the Smart TV. You can disable ACR (and related functionality) at any time via the Settings of the Smart TV. Turning the Viewing Data feature off or on will affect only the Smart TV where you have made that selection. Please refer to the device’s Privacy Notice and the Enhanced Viewing Service Privacy Notice of your Smart TV for more information on Viewing Data and your choices.
h.    Further Description of Technologies
For additional explanation of the technologies through which IDs and other data are collected, please see
Section 3
further below regarding cookies, pixel tags and SDKs.  We may use cookies, pixel tags, SDKs and similar technologies to collect the above information, or to associate certain types of information with each other.
i. Information collected from other sources
We also may obtain other behavioral and demographic data from trusted third-party data sources. We may use this data to draw inferences about your preferences, choices, and interests to provide you with customized ads about products and services tailored to your individual interests. We may collect and combine information about your online activities over time and across devices, apps, websites and online services to provide you with customized ads.
3. Cookies, Pixel Tags, SDKs and Similar Technologies
The Company (along with our Partners and Customers) uses a variety of technology to collect information.  These are listed and described below.
a.    Pixels
A tracking “pixel” is a transparent graphic image (usually a 1 x 1 pixel) that is placed on a web page and allows for the collection of information regarding the use of the web page that contains the tracking pixel. The Company collects technical and usage
information
through the use of tracking pixels.
b.    Cookies
A “cookie” is a string of stored code used by a website to send some data to a user’s device.  Depending on the settings of the device or web browser this data may be stored on the user’s device so that the device can later return that data to the same website.  Cookies can be used with online services, such as websites, email deliveries or advertising technologies, to recognize an Internet or mobile-connected device that they have encountered before.  We use cookies to, among other things, “remember” you, track user trends, and collect information about how you use our Customer’s sites or interact with the advertising we (or others) deliver on their behalf.   We likewise use cookies to provide relevant content to you and replace non-relevant ads with ads that better match your interests.   We also use cookies when you visit our corporate Sites.
c.      Mobile Device Identifiers and SDKs
We also sometimes use, or partner with, Publishers or Publisher-facing and app developer platforms that use mobile SDKs to collect information, such as mobile identifiers (e.g., IDFAs and Android Advertising IDs), and information connected to how mobile devices interact with our Services and those using our Services.  A mobile SDK is the mobile app version of a pixel tag or beacon (see “Pixels,” above).  The SDK is a bit of computer code that app developers can include in their apps to enable ads to be shown, data to be collected, and related services to be implemented.  We may use this technology to deliver certain advertising through mobile applications and browsers based on information associated with your mobile device. If you’d like to opt-out from having ads tailored to you in this way on your mobile device, please follow the instructions in Section 6 (“
Your Choices
”) below.
d.      Third Party Suppliers and Vendors
The Company works with third party technology or service providers that provide us with hosting, serving, general campaign or site analytics, ad serving data, or demographic and other audience data about the use and viewership of our Customers’ advertising, or websites that display such advertising. Such third-party providers may utilize pixels, cookies, flash cookies, web beacons and/or similar technologies that may be activated when our advertising Customers’ advertisement is encountered on a Publisher. In all instances where the use, collection and disclosure of information is by one of these third-party providers, their privacy policies shall govern and this Privacy Policy does not apply.
e.      Disabling Cookies
Most Web browsers are set up to accept cookies. You may be able to set your browser to warn you before accepting certain cookies or to refuse certain cookies. However, if you disable the use of cookies in your web browser, some features of our Services may be difficult to use or inoperable.  In addition, we may use (or work with certain third-party companies that use) techniques other than or in addition to HTTP cookies to recognize your computer or device and/or to collect and record information about your web surfing activity, including those integrated with our Services.  These technologies may rely on the collection and analysis of “non-cookie” information from your browser or device, such as your operating system, plug-ins, system fonts, resolution and other data, for purposes of creating a unique profile or “fingerprint” of your browser or device.    We (or other third parties) may use this profile to understand and analyze how you interact with the Services, to customize content or advertising to you through the Services, to monitor against fraud or misuse of the Services, or in other ways consistent with this Privacy Policy.  Please keep in mind that your web browser may not permit you to block the use of these techniques, and those browser settings that block conventional cookies may have no effect on such techniques.
4. The Business Purposes For Which We Use and Share the Information We Collect
a.    Our Purposes Generally
Principally, we use the information described in
Section 2
to operate, provide, develop and improve our Services.   This involves facilitating various types of advertising and marketing to make them more effective, more relevant, and (we believe) more likely to engage and interest (and less likely to annoy) consumers.
b.    Personalized Advertising
This includes facilitating and providing behavioral advertising, i.e., tailoring advertising and content using the types of “audience segments” or “data segments” (and other, related types of information) we describe in
Section 2
above.   As we also describe in
Section 2
, these audience segments may be based on your activity across multiple websites or mobile apps over time, on your transactions, on your location, or on coded or “hashed” data derived from offline demographic and interest data.  Generally, the tailoring of ads to devices and browsers (and sometimes through other channels) based on this type of data is called “interest-based” or “personalized” advertising.  (Please go to
Section 6
to learn about what choices you have to control how you are marketed to in this way.)
c.    Other Advertising and Analytics Purposes
We also use the information to analyze, measure the effectiveness of, frequency-cap or sequence advertising.   For instance, we may use the information we collect to compare how many “clicks” the recipients of one ad campaign receive vs. a different ad campaign.  Or, we may track which users have seen which ads, to avoid a user being shown the same ad repeatedly.
d.    Syncing Identifiers
We sometimes integrate our information with Partners, to allow Advertisers to access our information across other platforms (and their information across our platform), in order to allow Advertisers to reach more consumers across various channels.  This may include online, offline, social media or television advertising.
e.    Identity Graphing
We may also create or help our Customers or Partners to create “identity” graphs, to help locate users across various channels, such as based on common personal, device-based, or network-based identifiers (
e.g.,
IP address, email address).
f.    Statistical information
We may use statistical information about you or your devices such as generalized location and estimated age group. We obtain this statistical information from commercially available sources (as permitted by law) such as our third-party service providers. We only work with third-party service providers who ensure that this information has been obtained in accordance with applicable law and can be provided to us for use and disclosure.
g. Other Business Purposes We also may also use the information we collect for internal research, internal operations, auditing, detecting and preventing security incidents, anti-fraud purposes, debugging, short-term and transient use, quality control, and legal compliance.
5. Why And With Whom We Share the Information We Collect
a.    To Provide our Services
Generally, we share the information that we collect in order to perform our Services, including for purposes of targeting advertising, performing analytics on ads, and measuring ad performance.
We share the information we collect with our Customers, who are a wide range of businesses, retailers, content publishers, non-profit entities, business-to-business service companies and other consumer brands, as well as their ad agencies and service providers.
We also share information with our Partners and other companies that provide services to us. For example, we use email or other contact information to resolve Customer support inquiries, and IP address and advertising identifiers with service providers.
b.    For Legal Purposes
We may share any information we have with third parties in order to: (a) comply with legal process or a regulatory investigation (e.g. a subpoena or court order); (b) enforce our Terms of Service, this Privacy Policy, or other contracts, or to investigate potential violations thereof; (c) protect the rights, property or personal safety of us, our platform, our Customers, our agents and affiliates, our users and/or the public.  We likewise may provide information to other companies and organizations (including law enforcement) for fraud protection, spam/malware prevention, and similar purposes.
c.    In the Event of a Corporate Transaction
We may also share personal information in the event of a corporate transaction, including, for example, a merger, investment, acquisition, reorganization, consolidation, bankruptcy, liquidation, or sale of some or all of our assets, or for purposes of due diligence connected with any such transaction.
d.    With Corporate Affiliates
We share information within the Nexxen Group in order to operate the Site and Services, perform data analytics, design and execute advertising and marketing campaigns, conduct product management, and/or engineer or improve and develop new products or services.
d.    With Partners
We share information collected, including IP address and advertising identifiers, with Partners to assist in our advertising and marketing efforts and show ads that may interest you. The Advertisers we use (including their service providers) may rely on pixel tags and similar technologies to collect information from or about you to tailor advertisements, measure advertising effectiveness, and enable other enhancements. We may also compile and provide reports, including in aggregated or de-identified forms, to Advertisers about the reach, viewership and effectiveness of their campaigns. We use information to help our Customers to reach the desired audience and improve their ad campaigns.
Summary Analytics and Reports. We may, with our Customers and Partners, analyze Viewing Data to create summary reports to help deliver relevant information and advertising to interested groups of consumers.  These summary reports are built from automated analysis of data elements, without connecting the information to any known natural person.  For example, a Customer who is an Advertiser may want to measure the effectiveness of their promotions in the aggregate.  Thus, a  Partner may identify another device that shares an IP address or display and analyze: (a) whether a particular website was viewed or commercial location was visited by a device with location tracking enabled (e.g., a smartphone) after a related promotion was viewed, and (b) whether a particular program was viewed following exposure to a promotion for that program.  In addition, some Partners may use a third-party data aggregator to identify demographic or other attributes or traits (such as gender or age range or income range or behavioral data) associated with the IP addresses collected, and then send to Customers the demographic information associated with those addresses.
Personalized Advertisements. As further described in Section 2 above, audience segments may be shared with Customers and Partners for the purpose of targeting and tailoring the advertising you see on certain Smart TV and connected devices, including other devices associated with your IP address or device ID on the basis of Viewing Data. Viewing Data may also be enhanced with household demographic data and data about digital actions (e.g., digital purchases, location, and other consumer behavior taken by devices associated with the IP address collected) for the purpose of delivering relevant advertising that are likely to be useful or timely.
e. With advertising measurement providers and services
We share information collected, including IP address and advertising identifiers, with Partners  and their service providers in order to help us and our Advertisers understand information about the content and ads viewed, and the effectiveness of ad campaigns, including the audience that saw their ads, how they engaged or responded, determine which programs are most popular, how many people watch a program to its conclusion, and whether and how often people watch commercials.
The measurement providers we use collect or receive information about your viewing of or interaction with content and ads, including ads that you view on your Smart TV and ads you view on other websites, mobile apps, and connected devices (including Smart TVs) to which we provide advertising services. We also share demographics data and audience segments (e.g., food fans, sport enthusiasts, sitcom fans, etc.) with advertising measurement providers and their service providers. Viewing Data may also be combined with other demographic and similar information, including by working with data aggregators.
Measurement providers use such information to create statistics about what content and ads are being watched – for example, to help them and their clients understand the audience viewing the content or ads, and to measure the effectiveness of the ads.
Through our advertising services, we provide measurement and analytics solutions to other companies. In providing these services, we analyze and reorganize ad campaign data from these companies and provide analytics reports to help them better understand the audience that viewed the company’s ads and whether those viewers belong to the same household.
6. Your Choices:  How To Opt-Out of Tracking (Interest-Based Advertising) on Web Browsers and Mobile Devices
a.    Opting Out of Interest-Based Advertising
The Company adheres to the DAA principles and Tremor Video, Inc. adheres to the DAAC principles.  To learn more about interest-based advertising or to opt-out of this type of interest-based advertising by those third parties that are members of DAA’s opt-out program, please go to
https://www.aboutads.info/.
Unruly, LLC formally known as RhythmOne, LLC, is a member of the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), an association dedicated to responsible data collection use in digital advertising.  To learn more about the NAI and its members, or to opt out of interest-based advertising facilitated by NAI members, please go to
http://optout.networkadvertising.org/?c=1.
You may also opt out of our own interest-based advertising on those same web pages, or you can simply visit our
Opt-Out Page.
(We make no representation about the accuracy or effectiveness of other providers opt out mechanisms, including those listed on the above industry websites.)
You can also opt-out of targeted advertising based on data collected via your browser by using  (i) the DAA’s opt-out tool, which can be found
here
; (ii) the DAAC’s opt-out tool, which can be found
here
; or (iii) the EDAA’s opt-out tool, which can be found
here
.
When you opt out, we will stop (a) collecting information about your interests via your browser and (b) serving you targeted advertising based on the data collected via your browser. We will subsequently place a piece of data in your browser’s cookie that tells us that you have opted out – it does not contain any data about you except for the fact that you have opted out. We need this cookie in place so that we know not to collect information about your interests and serve you targeted advertising based on your interests in the future.  Our “opt-out” cookie has a 13-month expiration date.
b.    In-App Data Opt-Out
You may opt out of the continued collection of mobile app interest-based advertising through your mobile device settings, as applicable to most (but not necessarily all) mobile devices.   Please go to the
NAI “Mobile Choices” web page
for further information about how to do this.  When you do this, we will no longer use information collected through your mobile apps to deliver behaviorally targeted advertising to your device. Please note that you will continue to receive advertising after you opt-out, but it may not be tailored to your interests.
c.    Viewed Content Advertising and Smart TVs
If you choose to activate this functionality, we may collect certain information on certain Smart TV and connected devices equipped with automatic content recognition (ACR) functionality in order to provide personalized advertising based on the programs or ads being watched on those devices, other devices with the same IP address, or browsers. We refer to the information collected as “Viewing Data” in this Policy. If you have opted-in to activating ACR on such device, the ACR functionality will continuously analyze audio from any onscreen content accessed or displayed on your Smart TV at that moment, including content from any set-top-boxes, media players, gaming consoles, over the air broadcast, or other audiovisual sources playing through your Smart TV.  For more information, see Section 2 above on “Viewing Data”.
The option to enable ACR is presented during the initial setup of the Smart TV and can also be accessed at any time via the Settings of the Smart TV. You can disable ACR at any time via the Settings of the Smart TV. Please refer to the device’s Privacy Notice and the Enhanced Viewing Service Privacy Notice of your Smart TV for more information.
7. Do Not Track
Although certain of our technology honors “do not track” (DNT) signals and similar mechanisms transmitted by web browsers or mobile device operating systems, we are not responsible, and shall not be liable, for the acts of third parties, such as ad networks, with respect to such third parties’ tracking policies.   We make no representation about the accuracy or effectiveness of other providers’ opt out mechanisms, including those listed on the above industry websites.
8. Children
Our Sites and Services are neither developed for, nor directed at, children under the age of 16.  We do not knowingly collect personal information from nor employ or offer targeting towards children under the age of 16.  If you believe your child, who is under the age of 16, has provided us with personal information or registered at one of our Sites, please contact us at
privacy@nexxen.com
and we will use reasonable efforts to remove that information from our records.
9.  Privacy Information for the Company’s Corporate Websites
The below provides information about how information is collected and used on our Sites, including
www.nexxen.com
,
www.amobee.com
,
www.tremorinternational.com
,
www.tremorvideo.com
,
www.unruly.co
,
www.rhythmone.com
and any website on which this Privacy Policy is posted.
a.    Collection of Personal Information
The Company’s customers are businesses and other organizations, groups and institutions, not individuals, and our corporate website collects contact information from our customers and prospective customers who request information from us.  We may also sometimes collect information through business channels such as trade shows, or through marketing platforms that help us identify new customers.   In addition, we and advertising and data platforms we work with may use cookies, pixels, device identifiers or other tracking methods to collect and retain “identifiers” such as cookie IDs, IP addresses to recognize you and to target or retarget ads to you when you visit our website, visit other sites across the internet, or visit other applications and services.
b.    How We Use This Personal Information
Generally, we use the information we collect to provide customers and potential customers with information that they requested, to correspond about any questions or concerns brought to our attention, to notify such persons of new services or updates to our existing Services or more generally to market and promote our Services.   We also use this information as follows:
For Legal Purposes:  We may share any information we have with third parties in order to: (a) comply with legal process or a regulatory investigation (e.g. a subpoena or court order); (b) enforce our contracts, this Privacy Policy, or other contracts, or to investigate of potential violations thereof; (c) protect the rights, property or personal safety of us, our platform, our customers, our agents and affiliates, its users and/or the public.  We likewise may provide information to other companies and organizations (including law enforcement) for fraud protection, and spam/malware prevention, and similar purposes.
In the Event of a Corporate Transaction:  We may also share personal information in the event of a corporate transaction, including, for example
,
a merger, investment, acquisition, reorganization, consolidation, bankruptcy, liquidation, or sale of some or all of our assets, or for purposes of due diligence connected with any such transaction.
With Service Providers:  We may share personal information we collect with our service providers, which may include (for instance) providers involved in tech or customer support, operations, web or data hosting, billing, accounting, security, marketing, data management, validation, enhancement or hygiene, or otherwise assisting us to provide, develop, maintain and improve our Services.
c.    Your Marketing Choices
Anyone who has provided personal contact information through our Sites may e-mail us at
privacy@nexxen.com
to update, delete, and/or correct their personal contact information, or contact us at the information provided in
Section 17
. You may likewise request access or “deletion” of your information through the same means:  however, if you are an entity with which we have done business, we will likely need to retain your data for business purposes such as accounting, billing, auditing and fulfilling other legal requirements.   To “opt out” of advertising platforms we may work with for our own corporate purposes (e.g., to “retarget” our customers or potential customers from this website), you may generally rely on the consumer choice mechanisms we set out in
Section 6
.
d. Sale of Personal Information
We may allow certain third parties (such as Partners) to collect your personal information. You have the right to opt out of such disclosure of personal information, as described below in
Section 6
.
During the 12-month period prior to the effective date of this Privacy Policy, we have disclosed the following categories of personal information:
Identifier such as a unique personal identifier (such as a device identifier, cookies, beacons, pixel tags, mobile ad identifiers and similar technology, other forms of identifiers), online identifier and IP address;
Commercial information, such as records of products or services purchased, obtained or considered, and other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies; and
Internet and other electronic network activity information, including, but not limited to, information regarding your interaction with websites, applications or advertisements.
10. Where We Store Personal Data
We are a global company with affiliates, varied business processes, management structures and technical systems around the world. Information that we collect or that is collected on our behalf may be stored on connected devices (including Smart TV) to which we provide advertising or measurement and analytics services, or on our servers, and may be transferred to, accessed from, or stored and processed globally in any other country where we or our service providers maintain facilities or call centers, including jurisdictions that may have different data privacy laws from those in your home country. The data that we collect from you may be transferred to, and stored at, a destination outside the European Economic Area (“EEA”). It may also be processed by staff operating outside the EEA who work for us or for one of our suppliers. Such staff may be engaged in, among other things, the fulfillment of your order or the provision of support services. We strive to transfer your information where there are appropriate measures and controls in place, and we strive to ensure that all information you provide to us is stored on secure servers.
11. For European Residents: About your GDPR Privacy Rights
If you are located in Europe, you may have certain right under European privacy law, principally the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR).   This Section of the Privacy Policy is intended solely for, and is applicable only as to, such consumers, i.e., “data subjects”; if you are not an EEA resident (or otherwise located in an EEA country), this does not apply to you and you should not rely on it.
a.    Our legal bases for using personal information
All organizations need a legal reason to use your personal information. There are a number of legal grounds that enable data processing. Below are the most relevant grounds of which you should be aware.
With your consent
There are some activities where we process personal information with your consent. For example, where we want to send you marketing messages by email, we would ask your permission first and you could opt out at any time.
For a legitimate interest
We may use your information where there is a legitimate interest to do so. For example, we may use your information where it would help achieve our business objectives or to facilitate a benefit to you or someone else.  Our legitimate interests in processing personal data include:
to develop, deliver and maintain relevant and engaging products, services and/or advertising;
understanding when audiences engage with our Customers’ ads;
to build a clearer understanding of who our Customer’s audiences are in order to better serve more relevant advertising to those audiences, for the benefit of both individuals and our Customers;
to maximize advertising revenues for publishers and therefore help to maintain a diverse ecosystem of online independent publishers of content for users to enjoy and educate themselves;
to support individual and societal rights to receive information;
to improve user website experience by delivering brand safe, high quality advertising to all of the publishers of online content with which we work;
to carry on the business of a commercial organization;
to demonstrate that we provide services and products to agreed industry standards; and
sharing information with the Nexxen Group companies for analysis, audience insights, business efficiencies, content personalization and to deliver relevant advertising.
To comply with legal obligations
There may be situations where we need to use your information to comply with legal and regulatory obligations or to defend claims.
b.    Exercising Your Data Subject Rights Under the GDPR
If you are a resident of the European Economic Area, you have the following data protection rights:
If you wish to access, correct, update or request deletion of your personal data, you can do so at any time by contacting us at
privacy@nexxen.com
or you may visit our
Manage User Data page
, where you may make an “access” or “right to know” request, or request that we “opt out” your personal information from our active database.
In addition, you can object to the processing of your personal data, ask us to restrict processing of your personal information or request portability of your personal information. Again, you can exercise these rights by contacting us at
privacy@nexxen.com
.
You have the right to opt-out of marketing communications we send you at any time. You can exercise this right by clicking on the “unsubscribe” or “opt-out” link in the marketing e-mails we send you. To opt-out of other forms of marketing (such as postal marketing or telemarketing), then please contact us at
privacy@nexxen.com
.
Similarly, if we have collected and process your personal data with your consent, then you can withdraw your consent at any time, by contacting us at
privacy@nexxen.com
or (as to information that we use in our Services), by going to
[your data page]
.  Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your personal data conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
You have the right to complain to a data protection authority about our collection and use of your personal information. For more information, please contact your local data protection authority.
12. Updates to this Privacy Policy
We may update this Privacy Policy from time to time in response to changing legal, technical or business developments. When we update our Privacy Policy, we will take appropriate measures to inform you, consistent with the significance of the changes we make. We will obtain your consent to any material Privacy Policy changes if and where this is required by applicable data protection laws. You can see when this Privacy Policy was last updated by checking the “last updated” date displayed at the top of this Privacy Policy.
13. Data Retention
Personal information we collect may be retained for as long as needed to fulfill legitimate business purposes. The Company expires certain cookies, including cookies directed to European users, after 12 months. Except as permitted by law, we may retain aggregated and anonymized user information (e.g., to create group-level data), for an indefinite period but usually no more than 2 years.
14. Information Security
We take measures to protect against unauthorized access to or unauthorized alteration, disclosure, or destruction of data we collect and store.  These may include internal reviews of our data collection, storage, firewalls and processing practices and security measures.  Of course, no security system is perfect.   Thus, while we do take measures to safeguard against unauthorized access to, or alteration of data we collect and store, we cannot guarantee that it will not be disclosed or accessed inadvertently or through the unauthorized acts of others.
15. California “Shine the Light” Law
California’s “Shine the Light” law (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.83) permits California residents to request and receive, once per calendar year and free of charge, information about our sharing of your personal information (if any) with third parties for their own direct marketing use.  We do not share the information subject to that law for those covered purposes.   For information about other California privacy rights you may have, please see the below sections.
16. Privacy Rights and Information for Residents of California and Other Applicable States
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) provides certain rights to residents of California. Other states’ laws (upon becoming effective) provide similar (though not identical) rights to their own residents – including residents of Colorado, Connecticut, Utah and Virginia (“Other Applicable States”).  This Section of the Privacy Policy applies if you are a natural person who is a resident of one of those states, or of California (“California Consumer”), when we act in the capacity as a business or controller as defined by the laws of such states.   This Addendum supplements the information and disclosures in the Privacy Policy for residents of those states that recognize these particularized rights.
The following sets forth the categories of information we collect and purposes for which we may use Consumers’ personal information. (
Examples provided for each category are merely examples found in the statute, and do not indicate that we necessarily collect that type of information or identifier.
)
Our Collection of Consumer Personal Information
Depending on how you interact with us, we may collect about you the categories of information summarized in the table below. The following table also describes how we collect and use such categories of information.  We do not knowingly collect consumer information deemed “sensitive” under the CCPA, such as information that reveals race, religion, ethnicity, sexual orientation or information about specific medical conditions.
Category (examples for each are statutory; all may not be collected)
Business Purpose
Categories of Sources
Identifiers, e.g.
, name; alias; postal address; mobile ad identifiers; IP address; telephone number; email address; social network handles
Creation of audiences and consumer insights for digital and other advertising, and related services such as campaign measurement and data marketing.
Data compilers and consumer data platforms and aggregators, informational and retail websites (“Commercial Source Categories”)Consumers (through browsers, apps, and mobile devices) (“Consumers”)Ad networks Our affiliates (“Affiliates”), including the following: Addination Amobee ANZ Pty Ltd Amobee Asia Pte Amobee EMEA Ltd Amobee Ltd Nexxen Group US Holdings Inc Perk.com Canada Inc. SpearAd Taptica Inc Unmedia Video Distribution Sdn Bhd Unruly Group, LLC Unruly Media KK Unruly Media Pte. Ltd Unruly Media Pty Ltd
Characteristics of protected classifications under California or other US law (inferenced or actual, including self-reported)
e.g.,
race; color; religion; sex/gender; pregnancy, marital status; military or veteran status; national origin; ancestry; age (over 40) (may be inferenced, actual or self-reported)
Creation of audiences and consumer insights for digital and other advertising, and related services such as campaign measurement and data marketing.
Commercial Source CategoriesConsumersAd networksOur affiliates
Commercial or transactions information
e.g.
, products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies, including regarding cannabis products and services.
Creation of audiences and consumer insights for digital and other advertising, and related services such as campaign measurement and data marketing.
Commercial Source CategoriesOur affiliates
Internet or other electronic network activity information
e.g.
, browsing history; online interests.
Creation of audiences and consumer insights for digital and other advertising, and related services such as campaign measurement and data marketing.
Commercial Source Categories Consumers Ad networks Our affiliates
Geolocation data
e.g.,
latitude/longitude coordinates from mobile devices
Creation of audiences and consumer insights for digital and other advertising, and related services such as campaign measurement and data marketing.
Commercial Source Categories Consumers Ad networks Our affiliates
Professional or employment-related information
e.g.
, current or past job history or job title.
Creation of audiences and consumer insights for digital and other advertising, and related services such as campaign measurement and data marketing.
Commercial Source CategoriesPublic records and other publicly available sources
Inferenced Data
e.g.,
consumer information, lifestyle or purchasing preferences.
Creation of audiences and consumer insights for digital and other advertising, and related services such as campaign measurement and data marketing.
Commercial Source Categories Consumers Ad networks Our affiliates
Our Disclosure, Sale and Sharing of Personal Information
We may share and sell the information collected from and about you as discussed above for various business purposes, with service providers and with third parties including our Customers, advertising platforms, and those advertising platforms’ customers.  These business purposes often involve cross-context behavioral advertising, also known as “targeted” advertising.
The table below describes how and with whom we share or disclose personal information, and whether we believe we have “sold” or “shared” a particular category of information in the prior 12 months.   “Sharing” information is a concept defined under California privacy laws (but not necessarily other states’ privacy laws) and includes using (or permitting others to use) the information we collect for cross-context or “targeted” advertising.  (In our case – because we often earn money in exchange for making available information for advertising purposes – we may be involved in both a “sale” and a “share” of that information.)
For maximal transparency, we have been deliberately inclusive in our terminology, by including within categories both types of third parties (e.g., “retailers”) and types of platforms through which those third parties might access data (e.g., “advertising networks”). We reiterate that
e
xamples provided for each category are merely examples found in the statute, and do not indicate that we necessarily sell, disclose, and/or share that type of information or identifier.
Category
Categories of Third Parties We M
ay
Share With
Whether We “Sold” o
r “Shared”
This Category of Personal Information in the Last 12 Months
Identifiers
,
e.g.
, name; alias; postal address; mobile ad identifiers; IP address; telephone number; email address; social network handles
Data compilers and consumer data resellers, healthcare and pharmaceutical companies, consumer goods retailers, other retailers, informational and retail websites, content publishers, non-profit organizations, business-to-business services and organizations, consumer surveys and survey companies, affiliate networks Advertising networks and media platforms, data management and “onboarding” platforms, internet service providers, data analytics providersSocial networks
Yes
Characteristics of protected classifications under California or US law (inferenced or actual)
e.g.,
race; color; religion; sex/gender; pregnancy, marital status; military or veteran status; national origin; ancestry; age (over 40) (may be inferenced, actual or self-reported)
Data compilers and consumer data resellers, healthcare and pharmaceutical companies, consumer goods retailers, other retailers, informational and retail websites, content publishers, non-profit organizations, business-to-business services and organizations, consumer surveys and survey companies, affiliate networks Advertising networks and media platforms, data management and “onboarding” platforms, internet service providers, data analytics providersSocial networks
Yes
Commercial or transactions information
e.g.
, products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies.
Data compilers and consumer data resellers, healthcare and pharmaceutical companies, consumer goods retailers, other retailers, informational and retail websites, content publishers, non-profit organizations, business-to-business services and organizations, consumer surveys and survey companies, affiliate networks Advertising networks and media platforms, data management and “onboarding” platforms, internet service providers, data analytics providersSocial networks
Yes
Internet or other electronic network activity information
e.g.
, browsing history; online interests.
Data compilers and consumer data resellers, healthcare and pharmaceutical companies, consumer goods retailers, other retailers, informational and retail websites, content publishers, non-profit organizations, business-to-business services and organizations, consumer surveys and survey companies, affiliate networksAdvertising networks and media platforms, data management and “onboarding” platforms, internet service providers, data analytics providersSocial networks
Yes
Professional or employment-related information
e.g.
, current or past job history or job title.
Data compilers and consumer data resellers, healthcare and pharmaceutical companies, consumer goods retailers, other retailers, informational and retail websites, content publishers, non-profit organizations, business-to-business services and organizations, consumer surveys and survey companies, affiliate networksAdvertising networks and media platforms, data management and “onboarding” platforms, internet service providers, data analytics providersSocial networks
Yes
Inference Data
e.g.,
consumer information, lifestyle or purchasing preferences.
Data compilers and consumer data resellers, healthcare and pharmaceutical companies, consumer goods retailers, other retailers, informational and retail websites, content publishers, non-profit organizations, business-to-business services and organizations, consumer surveys and survey companies, affiliate networksAdvertising networks and media platforms, data management and “onboarding” platforms, internet service providers, data analytics providersSocial networks
Yes
Please see the below sections to learn the purposes for which we collect and share personal information.
Our Business Purposes for Selling and Sharing Personal Information
We
collect
and
share
the personal information that we collect for the below purposes, as we also have described in our Privacy Policy and/or our website.
Online targeting, for example:
Creating or helping to create defined audience segments based on common demographics and/or shared (actual or inferred) interests or preferences (e.g., households with prospective students).  These audience segments may be based on the collective website behavior of consumers and indicate whether a consumer is likely to want to make a particular type of purchase or engage in a particular type of commercial behavior.   We also sometimes work with a data partner that “matches” our or other Information through coded identification techniques (such as through coded data “hashing”) with online cookies and other identifiers to target and measure ad campaigns online across various display, mobile and other media channels.We also create or assisting customers in creating or enhancing “identity” graphs to help locate consumers across various channels, such as based on common personal, device-based, or network-based identifiers (e.g., IP address, email address)We also use the personal information we collect or receive online to provide related services, such as for measuring the effectiveness of and otherwise analyzing ad campaigns.
W
e use personal information for
other internal purposes, for example:
For internal research, internal operations, auditing, detecting security incidents, debugging, short-term and transient use, quality control, and legal compliance.We sometimes use the personal information collected from our own website, from social networks, from other “business to business” interactions (such as at trade shows) or from data compilers for the above purposes, as well as for our own marketing purposes.
We also may share any of the personal information we collect for other legal, corporate or operational purposes.
Sharing for legal purposes.
For instance,
we may share personal information with third parties in order to: (a) comply with legal process or a regulatory investigation (e.g. a subpoena or court order); (b) enforce our Terms of Service, legal rights, this Privacy Policy, or other contracts with you, including investigation of potential violations thereof; (c) respond to claims that any content violates the rights of third parties; and/or (d) protect the rights, property or personal safety of us, our platform, our customers, our agents and affiliates, its users and/or the public.
Sharing to prevent consumer harm or fraud.
We likewise may provide information to other companies and organizations (including law enforcement) for fraud protection, spam/malware prevention, and similar purposes.
S
haring for purposes of a corporate transaction.
We may also share personal information in the event of a major corporate transaction, including for example a merger, investment, acquisition, reorganization, consolidation, bankruptcy, liquidation, or sale of some or all of our assets, or for purposes of due diligence connected with any such transaction.
Sharing With Service Providers:
We share any personal information we collect with our service providers, which may include (for instance) providers involved in tech or customer support, operations, web or data hosting, billing, accounting, security, marketing, data management, validation, enhancement or hygiene, or otherwise assisting us to provide, develop, maintain and improve our services.
Sharing of Aggregate Information
:
We may aggregate and/or de-identify any information collected so that such information can no longer be linked to you or your device (“
Aggregate/De-Identified Information
”). We may use Aggregate/De-Identified Information for any purpose, including, without limitation, for research and marketing purposes, and we may also share such data with any third parties, including advertisers, promotional partners, and sponsors, in our discretion.
Our Retention of Information
We retain personal information as a “business” or “controller” under applicable state privacy laws if it is relevant and useful for purposes of our products and services or we have a legal or compliance reason to do so, and provided the information is not subject to a valid request for deletion.  (We may retain information after deletion where legally permitted or required for a legal compliance, auditing or accounting reason.)
Your Privacy Rights and Choices
As noted above, residents of certain U.S. states have particular privacy rights, including residents of California and (upon various “effective” dates occurring during 2023) Colorado, Connecticut, Utah and Virginia (“Applicable State Residents”).  The scope and nature of these rights vary in each state, so we have sought to explain these rights in the most transparent and uniform terms, below.
Without being discriminated against for exercising these rights, California residents, as well as residents of the Applicable States, have the right to request that we disclose what personal information we collect from you, to delete that information, and to opt-out of the sale of your personal information, subject to certain restrictions.  If you are a resident of such a state, you also have the right to designate an agent to exercise these rights on your behalf (so long as your state of residence continues to recognize that right).
This section describes how to exercise those rights and our process for handling those requests.  (To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.)
We may withhold these rights to the extent that the law in your state of residence does not recognize or no longer recognizes these rights.
Note that sometimes, we act only as a “service provider” or “processor” to our customers (for instance, if they provide information to us solely to use our marketing or data management tools), in which case any consumer requests for opt-out, deletion or access to data must be made through that client: we therefore will forward any such requests to a named client, where feasible.
a.    The right to access, correction and disclosure
You may have the right to request, twice during a twelve-month period, the following information about the personal information we have collected about you during the past 12 months:
the categories and specific pieces of personal information we have collected about you;
the categories of sources from which we collected the personal information;
the business or commercial purpose for which we collected or sold the personal information;
the categories of third parties with whom we shared the personal information; and
the categories of personal information that we sold or disclosed for a business purpose, and the categories of third parties to whom we sold or disclosed that information for a business purpose.
You also may request correction of your personal information, such as if you believe we have incorrect information pertaining to you.
b.    The right to deletion
You may have the right to request that we delete the personal information we have collected from you.  Certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law.  We need certain types of information so that we can provide our Services to you, and may retain certain information for important business purposes, such as fulfilling our legal obligations, or for security, auditing or de-bugging purposes.
c.    How to exercise your access and deletion rights
California residents and residents of Other Applicable States may exercise their access or deletion rights by accessing our
“Manage user data” page
or by sending an email to
privacy@nexxen.com
.
For security purposes, we will verify your identity – in part by requesting or automatically capturing certain information from you — when you request to exercise your applicable privacy rights.  For instance, you may need to provide your email address. To request that we provide you with the specific pieces of personal information we have from you or to delete personal information we have collected from you, we may also need to ask you for additional information to verify your identity.  Once we have verified your identity (and your agent, as applicable), we will respond to your request as appropriate.
Where you have requested the categories of personal information that we have collected about you, we will provide the information you have requested, except where not permitted under applicable law or otherwise exempted by the CCPA or other applicable law.
Where you have requested specific pieces of personal information, we will provide the information you have requested, except where not permitted under applicable law or otherwise exempted by the CCPA or other applicable law.
Where you have requested that we delete personal information that we have collected from you, we will delete any information about you that is not necessary for the purposes indicated above or another permissible business, security or legal purpose.  Certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law.
If we are unable to complete your requests fully for any of the reasons above, we will provide you additional information about the reasons that we could not comply with your request.
d.    The right to nondiscrimination
We will not deny, charge different prices for, or provide a different level of quality of goods or services if you choose to exercise these rights.
e.    The right to “opt-out” of the sale of your personal information
You have the right to opt out of the “sale” of your personal information.  California law (for instance) broadly defines sale such that it may include, for example, allowing third parties to receive and use certain information, such as cookies IP address and/or browsing behavior, to deliver targeted advertising.
If you wish to “opt out” of our “sale” of your information, i.e., for purposes of personalized advertising, we recommend employing the options we provide and explain in
Section 6
(as we believe those methods are the easiest and most efficient).   However, you may also visit the interactive form that we make available at
https://yourdata.rhythmone.com/#/
and
Consumer Opt Out — Amobee
.
f.    Authorized Agents
You may also designate an agent to make requests to exercise your rights, where applicable state law (such as the CCPA) permits you to do so.   In such case, we will take steps both to verify the identity of the person seeking to exercise their rights as listed above, and to verify that your agent has been authorized to make a request on your behalf through providing us with a signed written authorization or a copy of a validly executed power of attorney.
g.  Right to Appeal
In some states you have a right to appeal our decision about how or whether we honor your privacy rights request(s).  In the event that we inform you that we will not, or believe we cannot, honor a particular consumer request (for instance, if we have determined we cannot verify your identity, or if we believe you are not entitled to the scope of deletion you request), and you live in such a state, you may appeal our determination by emailing us at
privacy@nexxen.com
.
Opt-out of sale requests are often effectively accomplished through automated suppression methods, either by a consumer causing another website (such as a content publisher) to avoid selling browser-related data, or by deploying our opt-out cookie located at
https://unruly.co/legal/privacy/#your-choices
as well as on various industry opt-out pages.  Opting out in these ways causes data associated with a consumer’s device to be effectively disassociated from their device and/or suppressed from usage.
17. How to Contact Us
If you have any questions, concerns or requests please contact us by email at
privacy@nexxen.com
or 1177 Avenue of the Americas, 9
th
Floor, New York, NY, 10036.
Jump to top
Ready to build your platform?
Let's Chat
Email
*
First name
Last name
Job title
Seniority
Please Select
C-Level
VP, SVP, or Director
Manager
Trader or Associate
Company name
Company Type
*
Select Company Type
Other
Ad Tech
Agency/Brand
Publisher/Broadcaster
Country/Region
Please Select
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
Andorra
Angola
Antigua & Deps
Argentina
Armenia
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Central African Rep
Chad
Chile
China
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Congo {Democratic Rep}
Costa Rica
Croatia
Cuba
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Fiji
Finland
France
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Greece
Grenada
Guatemala
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Honduras
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland {Republic}
Israel
Italy
Ivory Coast
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Korea North
Korea South
Kosovo
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar, (Burma)
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Norway
Oman
Other
Pakistan
Palau
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
Saint Vincent & the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome & Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Sudan
Spain
Sri Lanka
St Kitts & Nevis
St Lucia
Sudan
Suriname
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Tonga
Trinidad & Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City
Venezuela
Viet Nam
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe
State/Region
Please Select
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Puerto Rico
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming
What is your interest in Amobee?
*
Please Select
I would like to learn more about your solutions
I am interested in launching campaigns with Amobee
I would like to become an Amobee technology partner
I have a different request
How did you hear about us?
*
To get you to the right person, tell us a little bit more about your situation.
*
Lead Source
Content Type
I consent to being contacted by Amobee sales or marketing personnel. The personal data on this form will be processed to provide me with information I have requested about Amobee products and services. I can withdraw my consent at any time by sending an e-mail notification.
I agree to receive other communications from Amobee
In order to provide you the content requested, we need to store and process your personal data. If you consent to us storing your personal data for this purpose, please tick the checkbox below.
I agree to allow Amobee  to store and process my personal data.
*
You can unsubscribe from these communications at any time. For more information on how to unsubscribe, our privacy practices, and how we are committed to protecting and respecting your privacy, please review our
Privacy Guidelines
.
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
More information
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Back Button
Performance Cookies
Vendor Search
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
By clicking “Accept All Cookies”, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts.
Cookies Settings
Accept All Cookies
Sub-policy 10
http://amobee.com/privacy/:
Renew or change your cookie consent
Trust
GO TO:
Privacy Guidelines
Consumer Opt Out of Targeted Advertising
Infringement Policy
Advertiser Guidelines
Data Guidelines
Inventory Guidelines
General Data Protection Regulation Policy
California Consumer Privacy Act Disclosures
UK Tax Strategy Statement
UK Modern Slavery Act Statement
Privacy Policy
Last Updated: April 6, 2022
Click Here to Opt-Out of Interest-Based Advertising
We, at the Nexxen Group (Tremor International Ltd (a Nexxen Brand), Nexxen Inc. (f/k/a Amobee Inc.), Nexxen Group LLC (f/k/a Unruly LLC and RhythmOne, LLC), Unruly Group Ltd (d/b/a Nexxen Group Ltd.), Tremor Video, Inc. and affiliates (including our Affiliates (as defined below)), collectively the “
Nexxen Group
”, “
Company
”, “
we
”, “
us
” or “
our
”),
understand that your privacy is important to you.  We use advertising cookies and similar tracking technologies (such as SDKs or pixel tags) to automatically collect information about your device (such as your computer, mobile device or Smart-TV) and related activities on certain websites or platforms to send you targeted ads. You may always opt out of our targeted advertisements by clicking on the opt-out button on the relevant device.
Such opt-out will affect only the device where you have made that selection. After you opt out, the Company will no longer collect this information to deliver targeted ads on such device. Ads may continue to be served based on information available in the Internet environment, such as the content of a web page, browser type, time of day and operating system. If you have opted out of our advertising cookies and other similar tracking technologies on a device and subsequently delete the “opt out” cookie from your browser on such device, change your browser, or buy a new computer/device, you will need to repeat this process and opt out again.
We are a member of, and adhere to, the self-regulatory principles of the
European Digital Advertising Alliance
(EDAA).
Contact Us:
privacy@nexxen.com
Last Updated July 10, 2023
We understand that your privacy is important to you. This privacy policy (the “Privacy Policy”) explains how we collect, use, and disclose information collected through our web-based, connected-TV and mobile-based advertising services, as well as the Sites listed below. This policy does not apply to any entities that the Company does not own or control. For information about how we collect and use information through our corporate websites, including
www.nexxen.com
,
www.amobee.com
,
www.tremorinternational.com
,
www.tremorvideo.com
,
www.unruly.co
, and
www.rhythmone.com
(collectively, the “
Sites
“), please scroll down to
Section 9
titled “PRIVACY INFORMATION FOR THE COMPANY’S CORPORATE WEBSITES.” If you’d like to opt-out from having ads tailored to you by Company (whether through web or mobile delivery mechanisms), please follow the instructions in Section 6 (“
Your Choices
”) below.
1. The Company Platform
The Company operates several platforms and services that comprise our “Services.”  These include the Unruly Platform (formally known as RhythmOne Platform), Tremor Video DSP, and Unruly DMP.
As further described below, through our Services, we work with websites, web services, content publishers, mobile applications, and various platforms (like connected TVs, aka “CTV” platforms) that provide services for those types of organizations, in particular to help them display personalized and more engaging ads on their properties. In many cases, providing personalized ads help businesses of all sizes (including small and mid-sized businesses) to get their name out, and help website operators, content publishers, app developers and platform owners to subsidize the cost of their content – often, allowing them to provide consumers with some or all of their content for free.  We also work with advertisers (and their service providers) – brands, retailers, entertainment companies, non-profits and others – to help them advertise in a way that is efficient and relevant to both them and the consumer.   We use data in a variety of ways to help support these businesses, and likewise provide a variety of ways for consumers to control how data is used to market to them.  The purpose of this Privacy Policy is to explain what that data is, how it is used, and what those choices are.
2. The Information We Collect and Use In Providing Our Services
We are able to help advertisers as well as publishers provide more relevant content and targeted advertising by collecting certain information about you, including when you interact with our Services.  This may include your interactions with our customers, which include:
(a) advertisers and other ad partners (collectively, “
Advertisers
”) to show you ads that we think may interest you, on our Services and on other companies’ websites, apps, and devices; and
(b) publishers, app developers and other customers who CTVs, web and mobile apps or other online services (collectively, “
Publishers
”).
In this Privacy Policy, when we use the term “
Customers
”, we are referring to both Advertisers and Publishers, as described above.
Sometimes we work with other marketing or advertising services, demand partners, service providers or data platforms who provide certain services (such as measurement and analytics solutions) to us as well as Customers; we refer to these companies as “
Partners
.”
We (or our Customers or Partners) may provide relevant content and targeted advertising to consumers by using automated technologies such as cookies, including non-HTTP cookies, pixel tags, mobile identifiers and SDKs, each of which we describe below, and in
Section 3
below titled, “Cookies, Pixel Tags, SDKs and Similar Technologies”.   These technologies often generate or collect unique identifiers, such as cookie IDs or mobile advertising IDs.
We describe below these and other categories of information that we receive from consumers’ operating systems, browsers and devices, as well as from Customers, Partners, advertising platforms and networks, and data resellers.  (Some companies may fit into more than one such category.)  We have tried to describe the information that we collect or receive in a way that is easy to understand:
a.    Information that you provide to us directly
We collect certain information that you provide to us, including your contact and other information – for example, when you visit our Sites or when you contact us.
You may also interact with and provide information to us in other ways, including but not limited to when you complete a survey, enter a contest, giveaway, or sweepstakes, choose to hear from us or participate in our marketing or promotion campaigns. When you do so, we collect the information you provide to us, for example, your contact information.
If you submit to us a request to access or delete your information, we will collect your contact information and other information, as needed, to respond to your request.
b. Identifiers automatically collected from website and app sources,
whether directly or through other content and information platforms, including:
Online cookie IDs;
Mobile advertising identifiers (e.g., IDFAs, Ad IDs) and other mobile device or browser identifiers;
IP addresses;
Wi-Fi access points;
Product model numbers;
Chipset IDs; and
Identifiers related to the device used, such as CTVs (e.g. name of device and any “friendly name” assigned by you to the device)
We refer to all of the above as “IDs“
c.    Online usage information or “log” information
We collect data about your interactions with our Sites and the Services. Such data is generally related to the above IDs and include:
Language and region settings;
Data related to or describing a web browser, operating system, and device, such as the name and version of your browser, as well as hardware and software version of the app;
Connection data, including (as described above) current IP address, from which location may be inferred;
Online usage data including websites visited, websites visited prior to a web visit, date/time stamp;
Information related to interactions with ads and marketing, such as consumer engagement with an ad (i.e. ads that you view and click on);
Information related to interactions with websites, such as whether a consumer was “referred” through another website or a shared link;
TV viewership data (including information about the content and programs viewed, and amount of time spent viewing Smart TV content, as further described in this Section 2 on “Viewing Data” below); and
We may link any of the above to our own or our Partners’ and Customers’ IDs.
We receive the above information from Customers and Partners, advertising platforms and networks, and data resellers.  (Some companies may fit into more than one of those categories.)
d.    Demographic and Interest-Based Information
We may collect, use, or create “audience segments” (also referred to as “data segments), which are generally used to tailor advertising and marketing to consumers and to analyze consumer interaction with such ads.  Audience segments are interest-based or demographic-based groupings of large numbers of users, generally in aggregated form, tied to the above IDs.  For instance, an inference that Ad ID X35%979J is interested is “Sports” might be drawn from the fact that the browser often views sports-related content.  Or, an inference that Cookie ID 4Qj7e9!x may be interested in a new car may be drawn from the corresponding browsers frequent search of new automobile reviews.   (Actual IDs are generally much longer strings of code; the above are simply used for illustration.)
Sometimes these inferences are made from “offline data” that is coded and linked to cookies and IDs (and further linked to our own cookies and IDs) by Partners that create “hashed” (coded) values to replace “real-world” identifiers such as email addresses.
Sometimes these inferences are made from demographic information (“protected classifications” for purposes of the California Consumer Privacy Act).
Sometimes, these audience segments are associated with the likelihood to have a particular health condition.   A list of our standard health segments is
here
. (We endeavor to update the list frequently, but the list may not be current to the precise date.)   In addition, we may sometimes create “custom” health-related segments, or work with Customers or Partners who use such segments.  Those “custom” segments change over time, but a representative sample is included. Note that such information is only collected/processed at an aggregate level and solely in the U.S. and Canada.
e.    Transactional information from our Customers
Our Customers may provide us with their own proprietary or licensed information, including “audience segments” described above, to help us better perform or deliver our Services.
f.    Geolocation Information
The mobile information we collect or receive from our Partners and Customers also may include geolocation information, which may be precise, that may help us or our Customers to target ads or tailor content to your precise location. For instance, if we believe that you are often near a particular store in Northern New Jersey, we might send you an ad targeted to that store, rather than another store in the general area.
g.    Viewing Data
We provide advertising services to certain Smart TV and connected devices (like Hisense and VIDAA Smart TVs), which
,
like many CTVs, are equipped with Automatic Content Recognition (“ACR”) functionality that (when enabled) enable us to collect certain information from the device in order to provide personalized advertising and measurement based on the programming  or ads watched on those devices and other devices connected to the same  IP address.
What is Viewing Data?
When enabled on the Smart TV device, the Company will use audio-based ACR technology to collect information about the programming content (e.g. TV channels and shows, movies, and advertisements watched) playing on the device, including content from any media players, gaming consoles, over-the-air broadcast, or other audiovisual sources playing through the Smart TV. We call this information the “
Viewing Data
” and this also includes information such as timestamp, IP address, and Smart TV device identifier.
The ACR technology captures a “fingerprint” from the Smart TV, and the fingerprint is mapped against a content repository and ad catalog to identify what was played through the TV. Content or ad ID, IP address, device ID, and other metadata are appended to the audio fingerprint. These identifiers are ingested into the Company’s platform and mapped to a Household ID, and then aggregated with other data sources.  The ACR process will associate the data collected with the device’s IP address, but otherwise does not utilize directly identifiable personal information for the purposes of personalized advertising or measurement.
For example, we may collect TV viewing information such as the programs, commercials, and channels you view, the date, time and duration of the viewing. It may also include information about the TV or display, including IP address and SmartTV device ID.
How is Viewing Data used and shared?
To create audience segments:
We use Viewing Data, such as the content, programs or ads watched on your Smart TV, to include you and your household in relevant audience segments for interest-based advertising, as described below. A segment is a grouping of consumer profiles by one or more attributes (e.g. food fans, sports enthusiasts, sitcom fans, etc.). Individuals are identified by a digital identifier (like an IP address) in these segments but are not identifiable by name or other personal information that directly reveals their identity. We also share these audience segments with our Partners for their own purposes, including to enable their interest-based advertising activities.
Targeting Personalized Ads:
We use Viewing Data to help us, and our Partners, target and show you personalized ads that we think may interest you or other members of your household (a practice known as “interest-based advertising
“
) across your devices, based on the audience segments created from your Viewing Data (as described above). These ads may be shown to you on your Smart TV or other linked devices sharing the same IP address.
Audience Measurement:
We use Viewing Data to generate measurement reports to help us and our Partners understand the effectiveness of ad campaigns, including the audience that saw their ads and how they responded.  We collect information such as the creative and placement ID, IP address, and whether you viewed or interacted with an ad.
Linking devices for household targeting: With the assistance of our third-party service providers, we use the IP address collected from your Smart TV to identify “households” (a group of linked devices sharing the same IP address broadcast by a modem). This allows us and our Partners to deliver personalized advertising to you and other members of your household across various devices (such as mobile phones and tablets) and browsers based on audience segments associated with your household. If you do not enable
,
or if you otherwise opt-out of personalized advertising on your Smart TV, we will no longer collect and use your Smart TV IP address to identify your household for personalized advertising purposes. However, once you opt out of personalized advertising, you may continue to see personalized advertising on devices that were previously targeted based on Viewing Data that was shared when personalized advertising was still enabled on your Smart TV, prior to the opt-out.
Our Partners:
More information about each of our Partners and how they may use data about you and your household is available at:
https://tremorinternational.com/partners/
How can I turn OFF or ON the Viewing Data (ACR) feature?
The option to enable ACR (and related functionality) is presented during the initial setup of the Smart TV and can also be accessed at any time via the Settings of the Smart TV. You can disable ACR (and related functionality) at any time via the Settings of the Smart TV. Turning the Viewing Data feature off or on will affect only the Smart TV where you have made that selection. Please refer to the device’s Privacy Notice and the Enhanced Viewing Service Privacy Notice of your Smart TV for more information on Viewing Data and your choices.
h.    Further Description of Technologies
For additional explanation of the technologies through which IDs and other data are collected, please see
Section 3
further below regarding cookies, pixel tags and SDKs.  We may use cookies, pixel tags, SDKs and similar technologies to collect the above information, or to associate certain types of information with each other.
i. Information collected from other sources
We also may obtain other behavioral and demographic data from trusted third-party data sources. We may use this data to draw inferences about your preferences, choices, and interests to provide you with customized ads about products and services tailored to your individual interests. We may collect and combine information about your online activities over time and across devices, apps, websites and online services to provide you with customized ads.
3. Cookies, Pixel Tags, SDKs and Similar Technologies
The Company (along with our Partners and Customers) uses a variety of technology to collect information.  These are listed and described below.
a.    Pixels
A tracking “pixel” is a transparent graphic image (usually a 1 x 1 pixel) that is placed on a web page and allows for the collection of information regarding the use of the web page that contains the tracking pixel. The Company collects technical and usage
information
through the use of tracking pixels.
b.    Cookies
A “cookie” is a string of stored code used by a website to send some data to a user’s device.  Depending on the settings of the device or web browser this data may be stored on the user’s device so that the device can later return that data to the same website.  Cookies can be used with online services, such as websites, email deliveries or advertising technologies, to recognize an Internet or mobile-connected device that they have encountered before.  We use cookies to, among other things, “remember” you, track user trends, and collect information about how you use our Customer’s sites or interact with the advertising we (or others) deliver on their behalf.   We likewise use cookies to provide relevant content to you and replace non-relevant ads with ads that better match your interests.   We also use cookies when you visit our corporate Sites.
c.      Mobile Device Identifiers and SDKs
We also sometimes use, or partner with, Publishers or Publisher-facing and app developer platforms that use mobile SDKs to collect information, such as mobile identifiers (e.g., IDFAs and Android Advertising IDs), and information connected to how mobile devices interact with our Services and those using our Services.  A mobile SDK is the mobile app version of a pixel tag or beacon (see “Pixels,” above).  The SDK is a bit of computer code that app developers can include in their apps to enable ads to be shown, data to be collected, and related services to be implemented.  We may use this technology to deliver certain advertising through mobile applications and browsers based on information associated with your mobile device. If you’d like to opt-out from having ads tailored to you in this way on your mobile device, please follow the instructions in Section 6 (“
Your Choices
”) below.
d.      Third Party Suppliers and Vendors
The Company works with third party technology or service providers that provide us with hosting, serving, general campaign or site analytics, ad serving data, or demographic and other audience data about the use and viewership of our Customers’ advertising, or websites that display such advertising. Such third-party providers may utilize pixels, cookies, flash cookies, web beacons and/or similar technologies that may be activated when our advertising Customers’ advertisement is encountered on a Publisher. In all instances where the use, collection and disclosure of information is by one of these third-party providers, their privacy policies shall govern and this Privacy Policy does not apply.
e.      Disabling Cookies
Most Web browsers are set up to accept cookies. You may be able to set your browser to warn you before accepting certain cookies or to refuse certain cookies. However, if you disable the use of cookies in your web browser, some features of our Services may be difficult to use or inoperable.  In addition, we may use (or work with certain third-party companies that use) techniques other than or in addition to HTTP cookies to recognize your computer or device and/or to collect and record information about your web surfing activity, including those integrated with our Services.  These technologies may rely on the collection and analysis of “non-cookie” information from your browser or device, such as your operating system, plug-ins, system fonts, resolution and other data, for purposes of creating a unique profile or “fingerprint” of your browser or device.    We (or other third parties) may use this profile to understand and analyze how you interact with the Services, to customize content or advertising to you through the Services, to monitor against fraud or misuse of the Services, or in other ways consistent with this Privacy Policy.  Please keep in mind that your web browser may not permit you to block the use of these techniques, and those browser settings that block conventional cookies may have no effect on such techniques.
4. The Business Purposes For Which We Use and Share the Information We Collect
a.    Our Purposes Generally
Principally, we use the information described in
Section 2
to operate, provide, develop and improve our Services.   This involves facilitating various types of advertising and marketing to make them more effective, more relevant, and (we believe) more likely to engage and interest (and less likely to annoy) consumers.
b.    Personalized Advertising
This includes facilitating and providing behavioral advertising, i.e., tailoring advertising and content using the types of “audience segments” or “data segments” (and other, related types of information) we describe in
Section 2
above.   As we also describe in
Section 2
, these audience segments may be based on your activity across multiple websites or mobile apps over time, on your transactions, on your location, or on coded or “hashed” data derived from offline demographic and interest data.  Generally, the tailoring of ads to devices and browsers (and sometimes through other channels) based on this type of data is called “interest-based” or “personalized” advertising.  (Please go to
Section 6
to learn about what choices you have to control how you are marketed to in this way.)
c.    Other Advertising and Analytics Purposes
We also use the information to analyze, measure the effectiveness of, frequency-cap or sequence advertising.   For instance, we may use the information we collect to compare how many “clicks” the recipients of one ad campaign receive vs. a different ad campaign.  Or, we may track which users have seen which ads, to avoid a user being shown the same ad repeatedly.
d.    Syncing Identifiers
We sometimes integrate our information with Partners, to allow Advertisers to access our information across other platforms (and their information across our platform), in order to allow Advertisers to reach more consumers across various channels.  This may include online, offline, social media or television advertising.
e.    Identity Graphing
We may also create or help our Customers or Partners to create “identity” graphs, to help locate users across various channels, such as based on common personal, device-based, or network-based identifiers (
e.g.,
IP address, email address).
f.    Statistical information
We may use statistical information about you or your devices such as generalized location and estimated age group. We obtain this statistical information from commercially available sources (as permitted by law) such as our third-party service providers. We only work with third-party service providers who ensure that this information has been obtained in accordance with applicable law and can be provided to us for use and disclosure.
g. Other Business Purposes We also may also use the information we collect for internal research, internal operations, auditing, detecting and preventing security incidents, anti-fraud purposes, debugging, short-term and transient use, quality control, and legal compliance.
5. Why And With Whom We Share the Information We Collect
a.    To Provide our Services
Generally, we share the information that we collect in order to perform our Services, including for purposes of targeting advertising, performing analytics on ads, and measuring ad performance.
We share the information we collect with our Customers, who are a wide range of businesses, retailers, content publishers, non-profit entities, business-to-business service companies and other consumer brands, as well as their ad agencies and service providers.
We also share information with our Partners and other companies that provide services to us. For example, we use email or other contact information to resolve Customer support inquiries, and IP address and advertising identifiers with service providers.
b.    For Legal Purposes
We may share any information we have with third parties in order to: (a) comply with legal process or a regulatory investigation (e.g. a subpoena or court order); (b) enforce our Terms of Service, this Privacy Policy, or other contracts, or to investigate potential violations thereof; (c) protect the rights, property or personal safety of us, our platform, our Customers, our agents and affiliates, our users and/or the public.  We likewise may provide information to other companies and organizations (including law enforcement) for fraud protection, spam/malware prevention, and similar purposes.
c.    In the Event of a Corporate Transaction
We may also share personal information in the event of a corporate transaction, including, for example, a merger, investment, acquisition, reorganization, consolidation, bankruptcy, liquidation, or sale of some or all of our assets, or for purposes of due diligence connected with any such transaction.
d.    With Corporate Affiliates
We share information within the Nexxen Group in order to operate the Site and Services, perform data analytics, design and execute advertising and marketing campaigns, conduct product management, and/or engineer or improve and develop new products or services.
d.    With Partners
We share information collected, including IP address and advertising identifiers, with Partners to assist in our advertising and marketing efforts and show ads that may interest you. The Advertisers we use (including their service providers) may rely on pixel tags and similar technologies to collect information from or about you to tailor advertisements, measure advertising effectiveness, and enable other enhancements. We may also compile and provide reports, including in aggregated or de-identified forms, to Advertisers about the reach, viewership and effectiveness of their campaigns. We use information to help our Customers to reach the desired audience and improve their ad campaigns.
Summary Analytics and Reports. We may, with our Customers and Partners, analyze Viewing Data to create summary reports to help deliver relevant information and advertising to interested groups of consumers.  These summary reports are built from automated analysis of data elements, without connecting the information to any known natural person.  For example, a Customer who is an Advertiser may want to measure the effectiveness of their promotions in the aggregate.  Thus, a  Partner may identify another device that shares an IP address or display and analyze: (a) whether a particular website was viewed or commercial location was visited by a device with location tracking enabled (e.g., a smartphone) after a related promotion was viewed, and (b) whether a particular program was viewed following exposure to a promotion for that program.  In addition, some Partners may use a third-party data aggregator to identify demographic or other attributes or traits (such as gender or age range or income range or behavioral data) associated with the IP addresses collected, and then send to Customers the demographic information associated with those addresses.
Personalized Advertisements. As further described in Section 2 above, audience segments may be shared with Customers and Partners for the purpose of targeting and tailoring the advertising you see on certain Smart TV and connected devices, including other devices associated with your IP address or device ID on the basis of Viewing Data. Viewing Data may also be enhanced with household demographic data and data about digital actions (e.g., digital purchases, location, and other consumer behavior taken by devices associated with the IP address collected) for the purpose of delivering relevant advertising that are likely to be useful or timely.
e. With advertising measurement providers and services
We share information collected, including IP address and advertising identifiers, with Partners  and their service providers in order to help us and our Advertisers understand information about the content and ads viewed, and the effectiveness of ad campaigns, including the audience that saw their ads, how they engaged or responded, determine which programs are most popular, how many people watch a program to its conclusion, and whether and how often people watch commercials.
The measurement providers we use collect or receive information about your viewing of or interaction with content and ads, including ads that you view on your Smart TV and ads you view on other websites, mobile apps, and connected devices (including Smart TVs) to which we provide advertising services. We also share demographics data and audience segments (e.g., food fans, sport enthusiasts, sitcom fans, etc.) with advertising measurement providers and their service providers. Viewing Data may also be combined with other demographic and similar information, including by working with data aggregators.
Measurement providers use such information to create statistics about what content and ads are being watched – for example, to help them and their clients understand the audience viewing the content or ads, and to measure the effectiveness of the ads.
Through our advertising services, we provide measurement and analytics solutions to other companies. In providing these services, we analyze and reorganize ad campaign data from these companies and provide analytics reports to help them better understand the audience that viewed the company’s ads and whether those viewers belong to the same household.
6. Your Choices:  How To Opt-Out of Tracking (Interest-Based Advertising) on Web Browsers and Mobile Devices
a.    Opting Out of Interest-Based Advertising
The Company adheres to the DAA principles and Tremor Video, Inc. adheres to the DAAC principles.  To learn more about interest-based advertising or to opt-out of this type of interest-based advertising by those third parties that are members of DAA’s opt-out program, please go to
https://www.aboutads.info/.
Unruly, LLC formally known as RhythmOne, LLC, is a member of the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), an association dedicated to responsible data collection use in digital advertising.  To learn more about the NAI and its members, or to opt out of interest-based advertising facilitated by NAI members, please go to
http://optout.networkadvertising.org/?c=1.
You may also opt out of our own interest-based advertising on those same web pages, or you can simply visit our
Opt-Out Page.
(We make no representation about the accuracy or effectiveness of other providers opt out mechanisms, including those listed on the above industry websites.)
You can also opt-out of targeted advertising based on data collected via your browser by using  (i) the DAA’s opt-out tool, which can be found
here
; (ii) the DAAC’s opt-out tool, which can be found
here
; or (iii) the EDAA’s opt-out tool, which can be found
here
.
When you opt out, we will stop (a) collecting information about your interests via your browser and (b) serving you targeted advertising based on the data collected via your browser. We will subsequently place a piece of data in your browser’s cookie that tells us that you have opted out – it does not contain any data about you except for the fact that you have opted out. We need this cookie in place so that we know not to collect information about your interests and serve you targeted advertising based on your interests in the future.  Our “opt-out” cookie has a 13-month expiration date.
b.    In-App Data Opt-Out
You may opt out of the continued collection of mobile app interest-based advertising through your mobile device settings, as applicable to most (but not necessarily all) mobile devices.   Please go to the
NAI “Mobile Choices” web page
for further information about how to do this.  When you do this, we will no longer use information collected through your mobile apps to deliver behaviorally targeted advertising to your device. Please note that you will continue to receive advertising after you opt-out, but it may not be tailored to your interests.
c.    Viewed Content Advertising and Smart TVs
If you choose to activate this functionality, we may collect certain information on certain Smart TV and connected devices equipped with automatic content recognition (ACR) functionality in order to provide personalized advertising based on the programs or ads being watched on those devices, other devices with the same IP address, or browsers. We refer to the information collected as “Viewing Data” in this Policy. If you have opted-in to activating ACR on such device, the ACR functionality will continuously analyze audio from any onscreen content accessed or displayed on your Smart TV at that moment, including content from any set-top-boxes, media players, gaming consoles, over the air broadcast, or other audiovisual sources playing through your Smart TV.  For more information, see Section 2 above on “Viewing Data”.
The option to enable ACR is presented during the initial setup of the Smart TV and can also be accessed at any time via the Settings of the Smart TV. You can disable ACR at any time via the Settings of the Smart TV. Please refer to the device’s Privacy Notice and the Enhanced Viewing Service Privacy Notice of your Smart TV for more information.
7. Do Not Track
Although certain of our technology honors “do not track” (DNT) signals and similar mechanisms transmitted by web browsers or mobile device operating systems, we are not responsible, and shall not be liable, for the acts of third parties, such as ad networks, with respect to such third parties’ tracking policies.   We make no representation about the accuracy or effectiveness of other providers’ opt out mechanisms, including those listed on the above industry websites.
8. Children
Our Sites and Services are neither developed for, nor directed at, children under the age of 16.  We do not knowingly collect personal information from nor employ or offer targeting towards children under the age of 16.  If you believe your child, who is under the age of 16, has provided us with personal information or registered at one of our Sites, please contact us at
privacy@nexxen.com
and we will use reasonable efforts to remove that information from our records.
9.  Privacy Information for the Company’s Corporate Websites
The below provides information about how information is collected and used on our Sites, including
www.nexxen.com
,
www.amobee.com
,
www.tremorinternational.com
,
www.tremorvideo.com
,
www.unruly.co
,
www.rhythmone.com
and any website on which this Privacy Policy is posted.
a.    Collection of Personal Information
The Company’s customers are businesses and other organizations, groups and institutions, not individuals, and our corporate website collects contact information from our customers and prospective customers who request information from us.  We may also sometimes collect information through business channels such as trade shows, or through marketing platforms that help us identify new customers.   In addition, we and advertising and data platforms we work with may use cookies, pixels, device identifiers or other tracking methods to collect and retain “identifiers” such as cookie IDs, IP addresses to recognize you and to target or retarget ads to you when you visit our website, visit other sites across the internet, or visit other applications and services.
b.    How We Use This Personal Information
Generally, we use the information we collect to provide customers and potential customers with information that they requested, to correspond about any questions or concerns brought to our attention, to notify such persons of new services or updates to our existing Services or more generally to market and promote our Services.   We also use this information as follows:
For Legal Purposes:  We may share any information we have with third parties in order to: (a) comply with legal process or a regulatory investigation (e.g. a subpoena or court order); (b) enforce our contracts, this Privacy Policy, or other contracts, or to investigate of potential violations thereof; (c) protect the rights, property or personal safety of us, our platform, our customers, our agents and affiliates, its users and/or the public.  We likewise may provide information to other companies and organizations (including law enforcement) for fraud protection, and spam/malware prevention, and similar purposes.
In the Event of a Corporate Transaction:  We may also share personal information in the event of a corporate transaction, including, for example
,
a merger, investment, acquisition, reorganization, consolidation, bankruptcy, liquidation, or sale of some or all of our assets, or for purposes of due diligence connected with any such transaction.
With Service Providers:  We may share personal information we collect with our service providers, which may include (for instance) providers involved in tech or customer support, operations, web or data hosting, billing, accounting, security, marketing, data management, validation, enhancement or hygiene, or otherwise assisting us to provide, develop, maintain and improve our Services.
c.    Your Marketing Choices
Anyone who has provided personal contact information through our Sites may e-mail us at
privacy@nexxen.com
to update, delete, and/or correct their personal contact information, or contact us at the information provided in
Section 17
. You may likewise request access or “deletion” of your information through the same means:  however, if you are an entity with which we have done business, we will likely need to retain your data for business purposes such as accounting, billing, auditing and fulfilling other legal requirements.   To “opt out” of advertising platforms we may work with for our own corporate purposes (e.g., to “retarget” our customers or potential customers from this website), you may generally rely on the consumer choice mechanisms we set out in
Section 6
.
d. Sale of Personal Information
We may allow certain third parties (such as Partners) to collect your personal information. You have the right to opt out of such disclosure of personal information, as described below in
Section 6
.
During the 12-month period prior to the effective date of this Privacy Policy, we have disclosed the following categories of personal information:
Identifier such as a unique personal identifier (such as a device identifier, cookies, beacons, pixel tags, mobile ad identifiers and similar technology, other forms of identifiers), online identifier and IP address;
Commercial information, such as records of products or services purchased, obtained or considered, and other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies; and
Internet and other electronic network activity information, including, but not limited to, information regarding your interaction with websites, applications or advertisements.
10. Where We Store Personal Data
We are a global company with affiliates, varied business processes, management structures and technical systems around the world. Information that we collect or that is collected on our behalf may be stored on connected devices (including Smart TV) to which we provide advertising or measurement and analytics services, or on our servers, and may be transferred to, accessed from, or stored and processed globally in any other country where we or our service providers maintain facilities or call centers, including jurisdictions that may have different data privacy laws from those in your home country. The data that we collect from you may be transferred to, and stored at, a destination outside the European Economic Area (“EEA”). It may also be processed by staff operating outside the EEA who work for us or for one of our suppliers. Such staff may be engaged in, among other things, the fulfillment of your order or the provision of support services. We strive to transfer your information where there are appropriate measures and controls in place, and we strive to ensure that all information you provide to us is stored on secure servers.
11. For European Residents: About your GDPR Privacy Rights
If you are located in Europe, you may have certain right under European privacy law, principally the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR).   This Section of the Privacy Policy is intended solely for, and is applicable only as to, such consumers, i.e., “data subjects”; if you are not an EEA resident (or otherwise located in an EEA country), this does not apply to you and you should not rely on it.
a.    Our legal bases for using personal information
All organizations need a legal reason to use your personal information. There are a number of legal grounds that enable data processing. Below are the most relevant grounds of which you should be aware.
With your consent
There are some activities where we process personal information with your consent. For example, where we want to send you marketing messages by email, we would ask your permission first and you could opt out at any time.
For a legitimate interest
We may use your information where there is a legitimate interest to do so. For example, we may use your information where it would help achieve our business objectives or to facilitate a benefit to you or someone else.  Our legitimate interests in processing personal data include:
to develop, deliver and maintain relevant and engaging products, services and/or advertising;
understanding when audiences engage with our Customers’ ads;
to build a clearer understanding of who our Customer’s audiences are in order to better serve more relevant advertising to those audiences, for the benefit of both individuals and our Customers;
to maximize advertising revenues for publishers and therefore help to maintain a diverse ecosystem of online independent publishers of content for users to enjoy and educate themselves;
to support individual and societal rights to receive information;
to improve user website experience by delivering brand safe, high quality advertising to all of the publishers of online content with which we work;
to carry on the business of a commercial organization;
to demonstrate that we provide services and products to agreed industry standards; and
sharing information with the Nexxen Group companies for analysis, audience insights, business efficiencies, content personalization and to deliver relevant advertising.
To comply with legal obligations
There may be situations where we need to use your information to comply with legal and regulatory obligations or to defend claims.
b.    Exercising Your Data Subject Rights Under the GDPR
If you are a resident of the European Economic Area, you have the following data protection rights:
If you wish to access, correct, update or request deletion of your personal data, you can do so at any time by contacting us at
privacy@nexxen.com
or you may visit our
Manage User Data page
, where you may make an “access” or “right to know” request, or request that we “opt out” your personal information from our active database.
In addition, you can object to the processing of your personal data, ask us to restrict processing of your personal information or request portability of your personal information. Again, you can exercise these rights by contacting us at
privacy@nexxen.com
.
You have the right to opt-out of marketing communications we send you at any time. You can exercise this right by clicking on the “unsubscribe” or “opt-out” link in the marketing e-mails we send you. To opt-out of other forms of marketing (such as postal marketing or telemarketing), then please contact us at
privacy@nexxen.com
.
Similarly, if we have collected and process your personal data with your consent, then you can withdraw your consent at any time, by contacting us at
privacy@nexxen.com
or (as to information that we use in our Services), by going to
[your data page]
.  Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your personal data conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
You have the right to complain to a data protection authority about our collection and use of your personal information. For more information, please contact your local data protection authority.
12. Updates to this Privacy Policy
We may update this Privacy Policy from time to time in response to changing legal, technical or business developments. When we update our Privacy Policy, we will take appropriate measures to inform you, consistent with the significance of the changes we make. We will obtain your consent to any material Privacy Policy changes if and where this is required by applicable data protection laws. You can see when this Privacy Policy was last updated by checking the “last updated” date displayed at the top of this Privacy Policy.
13. Data Retention
Personal information we collect may be retained for as long as needed to fulfill legitimate business purposes. The Company expires certain cookies, including cookies directed to European users, after 12 months. Except as permitted by law, we may retain aggregated and anonymized user information (e.g., to create group-level data), for an indefinite period but usually no more than 2 years.
14. Information Security
We take measures to protect against unauthorized access to or unauthorized alteration, disclosure, or destruction of data we collect and store.  These may include internal reviews of our data collection, storage, firewalls and processing practices and security measures.  Of course, no security system is perfect.   Thus, while we do take measures to safeguard against unauthorized access to, or alteration of data we collect and store, we cannot guarantee that it will not be disclosed or accessed inadvertently or through the unauthorized acts of others.
15. California “Shine the Light” Law
California’s “Shine the Light” law (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.83) permits California residents to request and receive, once per calendar year and free of charge, information about our sharing of your personal information (if any) with third parties for their own direct marketing use.  We do not share the information subject to that law for those covered purposes.   For information about other California privacy rights you may have, please see the below sections.
16. Privacy Rights and Information for Residents of California and Other Applicable States
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) provides certain rights to residents of California. Other states’ laws (upon becoming effective) provide similar (though not identical) rights to their own residents – including residents of Colorado, Connecticut, Utah and Virginia (“Other Applicable States”).  This Section of the Privacy Policy applies if you are a natural person who is a resident of one of those states, or of California (“California Consumer”), when we act in the capacity as a business or controller as defined by the laws of such states.   This Addendum supplements the information and disclosures in the Privacy Policy for residents of those states that recognize these particularized rights.
The following sets forth the categories of information we collect and purposes for which we may use Consumers’ personal information. (
Examples provided for each category are merely examples found in the statute, and do not indicate that we necessarily collect that type of information or identifier.
)
Our Collection of Consumer Personal Information
Depending on how you interact with us, we may collect about you the categories of information summarized in the table below. The following table also describes how we collect and use such categories of information.  We do not knowingly collect consumer information deemed “sensitive” under the CCPA, such as information that reveals race, religion, ethnicity, sexual orientation or information about specific medical conditions.
Category (examples for each are statutory; all may not be collected)
Business Purpose
Categories of Sources
Identifiers, e.g.
, name; alias; postal address; mobile ad identifiers; IP address; telephone number; email address; social network handles
Creation of audiences and consumer insights for digital and other advertising, and related services such as campaign measurement and data marketing.
Data compilers and consumer data platforms and aggregators, informational and retail websites (“Commercial Source Categories”)Consumers (through browsers, apps, and mobile devices) (“Consumers”)Ad networks Our affiliates (“Affiliates”), including the following: Addination Amobee ANZ Pty Ltd Amobee Asia Pte Amobee EMEA Ltd Amobee Ltd Nexxen Group US Holdings Inc Perk.com Canada Inc. SpearAd Taptica Inc Unmedia Video Distribution Sdn Bhd Unruly Group, LLC Unruly Media KK Unruly Media Pte. Ltd Unruly Media Pty Ltd
Characteristics of protected classifications under California or other US law (inferenced or actual, including self-reported)
e.g.,
race; color; religion; sex/gender; pregnancy, marital status; military or veteran status; national origin; ancestry; age (over 40) (may be inferenced, actual or self-reported)
Creation of audiences and consumer insights for digital and other advertising, and related services such as campaign measurement and data marketing.
Commercial Source CategoriesConsumersAd networksOur affiliates
Commercial or transactions information
e.g.
, products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies, including regarding cannabis products and services.
Creation of audiences and consumer insights for digital and other advertising, and related services such as campaign measurement and data marketing.
Commercial Source CategoriesOur affiliates
Internet or other electronic network activity information
e.g.
, browsing history; online interests.
Creation of audiences and consumer insights for digital and other advertising, and related services such as campaign measurement and data marketing.
Commercial Source Categories Consumers Ad networks Our affiliates
Geolocation data
e.g.,
latitude/longitude coordinates from mobile devices
Creation of audiences and consumer insights for digital and other advertising, and related services such as campaign measurement and data marketing.
Commercial Source Categories Consumers Ad networks Our affiliates
Professional or employment-related information
e.g.
, current or past job history or job title.
Creation of audiences and consumer insights for digital and other advertising, and related services such as campaign measurement and data marketing.
Commercial Source CategoriesPublic records and other publicly available sources
Inferenced Data
e.g.,
consumer information, lifestyle or purchasing preferences.
Creation of audiences and consumer insights for digital and other advertising, and related services such as campaign measurement and data marketing.
Commercial Source Categories Consumers Ad networks Our affiliates
Our Disclosure, Sale and Sharing of Personal Information
We may share and sell the information collected from and about you as discussed above for various business purposes, with service providers and with third parties including our Customers, advertising platforms, and those advertising platforms’ customers.  These business purposes often involve cross-context behavioral advertising, also known as “targeted” advertising.
The table below describes how and with whom we share or disclose personal information, and whether we believe we have “sold” or “shared” a particular category of information in the prior 12 months.   “Sharing” information is a concept defined under California privacy laws (but not necessarily other states’ privacy laws) and includes using (or permitting others to use) the information we collect for cross-context or “targeted” advertising.  (In our case – because we often earn money in exchange for making available information for advertising purposes – we may be involved in both a “sale” and a “share” of that information.)
For maximal transparency, we have been deliberately inclusive in our terminology, by including within categories both types of third parties (e.g., “retailers”) and types of platforms through which those third parties might access data (e.g., “advertising networks”). We reiterate that
e
xamples provided for each category are merely examples found in the statute, and do not indicate that we necessarily sell, disclose, and/or share that type of information or identifier.
Category
Categories of Third Parties We M
ay
Share With
Whether We “Sold” o
r “Shared”
This Category of Personal Information in the Last 12 Months
Identifiers
,
e.g.
, name; alias; postal address; mobile ad identifiers; IP address; telephone number; email address; social network handles
Data compilers and consumer data resellers, healthcare and pharmaceutical companies, consumer goods retailers, other retailers, informational and retail websites, content publishers, non-profit organizations, business-to-business services and organizations, consumer surveys and survey companies, affiliate networks Advertising networks and media platforms, data management and “onboarding” platforms, internet service providers, data analytics providersSocial networks
Yes
Characteristics of protected classifications under California or US law (inferenced or actual)
e.g.,
race; color; religion; sex/gender; pregnancy, marital status; military or veteran status; national origin; ancestry; age (over 40) (may be inferenced, actual or self-reported)
Data compilers and consumer data resellers, healthcare and pharmaceutical companies, consumer goods retailers, other retailers, informational and retail websites, content publishers, non-profit organizations, business-to-business services and organizations, consumer surveys and survey companies, affiliate networks Advertising networks and media platforms, data management and “onboarding” platforms, internet service providers, data analytics providersSocial networks
Yes
Commercial or transactions information
e.g.
, products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies.
Data compilers and consumer data resellers, healthcare and pharmaceutical companies, consumer goods retailers, other retailers, informational and retail websites, content publishers, non-profit organizations, business-to-business services and organizations, consumer surveys and survey companies, affiliate networks Advertising networks and media platforms, data management and “onboarding” platforms, internet service providers, data analytics providersSocial networks
Yes
Internet or other electronic network activity information
e.g.
, browsing history; online interests.
Data compilers and consumer data resellers, healthcare and pharmaceutical companies, consumer goods retailers, other retailers, informational and retail websites, content publishers, non-profit organizations, business-to-business services and organizations, consumer surveys and survey companies, affiliate networksAdvertising networks and media platforms, data management and “onboarding” platforms, internet service providers, data analytics providersSocial networks
Yes
Professional or employment-related information
e.g.
, current or past job history or job title.
Data compilers and consumer data resellers, healthcare and pharmaceutical companies, consumer goods retailers, other retailers, informational and retail websites, content publishers, non-profit organizations, business-to-business services and organizations, consumer surveys and survey companies, affiliate networksAdvertising networks and media platforms, data management and “onboarding” platforms, internet service providers, data analytics providersSocial networks
Yes
Inference Data
e.g.,
consumer information, lifestyle or purchasing preferences.
Data compilers and consumer data resellers, healthcare and pharmaceutical companies, consumer goods retailers, other retailers, informational and retail websites, content publishers, non-profit organizations, business-to-business services and organizations, consumer surveys and survey companies, affiliate networksAdvertising networks and media platforms, data management and “onboarding” platforms, internet service providers, data analytics providersSocial networks
Yes
Please see the below sections to learn the purposes for which we collect and share personal information.
Our Business Purposes for Selling and Sharing Personal Information
We
collect
and
share
the personal information that we collect for the below purposes, as we also have described in our Privacy Policy and/or our website.
Online targeting, for example:
Creating or helping to create defined audience segments based on common demographics and/or shared (actual or inferred) interests or preferences (e.g., households with prospective students).  These audience segments may be based on the collective website behavior of consumers and indicate whether a consumer is likely to want to make a particular type of purchase or engage in a particular type of commercial behavior.   We also sometimes work with a data partner that “matches” our or other Information through coded identification techniques (such as through coded data “hashing”) with online cookies and other identifiers to target and measure ad campaigns online across various display, mobile and other media channels.We also create or assisting customers in creating or enhancing “identity” graphs to help locate consumers across various channels, such as based on common personal, device-based, or network-based identifiers (e.g., IP address, email address)We also use the personal information we collect or receive online to provide related services, such as for measuring the effectiveness of and otherwise analyzing ad campaigns.
W
e use personal information for
other internal purposes, for example:
For internal research, internal operations, auditing, detecting security incidents, debugging, short-term and transient use, quality control, and legal compliance.We sometimes use the personal information collected from our own website, from social networks, from other “business to business” interactions (such as at trade shows) or from data compilers for the above purposes, as well as for our own marketing purposes.
We also may share any of the personal information we collect for other legal, corporate or operational purposes.
Sharing for legal purposes.
For instance,
we may share personal information with third parties in order to: (a) comply with legal process or a regulatory investigation (e.g. a subpoena or court order); (b) enforce our Terms of Service, legal rights, this Privacy Policy, or other contracts with you, including investigation of potential violations thereof; (c) respond to claims that any content violates the rights of third parties; and/or (d) protect the rights, property or personal safety of us, our platform, our customers, our agents and affiliates, its users and/or the public.
Sharing to prevent consumer harm or fraud.
We likewise may provide information to other companies and organizations (including law enforcement) for fraud protection, spam/malware prevention, and similar purposes.
S
haring for purposes of a corporate transaction.
We may also share personal information in the event of a major corporate transaction, including for example a merger, investment, acquisition, reorganization, consolidation, bankruptcy, liquidation, or sale of some or all of our assets, or for purposes of due diligence connected with any such transaction.
Sharing With Service Providers:
We share any personal information we collect with our service providers, which may include (for instance) providers involved in tech or customer support, operations, web or data hosting, billing, accounting, security, marketing, data management, validation, enhancement or hygiene, or otherwise assisting us to provide, develop, maintain and improve our services.
Sharing of Aggregate Information
:
We may aggregate and/or de-identify any information collected so that such information can no longer be linked to you or your device (“
Aggregate/De-Identified Information
”). We may use Aggregate/De-Identified Information for any purpose, including, without limitation, for research and marketing purposes, and we may also share such data with any third parties, including advertisers, promotional partners, and sponsors, in our discretion.
Our Retention of Information
We retain personal information as a “business” or “controller” under applicable state privacy laws if it is relevant and useful for purposes of our products and services or we have a legal or compliance reason to do so, and provided the information is not subject to a valid request for deletion.  (We may retain information after deletion where legally permitted or required for a legal compliance, auditing or accounting reason.)
Your Privacy Rights and Choices
As noted above, residents of certain U.S. states have particular privacy rights, including residents of California and (upon various “effective” dates occurring during 2023) Colorado, Connecticut, Utah and Virginia (“Applicable State Residents”).  The scope and nature of these rights vary in each state, so we have sought to explain these rights in the most transparent and uniform terms, below.
Without being discriminated against for exercising these rights, California residents, as well as residents of the Applicable States, have the right to request that we disclose what personal information we collect from you, to delete that information, and to opt-out of the sale of your personal information, subject to certain restrictions.  If you are a resident of such a state, you also have the right to designate an agent to exercise these rights on your behalf (so long as your state of residence continues to recognize that right).
This section describes how to exercise those rights and our process for handling those requests.  (To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.)
We may withhold these rights to the extent that the law in your state of residence does not recognize or no longer recognizes these rights.
Note that sometimes, we act only as a “service provider” or “processor” to our customers (for instance, if they provide information to us solely to use our marketing or data management tools), in which case any consumer requests for opt-out, deletion or access to data must be made through that client: we therefore will forward any such requests to a named client, where feasible.
a.    The right to access, correction and disclosure
You may have the right to request, twice during a twelve-month period, the following information about the personal information we have collected about you during the past 12 months:
the categories and specific pieces of personal information we have collected about you;
the categories of sources from which we collected the personal information;
the business or commercial purpose for which we collected or sold the personal information;
the categories of third parties with whom we shared the personal information; and
the categories of personal information that we sold or disclosed for a business purpose, and the categories of third parties to whom we sold or disclosed that information for a business purpose.
You also may request correction of your personal information, such as if you believe we have incorrect information pertaining to you.
b.    The right to deletion
You may have the right to request that we delete the personal information we have collected from you.  Certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law.  We need certain types of information so that we can provide our Services to you, and may retain certain information for important business purposes, such as fulfilling our legal obligations, or for security, auditing or de-bugging purposes.
c.    How to exercise your access and deletion rights
California residents and residents of Other Applicable States may exercise their access or deletion rights by accessing our
“Manage user data” page
or by sending an email to
privacy@nexxen.com
.
For security purposes, we will verify your identity – in part by requesting or automatically capturing certain information from you — when you request to exercise your applicable privacy rights.  For instance, you may need to provide your email address. To request that we provide you with the specific pieces of personal information we have from you or to delete personal information we have collected from you, we may also need to ask you for additional information to verify your identity.  Once we have verified your identity (and your agent, as applicable), we will respond to your request as appropriate.
Where you have requested the categories of personal information that we have collected about you, we will provide the information you have requested, except where not permitted under applicable law or otherwise exempted by the CCPA or other applicable law.
Where you have requested specific pieces of personal information, we will provide the information you have requested, except where not permitted under applicable law or otherwise exempted by the CCPA or other applicable law.
Where you have requested that we delete personal information that we have collected from you, we will delete any information about you that is not necessary for the purposes indicated above or another permissible business, security or legal purpose.  Certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law.
If we are unable to complete your requests fully for any of the reasons above, we will provide you additional information about the reasons that we could not comply with your request.
d.    The right to nondiscrimination
We will not deny, charge different prices for, or provide a different level of quality of goods or services if you choose to exercise these rights.
e.    The right to “opt-out” of the sale of your personal information
You have the right to opt out of the “sale” of your personal information.  California law (for instance) broadly defines sale such that it may include, for example, allowing third parties to receive and use certain information, such as cookies IP address and/or browsing behavior, to deliver targeted advertising.
If you wish to “opt out” of our “sale” of your information, i.e., for purposes of personalized advertising, we recommend employing the options we provide and explain in
Section 6
(as we believe those methods are the easiest and most efficient).   However, you may also visit the interactive form that we make available at
https://yourdata.rhythmone.com/#/
and
Consumer Opt Out — Amobee
.
f.    Authorized Agents
You may also designate an agent to make requests to exercise your rights, where applicable state law (such as the CCPA) permits you to do so.   In such case, we will take steps both to verify the identity of the person seeking to exercise their rights as listed above, and to verify that your agent has been authorized to make a request on your behalf through providing us with a signed written authorization or a copy of a validly executed power of attorney.
g.  Right to Appeal
In some states you have a right to appeal our decision about how or whether we honor your privacy rights request(s).  In the event that we inform you that we will not, or believe we cannot, honor a particular consumer request (for instance, if we have determined we cannot verify your identity, or if we believe you are not entitled to the scope of deletion you request), and you live in such a state, you may appeal our determination by emailing us at
privacy@nexxen.com
.
Opt-out of sale requests are often effectively accomplished through automated suppression methods, either by a consumer causing another website (such as a content publisher) to avoid selling browser-related data, or by deploying our opt-out cookie located at
https://unruly.co/legal/privacy/#your-choices
as well as on various industry opt-out pages.  Opting out in these ways causes data associated with a consumer’s device to be effectively disassociated from their device and/or suppressed from usage.
17. How to Contact Us
If you have any questions, concerns or requests please contact us by email at
privacy@nexxen.com
or 1177 Avenue of the Americas, 9
th
Floor, New York, NY, 10036.
Jump to top
Ready to build your platform?
Let's Chat